CHAPTER I.
Look you,
Who comes here: a young man, and an old, in solemn talk.
As You Like It
.
It
is easy to foresee that this country is destined to
undergo
great and rapid changes. Those that more properly
belong to history, history will doubtless attempt to record,
and probably with the questionable veracity and prejudice
that are apt to influence the labours of that particular muse;
but there is little hope that any traces of American society,
in its more familiar aspects, will be preserved among us,
through any of the agencies usually employed for such
purposes
.
Without a stage, in a national point of view at least,
with scarcely such a thing as a book of memoirs that relates
to a life passed within our own limits, and totally without
light literature, to give us simulated pictures of our manners
and the opinions of the day, I see scarcely a mode by which the
next generation can preserve any memorials of the distinctive
usages and thoughts of this. It is true, they will have
traditions
of certain leading features of the colonial society,
but scarcely any records; and, should the next twenty years
do as much as the last, towards substituting an entirely new
race for the descendants of our own immediate fathers, it is
scarcely too much to predict that even these traditions will
be lost in the whirl and excitement of a throng of strangers.
Under all the circumstances, therefore, I have come to a
determination
to make an effort, however feeble it may prove,
to preserve some vestiges of household life in New York,
at least; while I have endeavoured to stimulate certain
friends in New Jersey, and farther south, to undertake
similar
tasks in those sections of the country. What success
will attend these last applications, is more than I can say;
but, in order that the little I may do myself shall not be lost
for want of support, I have made a solemn request in my
will, that those who come after me will consent to continue
this narrative, committing to paper their own experience, as
I have here committed mine, down as low at least as my
grandson, if I ever have one. Perhaps, by the end of the
latter's career, they will begin to publish books in America,
and the fruits of our joint family labours may be thought
sufficiently matured to be laid before the world.
It is possible that which I am now about to write will be
thought too homely, to relate to matters much too personal
and private, to have sufficient interest for the public eye;
but it must be remembered that the loftiest interests of man
are made up of a collection of those that are lowly; and,
that he who makes a faithful picture of only a single
important
scene in the events of single life, is doing something
towards painting the greatest historical piece of his day.
As I have said before, the leading events of my time will
find their way into the pages of far more pretending works
than this of mine, in some form or other, with more or less
of fidelity to the truth, and real events, and real motives;
while the humbler matters it will be my office to record,
will be entirely overlooked by writers who aspire to enrol
their names among the Tacituses of former ages. It may
be well to say here, however, I shall not attempt the
historical
mood at all, but content myself with giving the feelings,
incidents, and interests of what is purely private life,
connecting
them no farther with things that are of a more
general nature, than is indispensable to render the narrative
intelligible and accurate. With these explanations, which
are made in order to prevent the person who may happen
first to commence the perusal of this manuscript from
throwing
it into the fire, as a silly attempt to write a more silly
fiction, I shall proceed at once to the commencement of my
proper task.
I was born on the 3d May, 1737, on a neck of land, called
Satanstoe, in the county of West Chester, and in the
colony of New York; a part of the widely extended empire
that then owned the sway of His Sacred Majesty, George II.,
King of Great Britain, Ireland, and France; Defender
of the Faith; and, I may add, the shield and panoply of the
Protestant Succession; God bless him! Before I say
anything of my parentage, I will first give the reader some
idea of the
locus in quo
, and a more precise notion of the
spot on which I happened first to see the light.
A neck, in West Chester and Long Island parlance,
means something that might be better termed a head and
shoulders, if mere shape and dimensions are kept in view.
Peninsula would be the true word, were we describing things
on a geographical scale; but, as they are, I find it
necessary
to adhere to the local term, which is not altogether
peculiar to our county, by the way. The neck or
peninsula
of Satanstoe, contains just four hundred and
sixty-three
acres and a half of excellent West Chester land; and
that, when the stone is hauled and laid into wall, is saying
as much in its favour as need be said of any soil on earth.
It has two miles of beach, and collects a proportionate
quantity of sea-weed for manure, besides enjoying near a
hundred acres of salt-meadow and sedges, that are not
included
in the solid ground of the neck proper. As my
father, Major Evans Littlepage, was to inherit this estate
from his father, Capt. Hugh Littlepage, it might, even at the
time of my birth, be considered old family property, it having
indeed, been acquired by my grandfather, through his wife,
about thirty years after the final cession of the colony to
the English by its original Dutch owners. Here we had
lived, then, near half a century, when I was born, in the
direct line, and considerably longer if we included maternal
ancestors; here I now live, at the moment of writing these
lines, and here I trust my only son is to live after me.
Before I enter into a more minute description of
Satanstoe
,
it may be well, perhaps, to say a word concerning its
somewhat peculiar name. The neck lies in the vicinity of
a well-known pass that is to be found in the narrow arm of
the sea that separates the island of Manhattan from its
neighbour, Long Island, and which is called Hell Gate.
Now, there is a tradition, that I confess is somewhat confined
to the blacks of the neighbourhood, but which says that the
Father of Lies, on a particular occasion, when he was
violently
expelled from certain roystering taverns in the New
Netherlands, made his exit by this well-known dangerous
pass, and drawing his foot somewhat hastily from among
the lobster-pots that abound in those waters, leaving behind
him as a print of his passage by that route, the Hog's Back,
the Pot, and all the whirlpools and rocks that render
navigation
so difficult in that celebrated strait, he placed it
hurriedly
upon the spot where there now spreads a large bay
to the southward and eastward of the neck, just touching
the latter with the ball of his great toe, as he passed
Down-East
;
from which part of the country some of our people
used to maintain he originally came. Some fancied
resemblance
to an inverted toe (the devil being supposed to turn
everything with which he meddles, upside-down,) has been
imagined to exist in the shape and swells of our paternal
acres; a fact that has probably had its influence in
perpetuating
the name.
Satanstoe has the place been called, therefore, from
time immemorial; as time is immemorial in a country in
which civilized time commenced not a century and a half
ago: and Satanstoe it is called to-day. I confess I am
not fond of unnecessary changes, and I sincerely hope this
neck of land will continue to go by its old appellation, as
long as the House of Hanover shall sit on the throne of these
realms; or as long as water shall run and grass shall grow.
There has been an attempt made to persuade the
neighbourhood
,
quite lately, that the name is irreligious and unworthy
of an enlightened people, like this of West Chester; but it
has met with no great success. It has come from a
Connecticut
man, whose father they say is a clergyman of the
standing
order; so called, I believe, because they stand
up at prayers; and who came among us himself in the
character
of a schoolmaster. This young man, I understand,
has endeavoured to persuade the neighbourhood that
Satanstoe
is a corruption introduced by the Dutch, from Devil's
Town; which, in its turn, was a corruption from Dibbleston;
the family from which my grandfather's father-in-law
purchased
having been, as he says, of the name of Dibblee.
He has got half-a-dozen of the more sentimental part of our
society to call the neck Dibbleton; but the attempt is not
likely to succeed in the long run, as we are not a people much
given to altering the language, any more than the customs
of our ancestors. Besides, my Dutch ancestors did not
Vol. I.  2
purchase from any Dibblee, no such family ever owning the
place, that being a bold assumption of the Yankee to make
out his case the more readily.
Satanstoe, as it is little more than a good farm in
extent
,
so it is little more than a particularly good farm in
cultivation and embellishment. All the buildings are of
stone, even to the hog-sties and sheds, with well-pointed
joints, and field walls that would do credit to a fortified
place. The house is generally esteemed one of the best in
the Colony, with the exception of a few of the new school.
It is of only a story and a half in elevation, I admit; but the
rooms under the roof are as good as any of that description
with which I am acquainted, and their finish is such as
would do no discredit to the upper rooms of even a York
dwelling. The building is in the shape of an L, or two
sides of a parallelogram, one of which shows a front of
seventy-five, and the other of fifty feet. Twenty-six feet
make the depth, from outside to outside of the walls. The
best room had a carpet, that covered two-thirds of the entire
dimensions of the floor, even in my boyhood, and there were
oil-cloths in most of the better passages. The buffet in the
dining-room, or smallest parlour, was particularly admired;
and I question if there be, at this hour, a handsomer in the
county. The rooms were well-sized, and of fair
dimensions
,
the larger parlours embracing the whole depth of the
house, with proportionate widths, while the ceilings were
higher than common, being eleven feet, if we except the
places occupied by the larger beams of the chamber floors.
As there was money in the family, besides the Neck, and
the Littlepages had held the king's commissions, my father
having once been an ensign, and my grandfather a captain,
in the regular army, each in the earlier portion of his life,
we always ranked among the gentry of the county. We
happened to be in a part of Westchester in which were none
of the very large estates, and Satanstoe passed for property
of a certain degree of importance. It is true, the Morrises
were at Morrisania, and the Felipses, or Philipses, as these
Bohemian counts were then called, had a manor on the
Hudson, that extended within a dozen miles of us, and a
younger branch of the de Lanceys had established itself
even much nearer, while the Van Cortlandts, or a branch
of them, too, dwelt near Kingsbridge; but these were all
people who were at the head of the Colony, and with whom
none of the minor gentry attempted to vie. As it was,
therefore, the Littlepages held a very respectable position
between the higher class of the yeomanry and those who,
by their estates, education, connections, official rank, and
hereditary consideration, formed what might be justly
called the aristocracy of the Colony. Both my father and
grandfather had sat in the Assembly, in their time, and, as
I have heard elderly people say, with credit, too. As for
my father, on one occasion, he made a speech that occupied
eleven minutes in the delivery,a proof that he had
something
to say, and which was a source of great, but, I trust,
humble felicitation in the family, down to the day of his
death, and even afterwards.
Then the military services of the family stood us in for a
great deal. In that day it was something to be an ensign
even in the militia, and a far greater thing to have the same
rank in a regular regiment. It is true, neither of my
predecessors
served very long with the King's troops, my father
in particular selling out at the end of his second campaign;
but the military experience, and I may add the military
glory each acquired in youth, did them good service for all
the rest of their days. Both were commissioned in the
militia, and my father actually rose as high as major in
that branch of the service, that being the rank he held, and
the title he bore, for the last fifteen years of his life.
My mother was of Dutch extraction on both sides, her
father having been a Blauvelt, and her mother a Van Busser.
I have heard it said that there was even a relationship
between
the Stuyvesants and the Van Cortlandts, and the
Van Bussers; but I am not able to point out the actual
degree and precise nature of the affinity. I presume it was
not very near, or my information would have been more
minute. I have always understood that my mother brought
my father thirteen hundred pounds for dowry (currency,
not sterling), which, it must be confessed, was a very genteel
fortune for a young woman in 1733. Now, I very well
know that six, eight, and ten thousand pounds sometimes
fall in, in this manner, and even much more in the high
families; but no one need be ashamed, who looks back fifty
years, and finds that his mother brought a thousand pounds
to her husband.
I was neither an only child, nor the eldest-born. There
was a son who preceded me, and two daughters succeeded,
but they all died in infancy, leaving me in effect the only
offspring for my parents to cherish and educate. My little
brother monopolised the name of Evans, and living for
some time after I was christened, I got the Dutch
appellation
of my maternal grandfather, for my share of the family
nomenclature, which happened to be Cornelius  Corny
was consequently the diminutive by which I was known to
all the whites of my acquaintance, for the first sixteen or
eighteen years of my life, and to my parents as long as
they lived. Corny Littlepage is not a bad name, in itself,
and I trust they who do me the favour to read this
manuscript
,
will lay it down with the feeling that the name is
none the worse for the use I have made of it.
I have said that both my father and grandfather, each in
his day, sat in the assembly; my father twice, and my
grandfather only once. Although we lived so near the
borough of West Chester, it was not for that place they sat,
but for the county, the de Lanceys and the Morrises
contending
for the control of the borough, in a way that left
little chance for the smaller fishes to swim in the troubled
water they were so certain to create. Nevertheless, this
political elevation brought my father out, as it might be,
before the world, and was the means of giving him a
personal
consideration he might not have otherwise enjoyed.
The benefits, and possibly some of the evils of thus being
drawn out from the more regular routine of our usually
peaceable lives, may be made to appear in the course of this
narrative.
I have ever considered myself fortunate in not having
been born in the earlier and infant days of the colony,
when the interests at stake, and the events by which they
were influenced, were not of a magnitude to give the mind
and the hopes the excitement and enlargement that attend
the periods of a more advanced civilization, and of more
important incidents. In this respect, my own appearance
in this world was most happily timed, as any one will see
who will consider the state and importance of the colony in
the middle of the present century. New York could not
have contained many less than seventy thousand souls,
including
both colours, at the time of my birth, for it is
supposed
to contain quite a hundred thousand this day on
which I am now writing. In such a community, a man
has not only the room, but the materials on which to figure;
whereas, as I have often heard him say, my father, when
he was born, was one of less than half of the smallest
number I have just named. I have been grateful for this
advantage, and I trust it will appear, by evidence that will
be here afforded, that I have not lived in a quarter of the
world, or in an age, when and where, and to which great
events have been altogether strangers.
My earliest recollections, as a matter of course, are of
Satanstoe and the domestic fireside. In my childhood and
youth, I heard a great deal said of the Protestant Succession,
the House of Hanover, and King George II.; all mixed up
with such names as those of George Clinton, Gen. Monckton,
Sir Charles Hardy, James de Lancey, and Sir Danvers
Osborne, his official representatives in the colony. Every
age has its
old
and its
last
wars, and I can well remember
that which occurred between the French in the Canadas
and ourselves, in 1744. I was then seven years old, and it
was an event to make an impression on a child of that
tender age. My honoured grandfather was then living, as
he was long afterwards, and he took a strong interest in the
military movements of the period, as was natural for an
old soldier. New York had no connection with the
celebrated
expedition that captured Louisbourg, then the
Gibraltar
of America, in 1745; but this could not prevent an old
soldier like Capt. Littlepage from entering into the affair
with all his heart, though forbidden to use his hand. As
the reader may not be aware of all the secret springs that
set public events in motion, it may be well here to throw in
a few words in the way of explanation.
There was and is little sympathy, in the way of national
feeling, between the colonies of New England and those
which lie farther south. We are all loyal, those of the
east as well as those of the south-west and south; but there
is, and ever has been, so wide a difference in our customs,
origins, religious opinions, and histories, as to cause a broad
2 *
moral line, in the way of feeling, to be drawn between the
colony of New York and those that lie east of the Byram
river. I have heard it said that most of the emigrants to
the New England states came from the west of England,
where many of their social peculiarities and much of their
language are still to be traced, while the colonies farther
south have received their population from the more central
counties, and those sections of the island that are supposed
to be less provincial and peculiar. I do not affirm that such
is literally the fact, though it is well known that we of New
York have long been accustomed to regard our neighbours
of New England as very different from ourselves, whilst, I
dare say, our neighbours of New England have regarded
us as different from themselves, and insomuch removed
from perfection.
Let all this be as it may, it is certain New England is a
portion of the empire that is set apart from the rest, for
good or for evil. It got its name from the circumstance
that the English possessions were met, on its western
boundary, by those of the Dutch, who were thus separated
from the other colonies of purely Anglo-Saxon origin, by
a wide district that was much larger in surface than the
mother country itself. I am afraid there is something in
the character of these Anglo-Saxons that predisposes them
to laugh and turn up their noses at other races; for I have
remarked that the natives of the parent land itself, who
come among us, show this disposition even as it respects
us of New York and those of New England, while the
people of the latter region manifest a feeling towards us,
their neighbours, that partakes of anything but the
humility
that is thought to grace that christian character to which
they are particularly fond of laying claim.
My grandfather was a native of the old country, however,
and he entered but little into the colonial jealousies. He
had lived from boyhood, and had married in New York, and
was not apt to betray any of the overweening notions of
superiority that we sometimes encountered in native-born
Englishmen, though I can remember instances in which he
would point out the defects in our civilization, and others in
which he dwelt with pleasure on the grandeur and power
of his own island. I dare say this was all right, for few
among us have ever been disposed to dispute the just
supremacy of England in all things that are desirable, and
which form the basis of human excellence.
I well remember a journey Capt. Hugh Littlepage made
to Boston, in 1745, in order to look at the preparations that
were making for the great expedition. Although his own
colony had no connection with this enterprise, in a military
point of view, his previous service rendered him an object
of interest to the military men then assembled along the
coast of New England. It has been said the expedition
against Louisbourg, then the strongest place in America,
was planned by a lawyer, led by a merchant, and executed
by husbandmen and mechanics; but this, though true as a
whole, was a rule that had its exceptions. There were many
old soldiers who had seen the service of this continent in
the previous wars, and among them were several of my
grandfather's former acquaintances. With these he passed
many a cheerful hour, previously to the day of sailing, and
I have often thought since, that my presence alone prevented
him from making one in the fleet. The reader will think I
was young, perhaps, to be so far from home on such an
occasion, but it happened in this wise: My excellent mother
thought I had come out of the small-pox with some
symptoms
that might be benefited by a journey, and she
prevailed
on her father-in-law to let me be of the party when
he left home to visit Boston in the winter of 1744-5. At
that early day moving about was not always convenient in
these colonies, and my grandfather travelling in a sleigh
that was proceeding east with some private stores that had
been collected for the expedition, it presented a favourable
opportunity to send me along with my venerable progenitor,
who very good-naturedly consented to let me commence my
travels under his own immediate auspices.
The things I saw on this occasion have had a material
influence on my future life. I got a love of adventure, and
particularly of military parade and grandeur, that has since
led me into more than one difficulty. Capt. Hugh
Littlepage
,
my grandfather, was delighted with all he saw until
after the expedition had sailed, when he began to grumble
on the subject of the religious observances that the piety of
the Puritans blended with most of their other movements.
On the score of religion there was a marked difference; I
may say there
is
still a marked difference between New
England and New York. The people of New England
certainly did, and possibly may still, look upon us of New
York as little better than heathens; while we of New York
assuredly did, and for anything I know to the contrary
may yet, regard them as canters, and by necessary
connection
,
hypocrites. I shall not take it on myself to say which
party is right; though it has often occurred to my mind that
it would be better had New England a little less
self-righteousness
,
and New York a little more righteousness,
without the self. Still, in the way of pounds, shillings and
pence, we will not turn our backs upon them any day, being
on the whole rather the most trustworthy of the two as
respects money; more especially in all such cases in which
our neighbour's goods can be appropriated without having
recourse to absolutely direct means. Such, at any rate, is
the New York opinion, let them think as they please about
it on the other side of Byram.
My grandfather met an old fellow-campaigner, at Boston,
of the name of Hight, Major Hight, as he was called, who
had come to see the preparations, too; and the old soldiers
passed most of the time together. The Major was a
Jerseyman
,
and had been somewhat of a free-liver in his time,
retaining some of the propensities of his youth in old age,
as is apt to be the case with those who cultivate a vice as
if it were a hot-house plant. The Major was fond of his
bottle, drinking heavily of Madeira, of which there was
then a good stock in Boston, for he brought some on
himself
;
and I can remember various scenes that occurred
between
him and my grandfather, after dinner, as they sat
discoursing in the tavern on the progress of things, and the
prospects for the future. Had these two old soldiers been
of the troops of the province in which they were, it would
have been Major and Captain at every breath; for no
part of the earth is fonder of titles than our eastern brethren;
[1]
[1]
It will be remembered Mr. Littlepage wrote more than seventy
years ago, when this distinction might exclusively belong to the
East;
but the
West
has now some claim to it, also.
whereas, I must think we had some claims to more true
simplicity of character and habits, notwithstanding New
York has ever been thought the most aristocratical of all
the northern colonies. Having been intimate from early
youth, my two old soldiers familiarly called each other Joey
and Hodge, the latter being the abbreviation of one of my
grandfather's names, Roger, when plain Hugh was not
used, as sometimes happened between them. Hugh Roger
Littlepage, I ought to have said, was my grandfather's
name.
I should like these Yankees better, if they prayed less,
my old friend, said the Major, one day, after they had been
discussing the appearances of things, and speaking between
the puffs of his pipe. I can see no great use in losing
so much time, by making these halts to pray, when the
campaign
is fairly opened.
It was always their way, Joey, my grandfather
answered
,
taking his time, as is customary with smokers. I
remember when we were out together, in the year '17, that
the New England troops always had their parsons, who
acted as a sort of second colonels. They tell me His
Excellency
has ordered a weekly fast, for public prayers, during
the whole of this campaign.
Ay, Master Hodge, praying and plundering; so they
go on, returned the Major, knocking the ashes out of his
pipe, preparatory to filling it anew; an employment that
gave him an opportunity to give vent to his feelings, without
pausing to puff.Ay, Master Hodge, praying and
plundering
;
so they go on. Now, do you remember old Watson,
who was in the Massachusetts Levies, in the year '12?old
Tom Watson; he that was a sub under Barnwell, in our
Tuscarora expedition?
My grandfather nodded his head in assent, that being the
only reply the avocation of smoking rendered convenient,
just at that moment, unless a sort of affirmatory grunt could
be construed into an auxiliary.
Well, he has a son going in this affair; and old Tom,
or Colonel Watson, as he is now very particular to be called,
is down here with his wife and two daughters, to see the
ensign off. I went to pay the old fellow a visit, Hodge; and
found him, and the mother and sisters, all as busy as bees
in getting young Tom's baggage ready for a march. There
lay his whole equipment before my eyes, and I had a
favourable
occasion to examine it at my leisure.
Which you did with all your might, or you're not the
Joe Hight of the year '10, said my grandfather, taking his
turn with the ashes and the tobacco-box.
Old Hight was now puffing away like a blacksmith who
is striving to obtain a white heat, and it was some time before
he could get out the proper reply to this half-assertion,
half-interrogatory
sort of remark.
You may be sure of that, he at length ejaculated; when,
certain of his light, he proceeded to tell the whole story,
stopping occasionally to puff, lest he should lose the vantage
ground he had just obtained. What d'ye think of
half-a-dozen
strings of red onions, for one item in a subaltern's
stores!
My grandfather grunted again, in a way that might very
well pass for a laugh.
You 're certain they were red, Joey? he finally asked.
As red as his regimentals. Then there was a jug, filled
with molasses, that is as big as yonder demijohn; glancing
at the vessel which contained his own private stores. But
I should have thought nothing of these, a large empty sack
attracting much of my attention. I could not imagine what
young Tom could want of such a sack; but, on broaching
the subject to the Major, he very frankly gave me to
understand
that Louisbourg was thought to be a rich town, and
there was no telling what luck, or Providenceyes, by
George!he called it
Providence!
might throw in his son
Tommy's way. Now that the sack was empty, and had an
easy time of it, the girls would put his bible and hymn-book in
it, as a place where the young man would be likely to look
for them. I dare say, Hodge, you never had either bible
or hymn-book, in any of your numerous campaigns?
No, nor a plunder-sack, nor a molasses-jug, nor strings
of red onions, growled my grandfather in reply.
How well I remember that evening! A vast deal of
colonial
prejudice and neighbourly antipathy made themselves
apparent in the conversation of the two veterans; who
seemed to entertain a strange sort of contemptuous respect
for their fellow-subjects of New England; who, in their
turn, I make not the smallest doubt, paid them off in kind
with all the superciliousness and reproach, and with many
grains less of the respect.
That night, Major Hight and Capt. Hugh Roger
Littlepage
,
both got a little how-come-you-so, drinking bumpers
to the success of what they called the Yankee expedition,
even at the moment they were indulging in constant side
hits at the failings and habits of the people. These marks
of neighbourly infirmity are not peculiar to the people of
the adjacent provinces of New York and of New England.
I have often remarked that the English think and talk very
much of the French, as the Yankees speak of us; while the
French, so far as I have been able to understand their
somewhat
unintelligible languagewhich seems never to have a
beginning nor an endtreat the English as the Puritans of the
Old World. As I have already intimated, we were not very
remarkable for religion in New York, in my younger days;
while it would be just the word, were I to say that religion
was
conspicuous
among our eastern neighbours. I
remember
to have heard my grandfather say, he was once
acquainted
with a Col. Heathcote, an Englishman, like himself,
by birth, and a brother of a certain Sir Gilbert Heathcote,
who was formerly a leading man in the Bank of England.
This Col. Heathcote came among us young, and married
here, leaving his posterity behind him; and was lord of the
manor of Scarsdale and Mamaroneck, in our county of
West Chester. Well, this Col. Heathcote told my
grandfather
,
speaking on the subject of religion, that he had been
much shocked, on arriving in this country, at discovering
the neglected condition of religion in the colony; more
especially on Long Island, where the people lived in a sort
of heathenish condition. Being a man of mark, and
connected
with the government, The Society for the Propagation
of the Gospel in Foreign Parts, applied to him to aid it in
spreading the truths of the bible in the colony. The Colonel
was glad enough to comply; and I remember my
grandfather
said, his friend told him of the answer he returned to
these good persons in England. I was so struck with the
heathenish condition of the people, on my arriving here,
he wrote to them, that, commanding the militia of the
colony, I ordered the captains of the different companies to
call their men together, each Sunday at sunrise, and to drill
them until sunset; unless they would consent to repair to
some convenient place, and listen to morning and evening
prayer, and to two wholesome sermons, read by some
suitable
person, in which case the men were to be excused from
drill.
[2]
[2]
On the subject of this story, the editor can say he has seen a
published letter from Col. Heathcote, who died more than a century
since, at Mamaroneck, West Chester Co., in which that gentleman
gives the Society for the propagation of the gospel an account of his
proceedings, that agrees almost
verbatim
with the account of the
matter that is here given by Mr. Cornelius Littlepage. The house
in which Col. Heathcote dwelt was destroyed by fire, a short time
before the revolution; but the property on which it stood, and the
present building, belong at this moment to his great-grandson, the
Rt. Rev. Wm.
Heathcote
de Lancey, the Bishop of Western New York.
On the subject of the
plunder
, the editor will remark, that a near
connection, whose grandfather was a Major at the taking of
Louisbourg
,
and who was subsequently one of the first Brigadiers appointed
in 1775, has lately shown him a letter written to that officer, during
the expedition, by
his
father; in which, blended with a great deal of
pious counsel, and some really excellent religious exhortation, is an
earnest inquiry after the
plunder
.
Editor
.
I do not think this would be found necessary in
New England at least, where many of the people would be
likely to prefer drilling to preaching.
But all this gossip about the moral condition of the
adjacent
colonies of New York and New England is leading me
from the narrative, and does not promise much for the
connection
and interest of the remainder of the manuscript.
CHAPTER II.
I would there were no age between ten and three-and-twenty;
or that youth would sleep out the rest.
Winter's Tale
.
It
is not necessary for me to say much of the first
fourteen
years of my life. They passed like the childhood and
youth of the sons of most gentlemen in our colony, at that
day, with this distinction, however. There was a class
among us which educated its boys at home. This was not
a very numerous class, certainly, nor was it always the
highest in point of fortune and rank. Many of the large
proprietors were of Dutch origin, as a matter of course; and
these seldom, if ever, sent their children to England to be
taught anything, in my boyhood. I understand that a few
are getting over their ancient prejudices, in this particular,
and begin to fancy Oxford or Cambridge may be quite as
learned schools as that of Leyden; but, no Van, in my
boyhood
,
could have been made to believe this. Many of the
Dutch proprietors gave their children very little education,
in any way or form, though most of them imparted lessons
of probity that were quite as useful as learning, had the two
things been really inseparable. For my part, while I admit
there is a great deal of knowledge going up and down the
land, that is just of the degree to trick a fellow-creature out
of his rights, I shall never subscribe to the opinion, which
is so prevalent among the Dutch portion of our population,
and which holds the doctrine that the schools of the New
England provinces are the reason the descendants of the
Puritans do not enjoy the best of reputations, in this respect.
I believe a boy may be well taught, and made all the honester
for it; though, I admit, there may be, and is, such a thing
as training a lad in false notions, as well as training him
in those that are true. But, we had a class, principally of
English extraction, that educated its sons well; usually
sending them home, to the great English schools, and
finishing
at the universities. These persons, however, lived
principally
in town, or, having estates on the Hudson, passed
their winters there. To this class the Littlepages did not
belong; neither their habits nor their fortunes tempting them
to so high a flight. For myself, I was taught enough Latin
and Greek to enter college, by the Rev. Thomas Worden,
an English divine, who was rector of St. Jude's, the parish
to which our family properly belonged. This gentleman
was esteemed a good scholar, and was very popular among
the gentry of the county; attending all the dinners, clubs,
races, balls, and other diversions that were given by them,
within ten miles of his residence. His sermons were pithy
and short; and he always spoke of your half-hour preachers,
as illiterate prosers, who did not understand how to condense
Vol. I.  3
their thoughts. Twenty minutes were his gauge, though I
remember to have heard my father say, he had known him
preach all of twenty-two. When he compressed down to
fourteen
,
my grandfather invariably protested he was delightful.
I remained with Mr. Worden until I could translate the
two first neids, and the whole of the Gospel of St.
Matthew
,
pretty readily; and then my father and grandfather,
the last in particular, for the old gentleman had a great idea
of learning, began to turn over in their minds, the subject of
the college to which I ought to be sent. We had the choice
of two, in both of which the learned languages and the
sciences are taught, to a degree, and in a perfection, that is
surprising for a new country. These colleges are Yale, at
New Haven, in Connecticut, and Nassau Hall, which was
then at Newark, New Jersey, after having been a short
time at Elizabethtown, but which has since been established
at Princeton. Mr. Worden laughed at both; said that
neither
had as much learning as a second-rate English
grammar-school
;
and that a lower-form boy, at Eton or
Westminster
,
could take a master's degree at either, and pass for
a prodigy in the bargain. My father, who was born in the
colonies, and had a good deal of the right colony feeling,
was nettled at this, I remember; while my grandfather, being
old-country born, but colony educated, was at a loss how to
view the matter. The captain had a great respect for his
native land, and evidently considered it the paradise of this
earth, though his recollections of it were not very distinct;
but, at the same time, he loved Old York, and West Chester
in particular, where he had married and established himself
at Satan's Toe; or, as he spelt it, and as we all have spelt
it, now, this many a day, Satanstoe. I was present at the
conversation which decided the question, as regarded my
future education, and which took place in the common
parlour
,
around a blazing fire, about a week before Christmas,
the year I was fourteen. There were present Capt. Hugh
Roger, Major Evans, my mother, the Rev. Mr. Worden, and
an old gentleman of Dutch designation and extraction, of
the name of Abraham Van Valkenburgh, but who was
familiarly
called, by his friends, 'Brom Follock, or Col. Follock
or Volleck, as the last happen to be more or less
ceremonious
,
or more or less Dutch. Follock, I think, however
was the favourite pronunciation. This Col. Van
Valkenburgh
was an old brother-soldier of my father's, and, indeed,
a relation, a sort of a cousin through my greatgrandmother,
besides being a man of much consideration and substance.
He lived in Rockland, just across the Hudson, but never
failed to pay a visit to Satanstoe at that season of the year.
On the present occasion, he was accompanied by his son
Dirck, who was
my
friend, and just a year my junior.
Vell, den,the colonel commenced the discourse by
saying, as he tapped the ashes out of his pipe for the second
time that evening, having first taken a draught of hot flip,
a beverage much in vogue then, as well as now,vell,
den, Evans, vat is your intention as to ter poy? Vill he pe
college-l'arnt, like as his grant-fat'er, or only school-l'arnt,
like as his own fat'er? The allusion to the grandfather
being a pleasantry of the colonel's, who insisted that all the
old-country born were college-l'arnt by instinct.
To own the truth, 'Brom, my father answered, this
is a point that is not yet entirely settled, for there are
different
opinions as to the place to which he shall be sent,
even admitting that he is to be sent at all.
The colonel fastened his full, projecting, blue eyes on my
father, in a way that pretty plainly expressed surprise.
Vat, den, is dere so many colleges, dat it is hart to
choose? he said.
There are but two that can be of any use to us, for
Cambridge is much too distant to think of sending the boy
so far. Cambridge was in our thoughts at one time, but
that is given up.
Vhere, den, ist Camprige? demanded the Dutchman,
removing his pipe to ask so important a question, a
ceremony
he usually thought unnecessary.
It is a New England collegenear Boston; not half a
day's journey distant, I fancy.
Don't sent Cornelius dere, ejaculated the colonel,
contriving
to get these words out alongside of the stem of the
pipe.
You think not, Col. Follock, put in the anxious mother;
may I ask the reason for that opinion?
Too much Suntay, Matam Littlepagethe poy wilt be
sp'ilt by ter ministers. He will go away an honest lat, and
come pack a rogue. He will l'arn how to bray and to
cheat.
Hoity toity! my noble colonel! exclaimed the Rev.
Mr. Worden, affecting more resentment than he felt.
Then you fancy the clergy, and too much Sunday, will
be apt to convert an honest youth into a knave!
The colonel made no answer, continuing to smoke very
philosophically, though he took occasion, while he drew the
pipe out of his mouth, in one of its periodical removals, to
make a significant gesture with it towards the rising sun,
which all present understood to mean down east, as it is
usual to say, when we mean to designate the colonies of
New England. That he was understood by the Rev. Mr.
Worden, is highly probable; since that gentleman
continued
to turn the flip of one vessel into another, by way of
more intimately blending the ingredients of the mixture,
quite as coolly as if there had been no reflection on his
trade.
What do you think of Yale, friend 'Brom? asked my
father, who understood the dumb-show as well as any of
them.
No tifference, Evans; dey all breaches and brays too
much.
Goot
men have no neet of so much religion.
Vhen a man is
really
goot, religion only does him harm.
I mean Yankee religion.
I have another objection to Yale, observed Capt. Hugh
Roger, which is their English.
Och! exclaimed the ColonelDeir English is
horriple
!
Wuss dan ast to us Tutch.
Well, I was not aware of that, observed my father.
They are English, sir, as well as ourselves, and why
should they not speak the language as well as we?
Why toes not a Yorkshireman, or a Cornishman, speak
as vell as a Lonnoner? I tell you what, Evans, I 'll pet the
pest game-cock on ter Neck, against the veriest tunghill the
parson hast, ter Presitent of Yale calls p e e n, pen, ant
r o o f, ruffand so on.
My birds are all game, put in the divine; I keep no
other breed.
Surely, Mr. Worden,
you
do not countenance
cock-fights
by your presence! my mother said, using as much
of reproach in her manner as comported with the holy office
of the party she addressed, and with her own gentle nature.
The Colonel winked at my father, and laughed
through his
pipe
, an exploit he might have been said to perform almost
hourly. My father smiled in return; for, to own the truth,
he
had
been present at such sports on one or two occasions,
when the parson's curiosity had tempted him to peep in
also; but my grandfather looked grave and much in earnest.
As for Mr. Worden himself, he met the imputation like a
man. To do him justice, if he were not an ascetic,
neither was he a whining hypocrite, as is the case with too
many of those who aspire to be disciples and ministers of
our blessed Lord.
Why not, Madam Littlepage? Mr. Worden stoutly
demanded. There are worse places than cock-pits; for,
mark me, I never betno, not on a horse-race, even; and
that
is an occasion on which any gentleman might venture
a few guineas, in a liberal, frank, way. There are so few
amusements for people of education in this country, Madam
Littlepage, that one is not to be too particular. If there
were hounds and hunting, now, as there are at home, you
should never hear of me at a cock-fight, I can assure you.
I must say I do not approve of cock-fights, rejoined
my mother meekly; and I hope Corny will never be
seen at one. Nonevernever.
Dere you're wrong, Matam Littlepage, the Colonel
remarked, for ter sight of ter spirit of ter cocks wilt give
ter boy spirit himself. My Tirck, dere, goes to all in ter
neighbourhoot, and he is a game-cock himself, let me tell
you. Come, Tirckcomecock-a-doodle-doo!
This was true all round, as I very well knew, young as
I was. Dirck, who was as slow-moving, as dull-seeming,
and as anti-mercurial a boy to look at as one could find in
a thousand, was thorough game at the bottom, and he had
been at many a main, as he had told me himself. How
much of his spirit was derived from witnessing such scenes
I will not take on me to affirm; for, in these later times, I
have heard it questioned whether such exhibitions do really
improve the spectator's courage or not. But Dirck had
pluck, and plenty of it, and in that particular, at least, his
father was not mistaken. The Colonel's opinion always
3 *
carried weight with my mother, both on account of his
Dutch extraction, and on account of his well-established
probity; for, to own the truth, a text or a sentiment from
him had far more weight with her than the same from the
clergyman. She was silenced on the subject of
cock-fighting
for the moment, therefore, which gave Capt. Hugh
Roger further opportunity to pursue that of the English
language. The grandfather, who was an inveterate lover
of the sport, would have cut in to that branch of the
discourse
,
but he had a great tenderness for my mother, whom
everybody loved by the way, and he commanded himself,
glad to find that so important an interest had fallen into
hands as good as those of the Colonel.
He
would just
as soon be absent from church as be absent from a
cock-fight
,
and he was a very good observer of religion.
I should have sent Evans to Yale, had it not been for
the miserable manner of speaking English they have in
New England, resumed my grandfather; and I had no
wish to have a son who might pass for a Cornish man. We
shall have to send this boy to Newark, in New Jersey. The
distance is not so great, and we shall be certain he will not
get any of your round-head notions of religion, too. Col.
'Brom, you Dutch are not altogether free from these
distressing
follies.
Debble a pit! growled the Colonel, through his pipe;
for no devotee of liberalism and latitudinarianism in religion
could be more averse to extra-piety than he. The Colonel,
however, was not of the Dutch Reformed; he was an
Episcopalian
,
like ourselves, his mother having brought this
branch of the Follocks into the church; and, consequently,
he entered into all our feelings on the subject of religion,
heart and hand. Perhaps Mr. Worden was a greater
favourite
with no member of the four parishes over which he
presided
,
than with Col. Abraham Van Valkenburgh.
I should think less of sending Corny to Newark,
added my mother, was it not for crossing the water.
Crossing the water! repeated Mr. Worden. The
Newark we mean, Madam Littlepage, is not at home: the
Jersey of which we speak is the adjoining colony of that
name.
I am aware of that, Mr. Worden; but it is not possible
to get to Newark, without making that terrible voyage
between
New York and Powles' Hook. No, sir, it is
impossible
;
and every time the child comes home, that risk will
have to be run. It would cause me many a sleepless
night!
He can go by Tobb's Ferry, Matam Littlepage, quietly
observed the Colonel.
Dobb's Ferry can be very little better than that by
Powles' Hook, rejoined the tender mother. A ferry is a
ferry; and the Hudson will be the Hudson, from Albany to
New York. So water is water.
As these were all self-evident propositions, they produced
a pause in the discourse; for men do not deal with new ideas
as freely as they deal with the old.
Dere is a way, Evans, as you and I know py
experience
,
resumed the Colonel, winking again at my father,
to go rount the Hudson altoget'er. To pe sure, it is a
long way, and a pit in the woots; but petter to untertake
dat, than to haf the poy lose his l'arnin'. Ter journey might
be made in two mont's, and he none the wuss for ter
exercise
.
Ter Major and I were never heartier dan when we
were operating on the he't waters of the Hutson. I will tell
Corny the roat.
My mother saw that her apprehensions were laughed at,
and she had the good sense to be silent. The discussion
did not the less proceed, until it was decided, after an hour
more of weighing the
pros
and the
cons
, that I was to be
sent to Nassau Hall, Newark, New Jersey, and was to
move from that place with the college, whenever that event
might happen.
You will send Dirck there, too, my father added, as
soon as the affair in my case was finally determined. It
would be a pity to separate the boys, after they have been
so long together, and have got to be so much used to each
other. Their characters are so identical, too, that they
are more like brothers than very distant relatives.
Dey will like one anot'er all de petter for pein' a little
tifferent, den, answered the Colonel, drily.
Dirck and I were no more alike than a horse resembles
a mule.
Ay, but Dirck is a lad who will do honour to an
education
he
is solid and thoughtful, and learning will not be
thrown away on such a youth. Was he in England, that
sedate lad might get to be a bishop.
I want no pishops in my family, Major Evans; nor do
I want any great l'arnin'. None of us ever saw a college,
and we have got on fery vell. I am a colonel and a
memper
;
my fat'er was a colonel and a memper; and my
grandfat'er
woult
have peen a colonel and a memper, but dere
vast no colonels and no mempers in his time; though Tirck,
yonter can be a colonel and a memper, wit'out crosting dat
terriple ferry that frightens Matam Littlepage so much.
There was usually a little humour in all Col. Follock said
and did, though it must be owned it was humour after a
very Dutch model; Dutch-built fun, as Mr. Worden used
to call it. Nevertheless, it was humour; and there was
enough of Holland in all the junior generations of the
Littlepages
to enjoy it. My father understood him, and my
mother did not hear the last of the terriple ferry until
not only I, but the college itself, had quitted Newark; for
the institution made another remove to Princeton, the place
where it is now to be found, some time before I got my
degree.
You have got on very well without a college education,
as all must admit, colonel, answered Mr. Worden; but
there is no telling how much
better
you would have got on,
had you been an A. M. You might, in the last case, have
been a general and a member of the King's council.
Dere ist no yeneral in ter colony, the
commander-in-chief
and His Majesty's representatif excepted, returned
the colonel. We are no Yankees, to make yenerals of
ploughmen.
Hereupon, the colonel and my father knocked the ashes
out of their pipes at the same instant, and both laughed,
a merriment in which the parson, my grandfather, my dear
mother, and I myself joined. Even a negro boy, who was
about my own age, and whose name was Jacob, or Jaap,
but who was commonly called Yaap, grinned at the remark,
for he had a sovereign contempt for Yankee Land, and all
it contained; almost as sovereign a contempt as that which
Yankee Land entertained for York itself, and its Dutch
population. Dirck was the only person present who looked
grave; but Dirck was habitually as grave and sedate, as if
he had been born to become a burgomaster.
Quite right, Brom, cried my father;
colonels
are
good enough for us; and when we do make a man
that
,
even, we are a little particular about his being respectable
and fit for the office. Nevertheless, learning will not hurt
Corny, and to college he shall go, let you do as you please
with Dirck. So that matter is settled, and no more need be
said about it.
And it was settled, and to college I
did
go, and that by
the awful Powles' Hook Ferry, in the bargain. Near as we
lived to town, I paid my first visit to the island of
Manhattan
the day my father and myself started for Newark. I
had an aunt, who lived in Queen Street, not a very great
distance from the fort, and she had kindly invited me and
my father to pass a day with her, on our way to New
Jersey
,
which invitation had been accepted. In my youth, the
world in general was not as much addicted to gadding about
as it is now getting to be, and neither my grandfather nor
my father ordinarily went to town, their calls to the
legislature
excepted, more than twice a year. My mother's visits
were still less frequent, although Mrs. Legge, my aunt, was
her own sister. Mr. Legge was a lawyer of a good deal of
reputation, but he was inclined to be in the opposition, or
espoused the popular side in politics; and there could be no
great cordiality between one of that frame of mind and our
family. I remember we had not been in the house an hour,
before a warm discussion took place between my uncle and
my father, on the question of the right of the subject to
canvass
the acts of the government. We had left home
immediately
after an early breakfast, in order to reach town
before
dark; but a long detention at the Harlem Ferry,
compelled
us to dine in that village, and it was quite night
before
we stopped in Queen Street. My aunt ordered supper
early, in order that we might get early to bed, to recover
from our fatigue, and be ready for sight-seeing next day.
We sat down to supper, therefore, in less than an hour after
our arrival; and it was while we were at table that the
discussion
I have mentioned took place. It would seem that a
party had been got up in town among the disloyal, and I
might almost say, the disaffected, which claimed for the
subject the right to know in what manner every shilling of
the money raised by taxation was expended. This very
obviously improper interference with matters that did not
belong to them, on the part of the ruled, was resisted by the
rulers, and that with energy; inasmuch as such inquiries
and investigations would naturally lead to results that might
bring authority into discredit, make the governed presuming
and prying in their dispositions, and cause much
derangement
and inconvenience to the regular and salutary action
of government. My father took the negative of the
proposition
,
while my uncle maintained its affirmative. I well
remember that my poor aunt looked uneasy, and tried to
divert the discourse by exciting our curiosity on a new
subject.
Corny has been particularly lucky in having come to
town just as he has, since we shall have a sort of gala-day,
to-morrow, for the blacks and the children.
I was not in the least offended at being thus associated
with the negroes, for they mingled in most of the
amusements
of us young people; but I did not quite so well like to
be ranked with the children, now I was fourteen, and on my
way to college. Notwithstanding this, I did not fail to
betray
an interest in what was to come next, by my
countenance
.
As for my father, he did not hesitate about asking
an explanation.
The news came in this morning, by a fast-sailing sloop,
that the Patroon of Albany is on his way to New York, in
his coach-and-four, and with two out-riders, and that he may
be expected to reach town in the course of to-morrow.
Several of my acquaintances have consented to let their
children go out a little way into the country, to see him
come in; and, as for the blacks, you know, it is just as well
to give them
permission
to be of the party, as half of them
would otherwise go without asking it.
This will be a capital opportunity to let Corny see a
little of the world, cried my father, and I would not have
him miss it on any account. Besides, it is useful to teach
young people early, the profitable lesson of honouring their
superiors and seniors.
In that sense it may do, growled my uncle, who,
though so much of a latitudinarian in his political opinions,
never failed to inculcate all useful and necessary maxims
for private life; the Patroon of Albany being one of the
most respectable and affluent of all our gentry. I have no
objections to Corny's going to see that sight; and, I hope,
my dear, you will let both Pompey and Csar be of the
party. It won't hurt the fellows to see the manner in which
the Patroon has his carriage kept and horses groomed.
Pompey and Csar were of the party, though the latter
did not join us until Pompey had taken me all round the
town, to see the principal sights; it being understood that
the Patroon had slept at Kingsbridge, and would not be
likely to reach town until near noon. New York was
certainly
not the place, in 1751, it is to-day; nevertheless, it
was a large and important town, even when I went to
college
,
containing not less than twelve thousand souls, blacks
included. The Town Hall is a magnificent structure,
standing
at the head of Broad Street; and thither Pompey led me,
even before my aunt had come down to breakfast. I could
scarcely admire that fine edifice sufficiently; which, for size,
architecture and position, has scarcely now an equal in all
the colonies. It is true, that the town has much improved,
within the last twenty years; but York was a noble place,
even in the middle of this century! After breakfast,
Pompey
and I proceeded up Broadway, commencing near the
fort, at the Bowling Green, and walking some distance
beyond
the head of Wall Street, or quite a quarter of a mile.
Nor did the town stop here; though its principal extent is,
or was then, along the margin of the East River. Trinity
Church I could hardly admire enough either; for, it appeared
to me, that it was large enough to contain all the
church-people
in the colony.
[3]
[3]
The intelligent reader will, of course, properly appreciate the
provincial admiration of Mr. Littlepage, who naturally fancied his
own best was other people's best. The Trinity of that day was
burned in the great fire of 1776. The edifice that succeeded it, at
the peace of 1783, has already given place to a successor, that has
more claim to be placed on a level with modern, English, town
church-architecture
,
than any other building in the Union. When another
shall succeed this, which shall be as much larger and more elaborated
than this is compared to its predecessor, and still another shall
succeed
,
which shall bear the same relation to that, then the country will
possess an edifice that is on a level with the first-rate Gothic
cathedral-architecture
of Europe. It would be idle to pretend that the new
Trinity is without faults; some of which are probably the result of
circumstances and necessity; but, if the respectable architect who
has built it, had no other merit, he would deserve the gratitude of
every man of taste in the country, by placing church-towers of a
proper comparative breadth, dignity and proportions, before the eyes
of its population. The diminutive meanness of American
church-towers
,
has been an eye-sore to every
intelligent
, travelled American,
since the country was settled.
Editor
.
It was a venerable structure, which
had then felt the heats of summer and the snows of winter
on its roofs and walls, near half a century, and it still stands
a monument of pious zeal and cultivated taste. There were
other churches, belonging to other denominations, of course,
that were well worthy of being seen; to say nothing of the
markets. I thought I never should tire of gazing at the
magnificence
of the shops, particularly the silversmiths'; some
of which must have had a thousand dollars' worth of plate
in their windows, or otherwise in sight. I might say as
much of the other shops, too, which attracted a just portion
of my admiration.
About eleven, the number of children and blacks that
were seen walking towards the Bowery Road, gave us notice
that it was time to be moving in that direction. We were
in the upper part of Broadway, at the time, and Pompey
proceeded forthwith to fall into the current, making all the
haste he could, as it was thought the traveller might pass
down towards the East River, and get into Queen Street,
before we could reach the point at which he would diverge.
It is true, the old town residence of Stephen de Lancey,
which stood at the head of Broadway, just above Trinity,
[4]
[4]
The site of the present City Hotel.
Ed
.
had been converted into a tavern, and we did not know but
the Patroon might choose to alight there, as it was then the
principal inn of the town; still, most people preferred
Queen Street; and the new City Tavern was so much out
of the way, that strangers in particular were not fond of
frequenting it. Csar came up, much out of breath, just
as we got into the country.
Quitting Broadway, we went along the country road
that then diverged to the east, but which is now getting to
contain a sort of suburb, and passing the road that leads
into Queen Street, we felt more certain of meeting the
traveller
,
whose carriage we soon learned had not gone by. As
there were and are several taverns for country people in
this quarter, most of us went quite into the country,
proceeding
as far as the villas of the Bayards, de Lanceys,
and other persons of mark; of which there are several
along the Bowery Road. Our party stopped under some
cherry-trees, that were not more than a mile from town,
nearly opposite to Lt. Gov. de Lancey's country-house;
[5]
[5]
Now, de Lancey Street.
Ed
.
but many boys &c. went a long long way into the country,
finishing the day by nutting and gathering apples in the
grounds of Petersfield and Rosehill, the country residences
of the Stuyvesant and Watt, or, as the last is now called
the Watts, families. I was desirous of going thus far
myself
,
for I had heard much of both of those grand places;
but Pompey told me it would be necessary to be back for
dinner by half-past one, his mistress having consented to
postpone the hour a little, in order to indulge my natural
desire to see all I could while in town.
We were not altogether children and blacks who were
out on the Bowery Road that day,many tradesmen were
among us, the leathern aprons making a goodly parade on
the occasion. I saw one or two persons wearing swords,
hovering
round, in the lanes and in the woods,proof that even
gentlemen had some desire to see so great a person as the
Patroon
of Albany pass. I shall not stop to say much of the
transit
of the
Patroon
. He came by about noon, as was
expected
,
and in his coach-and-four, with two outriders,
coachman
,
&c. in liveries, as is usual in the families of the gentry,
and with a team of heavy, black, Dutch-looking horses,
that I remember Csar pronounced to be of the true Flemish
breed. The Patroon himself was a sightly, well-dressed
gentleman, wearing a scarlet coat, flowing wig, and cocked
hat; and I observed that the handle of his sword was
of solid silver. But my father wore a sword with a solid
silver handle, too, a present from my grandfather when the
former first entered the army.
This patroon must have been Jeremiah Van Rensselaer, who live,
to be a bachelor of forty before he married. If there be no
anachronism
,
this gentleman married Miss Van Cortlandt, one of the seven
daughters of Stephanus Van Cortlandt, who was proprietor of the
great manor of Cortlandt, West Chester county, and who, in his day,
was the principal personage of the colony. The seven daughters of
this Colonel Van Cortlandt, by marrying into the families of de
Lancey
,
Bayard, Van Rensellaer, Beekman, M'GregorSkinner, &c. &c.
brought together a connection that was long felt in the political affairs
of New York. The Schuylers were related through a previous
marriage
,
and many of the Long Island and other families of weight by
other alliances. This connection formed the court party, which was
resisted by an opposition led by the Livingstons, Morris, and other
names of
their
connection. This old bachelor, Jeremiah Van
Rensellaer
,
believing he would never marry, alienated, in behalf of his next
brother and anticipated heir, the Greenbush and Claverack estates,
portions of those vast possessions which, in our day, and principally
through the culpable apathy, or miserable demagogueism of those
who have been entrusted with the care of the public weal, have been
the pretext for violating some of the plainest laws of morality that
God has communicated to man.
Editor
.
He bowed to the salutations
Vol. I.  4
he received in passing, and I thought all the spectators were
pleased with the noble sight of seeing such an equipage pass
into the town. Such a sight does not occur every day in
the colonies, and I felt exceedingly happy that it had been
my privilege to witness it.
A little incident occurred to myself that rendered this
day long memorable to me. Among the spectators
assembled
along the road on this occasion, were several groups
of girls, who belonged to the better class, and who had been
induced to come out into the country, either led by curiosity
or by the management of the different sable nurses who had
them in charge. In one of these groups was a girl of
about ten, or possibly of eleven years of age, whose dress,
air, and mien, early attracted my attention. I thought her
large, bright, full, blue eye, particularly winning; and boys
of fourteen are not altogether insensible to beauty in the
other sex, though they are possibly induced oftener to
regard
it in those who are older than in those who are younger
than themselves. Pompey happened to be acquainted with
Silvy, the negress who had the care of my little beauty, to
whom he bowed, and addressed as Miss Anneke (Anna
Cornelia
,
abbreviated). Anneke I thought a very pretty name
too, and some little advances were made towards an
acquaintance
by means of an offering of some fruit that I had
gathered by the way-side. Things were making a con
siderable progress, and I had asked several questions, such
as whether `Miss Anneke had ever seen a patroon,' which
`was the greatest personage, a patroon or a governor,'
whether `a nobleman who had lately been in the colony, as
a military officer, or the patroon, would be likely to have
the finest coach,' when a butcher's boy, who was passing,
rudely knocked an apple out of Anneke's hand, and caused
her to shed a tear.
I took fire at this unprovoked outrage, and lent the fellow
a dig in the ribs that gave him to understand the young
lady had a protector. My chap was about my own age
and weight, and he surveyed me a minute with a species of
contempt, and then beckoned me to follow him into an
orchard that was hard by, but a little out of sight. In spite
of Anneke's entreaties I went, and Pompey and Csar
followed
.
We had both stripped before the negroes got up,
for they were in a hot discussion whether I was to be
permitted
to fight or not. Pompey maintained it would keep
dinner waiting; but Csar, who had the most bottom, as
became his name, insisted, as I had given a blow, I was
bound to render satisfaction. Luckily, Mr. Worden was
very skilful at boxing, and he had given both Dirck and
myself many lessons, so that I soon found myself the best
fellow. I gave the butcher's boy a bloody nose and a black
eye, when he gave in, and I came off victor; not, however,
without a facer or two, that sent me to college with a
reputation
I hardly merited, or that of a regular pugilist.
When I returned to the road, after this breathing, Anneke
[6]
[6]
Pronounced On-na-
kay
, I believe.
Editor
.
had disappeared, and I was so shy and silly as not to ask
her family name from Csar the Great, or Pompey the
Little.
CHAPTER III.
Believe me, thou talkest of an admirable conceited fellow. Has
he any unbraided wares?
Pr'ythee, bring him in; and let him approach singing.
Winter's Tale
.
I have
no intention of taking the reader with me through
college, where I remained the usual term of four years.
These four years were not idled away, as sometimes happens,
but were fairly improved. I read all of the New Testament,
in Greek; several of Cicero's Orations; every line of
Horace, Satires and Odes; four books of the Iliad; Tully
de Oratore, throughout; besides paying proper attention to
geography, mathematics, and other of the usual branches.
Moral philosophy, in particular, was closely attended to,
senior year, as well as Astronomy. We had a telescope
that showed us all four of Jupiter's moons. In other
respects
,
Nassau might be called the seat of learning. One
of our class purchased a second-hand copy of Euripides, in
town, and we had it in college all of six months; though it
was never my good fortune to see it, as the young man who
owned it, was not much disposed to let profane eyes view
his treasure. Nevertheless, I am certain the copy of the
work was in college; and we took good care to let the Yale
men hear of it more than once. I do not believe
they
ever
saw even the outside of an Euripides. As for the telescope,
I can testify of my own knowledge; having seen the moons
of Jupiter as often as ten times, with my own eyes, aided
by its magnifiers. We had a tutor who was expert among
the stars, and who, it was generally believed, would have
been able to see the ring of Saturn, could he have found the
planet; which, as it turned out, he was unable to do.
My four college years were very happy years. The
vacations
came often, and I went home invariably; passing a
day or two with my aunt Legge, in going or coming. The
acquisition of knowledge was always agreeable to me; and
I may say it without vanity, I trust, at this time of life, I
got the third honour of my class. We should have
graduated
four, but one of our class was compelled to quit us at
the end of junior year, on account of his health. He was
an unusually hard student, and it was generally admitted
that he would have taken the first honour had he remained.
We were thought to acquit ourselves with credit at the
commencement
;
although I afterwards heard my grandfather
tell Mr. Worden, that he was of opinion the addresses would
have been more masculine and commendable, had less been
said of the surprising growth, prosperity, and power of the
colonies. He had no objection to the encouragement of a
sound, healthful, patriotic feeling; but to him it appeared
that something more novel might have better pleased the
audience. This may have been true, as all three of us had
something to say on the subject; and it is a proof how much
we thought alike, that our language was almost as closely
assimilated as our ideas.
As for the Powles Hook Ferry, it was an unpleasant place
I will allow; though by the time I was junior I thought
nothing of it. My mother, however, was glad when it was
passed for the last time. I remember the very first words
that escaped her, after she had kissed me on my final return
from college, were, Well, Heaven be praised, Corny!
you will never again have any occasion to cross that
frightful
ferry, now college is completely done with! My
poor mother little knew how much greater dangers I was
subsequently called on to encounter, in another direction.
Nor was she minutely accurate in her anticipations, since I
have crossed the ferry in question, several times in later life;
the distances not appearing to be as great, of late years, as
they certainly seemed to be in my youth.
It was a feather in a young man's cap to have gone through
college, in 1755, which was the year I graduated. It is true,
the University men, who had been home for their learning,
were more or less numerous; but they were of a class that
held itself aloof from the smaller gentry, and most of them
were soon placed in office, adding the dignity of public trusts
to their acquisitionsthe former in a manner overshadowing
the latter. But, I was nearer to the body of the community,
and my position admitted more of comparative excellence,
as it might be. No one thinks of certain habits, opinions,
manners, and tastes, in the circle where they are expected
4 *
to be found; but, it is a different thing where all, or any of
these peculiarities form the exception. I am afraid more
was anticipated from my college education than has ever
been realized; but I will say this for my
Alma Mater
, that
I am not conscious my acquisitions at college have ever been
of any disadvantage to me; and I rather think they have,
in some degree at least, contributed to the little success that
has attended my humble career.
I kept up my intimacy with Dirck Follock, during the
whole time I remained at college. He continued the classics
with Mr. Worden, for two years after I left the school; but
I could not discover that his progress amounted to anything
worth mentioning. The master used to tell the Colonel,
that Dirck's progress was slow and sure; and this did
not fail to satisfy a man who had a constitutional aversion
to much of the head-over-heels rate of doing things among
the English population. Col. Follock, as we always called
him, except when my father or grandfather asked him to
drink a glass of wine, or drank his health in the first glass
after the cloth was removed, when he was invariably styled
Col. Van Valkenburgh, at full length; but Col. Follock was
quite content that his son and heir should know no more
than he knew himself, after making proper allowances for
the difference in years and experience. By the time I
returned
home, however, a material change had been made
in the school. Mr. Worden fell heir to a moderate
competency
at home, and he gave up teaching, a business he had
never liked, accordingly. It was even thought he was a
shade less zealous in his parochial duties, after the
acquisition
of this fifty pounds sterling a-year, than he had
previously
been; though I am far from insisting on the fact's
being so. At any rate, it was not in the power of 50 per
annum to render Mr. Worden apathetic on the subject of the
church; for he continued a most zealous churchman down
to the hour of his death; and this was something, even
admitting
that he was not quite so zealous as a Christian.
The church being the repository of the faith, if not the faith
itself, it follows that its friends are akin to religion, though
not absolutely religious. I have always liked a man the
better for being what I call a sound, warm-hearted
churchman
,
though his habits may have been a little free.
It was necessary to supply the place left vacant by the
emigration of Mr. Worden, or to abandon a school that had
got to be the nucleus of knowledge in Westchester. There
was a natural desire, at first, to obtain another scholar from
home; but no such person offering, a Yale College graduate
was accepted, though not without sundry rebellions, and
plenty of distrust. The moment he appeared, Col. Follock,
and Major Nicholas Oothout, another respectable Dutch
neighbour, withdrew their sons; and from that hour Dirck
never went to school again. It is true, Westchester was
not properly a Dutch county, like Rockland, and Albany,
and Orange, and several others along the river; but it had
many respectable families in it, of that extraction, without
alluding to such heavy people as the Van Cortlands, Felipses,
Beekmans, and two or three others of that stamp. Most of
our important county families had a different origin, as in
the case of the Morrises, of Morrisania, and of the Manor of
Fordham, the Pells, of Pelham, the Heathcotes, of
Mamanneck
,
the branch of the de Lanceys, at West Farms, the
Jays, of Rye, &c., &c. All these came of the English, or
the Huguenot stock. Among these last, more or less Dutch
blood was to be found, however; though Dutch prejudices
were a good deal weakened. Although few of these persons
sent their boys to this school, they were consulted in the
selection of a master; and I have always supposed that
their indifference was the cause that the county finally
obtained
the services of a Yankee, from Yale.
The name of the new pedagogue was Jason Newcome,
or, as he pronounced the latter appellation himself,
Noocome
.
As he affected a pedantic way of pronouncing the
last syllable long, or as it was spelt, he rather called
himself
Noo-comb, instead of Newcm, as is the English mode,
whence he soon got the nick-name of Jason Old Comb
among the boys; the lank, orderly arrangement of his
jetblack
,
and somewhat greasy-looking locks, contributing
their share towards procuring for him the
sobriquet
, as I
believe the French call it. As this Mr. Newcome will have
a material part to play in the succeeding portions of this
narrative, it may be well to be a little more minute in his
description.
I found Jason fully established in the school, on my
return
from college. I remember we met very much like
two strange birds, that see each other for the first time on
the same dunghill; or two quardrupeds, in their original
interview
in a common herd. It was New Haven against
Newark; though the institution, after making as many
migrations
as the House of Loretto, finally settled down at
Princeton, a short time before I took my degree. I was
consequently entitled to call myself a graduate of Newark,
a sort of scholar that is quite as great a curiosity in the country
as a Queen Anne's farthing, or a book printed in the fifteenth
century. I remember the first evening we two spent in
company, as well as if the meeting occurred only last night.
It was at Satanstoe, and Mr. Worden was present. Jason
had a liberal supply of puritanical notions, which were bred
in-and-in in his moral, and I had almost said, in his physical
system; nevertheless, he could unbend; and I did not fail
to observe that very evening, a gleam of covert enjoyment
on his sombre countenance, as the hot-stuff, the cards, and
the pipes were produced, an hour or two before supper,a
meal we always had hot and comfortable. This covert
satisfaction, however, was not exhibited without certain
misgiving looks, as if the neophyte in these innocent
enjoyments
distrusted his right to possess his share. I
remember
in particular, when my mother laid two or three
new, clean packs of cards on the table, that Jason cast a
stealthy glance over his shoulder, as if to make certain that
the act was not noted by the minister, or the neighbours.
The neighbours!  what a contemptible being a man
becomes
,
who lives in constant dread of the comments and
judgments of these social supervisors! and what a wretch,
the habit of deferring to no principle better than their
decision
has made many a being, who has had originally the
materials of something better in him, than has been
developed
by the
surveillance
of ignorance, envy, vulgarity,
gossiping and lying! In those cases in which education,
social position, opportunities and experience have made any
material difference between the parties, the man who yields
to such a government, exhibits the picture of a giant held
in bondage by a pigmy. I have always remarked, too, that
they who are best qualified to sit in this
neighbourhood-tribunal
,
generally keep most aloof from it, as repugnant to
their tastes and habits, thus leaving its decisions to the
portion
of the community least qualified to make such as are
either just or enlightened.
I felt a disposition to laugh outright, at the manner in
which Jason betrayed a sneaking consciousness of crime,
as he saw my meek, innocent, simple-minded, just and
warm-hearted mother lay the cards on the table that
evening
.
His sense of guilt was purely conventional, while
my mother's sense of innocence existed in the absence of
false instruction, and in the purity of her intentions. One
had been taught no exaggerated and false notion of sin,
nay, a notion that is impious, as it is clearly impious in
man to torture acts that are perfectly innocent,
per se
, into
formal transgressions of the law of God,while the other had
been educated under the narrow and exaggerated notions
of a provincial sect, and had obtained a species of
conscience
that was purely dependent on his miserable
schooling
.
I heard my grandfather say that Jason actually showed
the white of his eyes the first time he saw Mr. Worden
begin to deal, and he still looked, the whole time we were
at whist, as if he expected some one might enter, and tell
of his delinquency. I soon discovered that Jason had
a much greater dread of being told of, than of doing such
things as taking a hand at whist, or drinking a glass of
punch, from which I inferred his true conscience drew
perceptible
distinctions between the acts and the penalties he
had been accustomed to see inflicted on them. He was
much disposed to a certain sort of frailty; but it was a
sneaking disposition to the last.
But, the amusing part of the exhibition, that first evening
of our acquaintance, was Mr. Worden's showing off his
successor's familiarity with the classics. Jason had not the
smallest notion of quantity; and he pronounced the Latin
very much as one would read Mohawk, from a vocabulary
made out by a hunter, or a savant of the French Academy.
As I had received the benefit of Mr. Worden's own
instruction
,
I could do better, and, generally, my knowledge of the
classics went beyond that of Jason's. The latter's English,
too, was long a source of amusement with us all, though my
grandfather often expressed strong disgust at it. Even Col.
Follock did not scruple to laugh at Newcome's English,
which, as he frequently took occasion to say, hat a ferry
remarkaple sount to it. As this peculiarity of Jason's
extended
a good way into the Anglo-Saxon race, in the part
of the country in which he was born, it may be well to
explain what I mean a little more at large.
Jason was the son of an ordinary Connecticut farmer, of
the usual associations, and with no other pretension to
education
than such as was obtained in a common school, or any
reading which did not include the Scriptures, some
half-dozen
volumes of sermons and polemical works, all the
latter of which were vigorously as well as narrowly one-sided,
and a few books that had been expressly written to praise
New England, and to undervalue all the rest of the earth.
As the family knew nothing of the world beyond the limits
of its own township, and an occasional visit to Hartford, on
what is called election-day, Jason's early life was
necessarily
of the most contracted experience. His English, as
a matter of course, was just that of his neighbourhood and
class of life; which was far from being either very elegant
or very Doric. But on this rustic, provincial, or rather,
hamlet foundation, Jason had reared a superstructure of
New Haven finish and proportions. As he kept school
before he went to college, while he was in college, and after
he left college, the whole energies of his nature became
strangely directed to just such reforms of language as would
be apt to strike the imagination of a pedagogue of his
calibre
.
In the first place, he had brought from home with
him a great number of sounds that were decidedly vulgar
and vicious, and with these in full existence in himself, he
had commenced his system of reform on other people. As
is common with all tyros, he fancied a very little knowledge
sufficient authority for very great theories. His first step
was to improve the language, by adapting sound to spelling;
and he insisted on calling angel,
an
-gel, because a-n spelt
an; chamber,
cham
-ber, for the same reason; and so on
through a long catalogue of similarly constructed words.
English, he did not pronounce as
Ing
lish, but as
Eng
lish, for instance; and nothing (anglic
nuth
ing), as
noth
-ing; or, perhaps, it were better to say
naw
thin'.
While Jason showed himself so much of a purist with these
and many other words, he was guilty of some of the grossest
possible mistakes, that were directly in opposition to his own
theory. Thus, while he affectedly pronounced none,
(nun,) as known, he did not scruple to call stone,
stun, and home, hum. The idea of pronouncing
clerk, as it should be, or clark, greatly shocked him,
as it did to call hearth, h'arth; though he did not hesitate
to call this good earth of ours, the 'arth. Been, he
pronounced ben, of course, and roof, he called ruff,
in spite of all his purism.
From the foregoing specimens, half a dozen among a
thousand, the reader will get an accurate notion of this
weakness in Jason's character. It was heightened by the
fact that the young man commenced his education, such as
it was, late in life, and it is rare indeed that either
knowledge
or tastes thus acquired are entirely free from
exaggeration
.
Though Jason was several years my senior, like
myself he was a recent graduate, and it will be easy
enough to imagine the numberless discussions that took
place between us, on the subject of our respective
acquisitions
.
I say `respective,' instead of mutual acquisitions,
because there was nothing mutual about it, or
them
. Neither
our classics, our philosophy, nor our mathematics would
seem to have been the same, but each man apparently had
a science, or a language of his own, and which had been
derived from the institution where he had been taught. In
the classics I was much the strongest, particularly in the
quantities, but Jason had the best of it in mathematics. In
spite of his conceit, his vulgarity, his English, his
provincialism
,
and the awkwardness with which he wore his
tardily
acquired information, this man had strong points about
him, and a native shrewdness that would have told much
more in his favour had it not been accompanied by a
certain
evasive manner, that caused one constantly to suspect
his sincerity, and which often induced those who were
accustomed
to him, to imagine he had a sneaking propensity
that rendered him habitually hypocritical. Jason held New
York in great contempt; a feeling he was not always
disposed
to conceal, and of necessity his comparisons were
usually made with the state of things in Connecticut, and
much to the advantage of the latter. To one thing,
however
,
he was much disposed to defer, and that was money.
Connecticut had not then, nor has it now, a single
individual
who would be termed rich in New York; and Jason,
spite of his provincial conceit, spite of his overweening
notions
of moral and intellectual superiority, could no more
prevent this profound deference for wealth, than he could
substitute for a childhood of vulgarity and neglect, the grace,
refinement and knowledge which the boys of the more
fortunate
classes in life obtain as it might be without knowing
it. Yes, Jason bowed down to the golden calf, in spite of
his puritanism, his love of liberty, his pretension to equality
and the general strut of his disposition and manner.
Such is an outline of the character and qualifications of the
man whom I found, on my return from college, at the head
of Mr. Worden's school. We soon became acquainted, and
I do not know which got the most ideas from the other, in
course of the first fortnight. Our conversation and
arguments
were free, almost to rudeness, and little mercy was
shown to our respective prejudices. Jason was ultra
leveling
in his notions of social intercourse, while I had the
opinions of my own colony, in which the distinctions of
classes are far more strongly marked than is usual in New
England, out of Boston, and its immediate association. Still
Jason deferred to names, as well as money, though it was
in a way very different from my own. New England was,
and is, loyal to the crown; but having the right to name
many of its own governors, and possessing many other
political privileges through the charters that were granted to
her people, in order to induce them to settle that portion of
the continent, they do not always manifest the feeling in a
way to be agreeable to those who have a proper reverence
for the crown. Among other points, growing out of this
difference in training, Jason and I had sundry arguments on
the subject of professions, trades and callings. It was
evident
he fancied the occupation of a schoolmaster next in
honour to that of a clergyman. The clergy formed a
species
of aristocracy, according to his notions; but no man
could commence life under more favourable auspices, than
by taking a school. The following dialogue occurred
between
us, on this subject; and I was so much struck with
the novelty of my companion's notions, as to make a note of
it, as soon as we parted.
I wonder your folks don't think of giving you suthin'
to do, Corny, commenced Jason, one day, after our
acquaintance
had ripened into a sort of belligerent intimacy.
You 're near nineteen, now, and ought to begin to think
of bringing suthin' in, to pay for all the outgoin's.
By your folks, Jason meant the family of Littlepage;
and the blood of that family quickened a little within me,
at the idea of being profitably employed, in the manner
intimated
,
because I had reached the mature and profitable
age of nineteen.
I do not understand you exactly, Mr. Newcome, by
your bringing something in, answered I, with dignity
enough to put a man of ordinary delicacy on his guard.
Bringing suthin' in is good English, I hope, Mr.
Littlepage
.
I mean that your edication has cost your folks
enough to warrant them in calling on you for a little
interest
.
How much do you suppose, now, has been spent on
your edication, beginning at the time you first went to Mr.
Worden, and leaving off the day you quitted Newark?
Really, I have not the smallest notion; the subject has
never crossed my mind.
Did the old folks never say anything to you about it?
never foot up the total?
I am sure it is not easy to see how this could be done,
for I could not help them in the least.
But your father's books would tell that, as doubtless it
all stands charged against you.
Stands charged against me!How, sir! do you imagine
my father makes a charge in a book against me, whenever
he pays a few pounds for my education?
Certainly; how else could he tell how much you have
had?though, on reflection, as you are an only child, it
does not make so much difference. You probably will get
all, in the end.
And had I a brother, or a sister, do you imagine, Mr.
Newcome, each shilling we spent would be set down in a
book, as charges against us?
How else, in natur', could it be known which had had
the most, or any sort of justice be done between you?
Justice would be done, by our common father's giving
to each just as much of his own money as he might see fit.
Vol. I.5
What is it to me, if he chose to give my brother a few
hundred
pounds more than he chose to give to me? The money
is his, and he may do with it as he choose.
An hundred pounds is an awful sight of money!
exclaimed
Jason, betraying by his countenance how deeply he
felt the truth of this. If you have had money in such
large sums, so much the more reason why you should set
about doing suthin' to repay the old gentleman. Why not
set up a school?
Sir!
Why not set up a school, I say? You might have had
this of mine, had you been a little older; but once in, fast
in, with me. Still, schools are wanted, and you might get
a tolerable good recommend. I dare say your tutor would
furnish a certificate.
This word recommend was used by Jason for
recommendation
;
the habit of putting verbs in the places of
substantives
,
and
vice versa,
being much in vogue with him.
And do you really think that one who is destined to
inherit Satanstoe, would act advisedly to set up a school?
Recollect, Mr. Newcome, that my father and grandfather
have both borne the king's commission; and that the last
bears it, at this very moment, through his representative, the
Governor.
What of all that? What better business is there than
keeping a good school? If you are high in your notions,
get to be made a tutor in that New Jersey college.
Recollect
that a tutor in a college is somebody. I did hope for
such a place, but having a Governor's son against me, as a
candidate, there was no chance.
A Governor's son a candidate for a tutorship in a
college
!
You are pleased to trifle with me, Mr. Newcome.
It's true as the gospel. You thought some smaller fish
put me down, but he was the son of the Governor. But,
why do you give that vulgar name to your father's farm
Satanstoe is not decent; yet, Corny, I've heard you use
it before your own mother!
That you may hear every day, and my mother use it,
too, before her own son. What fault do you find with the
name of Satanstoe?
Fault!In the first place it is irreligious and profane;
then it is ungenteel and vulgar, and only fit to be used in
low company. Moreover, it is opposed to history and
revelation, the Evil One having a huff, if you will, but no
toes. Such a name couldn't stand a fortnight before public
opinion in New England.
Yes, that may be very true; but we do not care
enough for His Satanic Majesty in the colony of New York,
to treat him with so much deference. As for the `huffs,'
as you call them
Why, what do
you
call 'em, Mr. Littlepage?
Hoofs, Mr. Newcome; that is the New York
pronunciation
of the word.
I care nothing for York pronunciation, which
everybody
knows is Dutch and full of corruptions. You 'll never
do anything worth speaking of in this colony, Corny, until
you pay more attention to your schools.
I do not know what you call attention, Mr. Jason, unless
we have paid it already. Here, I have the caption, or
rather preamble of a law, on that very subject, that I copied
out of the statute-book on purpose to show you, and which
I will now read in order to prove to you how things really
stand in the colony.
Read away, rejoined Jason, with an air of sufficient
disdain.
Read I did, and in the following sententious and
comprehensive
language, viz:Whereas the youth of this colony
are found, by manifold experience, to be not inferior in
their natural geniuses to the youth of any other country in
the world, therefore be it enacted, &c.
[7]
[7]
This quotation would seem to be accurate, and it is somewhat
curious to trace the reason why a preamble so singular should have
been prefixed to the law. Was it not owing to the oft-repeated and
bold assertions of Europeans, that man deteriorated in this hemisphere?
Any American who has been a near observer of European opinion,
even in our day, must have been frequently amused at the expression
of surprise and doubt that so often escapes the residents of the Old
World, when they discover anything that particularly denotes talent
coming from the New. I make little question that this extraordinary
preamble is a sort of indirect answer to an imputation that was
known to be as general, in that age, as it was felt to be unjust. My
own experience would lead me to think native capacity more
abundant
in America than in the midland countries of Europe, and quite
as frequently met with as in Italy itself; and I have often heard
teachers, both English and French, admit that their American and
West-India scholars were generally the readiest and cleverest in their
schools. The great evil under which this country labours, in this
respect, is the sway of numbers, which is constantly elevating
mediocrity
and spurious talent to high places. In America we have a
higher average
of intelligence, while we have far less of the
higher
class;
and I attribute the latter fact to the control of those who have
never enjoyed the means of appreciating excellence.
Editor
.
There, sir, I said in exultation, you have chapter
and verse for the true character of the rising generation in
the colony of New York.
And what does that preamble lead to? demanded
Jason, a little staggered at finding the equality of our New
York intellects established so clearly by legislative
enactment
.
It is the preamble to an act establishing the free schools
of New York, in which the learned languages have now
been taught these twenty years; and you will please to
remember
that another law has not long been passed
establishing
a college in town.
Well, curious laws sometimes do get into the
statute-books
,
and a body must take them as he finds them. I
dare say Connecticut might have a word to say on the same
subject, if you would give her a chance. Have you heard
the wonderful news from Philadelphia, Corny, that has just
come among us?
I have heard nothing of late; for you know I have
been over in Rockland, with Dirck Follock, for the last two
weeks, and news never reaches that family, or indeed that
county.
No, that is true enough, answered Jason, drily; News
and a Dutchman have no affinity, or attraction, as we would
say in philosophy; though there is gravitation enough on
one side, ha! boy?
Here Jason laughed outright, for he was always delighted
whenever he could get a side-hit at the children of Holland,
whom he appeared to regard as a race occupying a position
between the human family and the highest class of the
unintellectual animals. But it is unnecessary to dwell
longer on this dialogue, my object being merely to show the
general character of Jason's train of thought, in order to
be better understood when I come to connect his opinions
with his acts.
Dirck and myself were much together after my return
from college. I passed weeks at a time with him, and he
returned my visits with the utmost freedom and good-will.
Each of us had now got his growth, and it would have
done the heart of Frederick of Prussia good, to have seen
my young friend after he had ended his nineteenth year.
In stature he measured exactly six feet three, and he gave
every promise of filling up in proportion. Dirck was none
of your roundly-turned, Apollo-built fellows, but he had
shoulders that his little, short, solid, but dumpy-looking
mother, who was of the true stock, could scarcely span,
when she pulled his head down to give him a kiss; which
she did regularly, as Dirck told me himself, twice each
year; that is to say, Christmas and New-Year. His
complexion
was fair, his limbs large and well proportioned, his
hair light, his eyes blue, and his face would have been
thought handsome by most persons. I will not deny,
however
,
that there was a certain ponderosity, both of mind and
body, about my friend, that did not very well accord with
the general notion of grace and animation. Nevertheless,
Dirck was a sterling fellow, as true as steel, as brave as a
game-cock, and as honest as noon-day light.
Jason was a very different sort of person, in many
essentials
.
In figure, he was also tall, but he was angular,
loose-jointed
and swingingslouching would be the better word,
perhaps. Still, he was not without strength, having worked
on a farm until he was near twenty; and he was as active
as a cat; a result that took the stranger a little by surprise,
when he regarded only his loose, quavering sort of build.
In the way of thought, Jason would think two feet to Dirck's
one; but I am far from certain that it was always in so
correct a direction. Give the Dutchman time, he was very
apt to come out right; whereas Jason, I soon discovered,
was quite liable to come to wrong conclusions, and
particularly
so in all matters that were a little adverse, and which
affected his own apparent interests. Dirck, moreover, was
one of the best-natured fellows that breathed; it being almost
impossible to excite him to anger; when it did come,
however
,
the earthquake was scarcely more terrific. I have
5 *
seen him enraged, and would as soon encounter a wild-boar,
in an open field, as run against his course, while in the fit.
Modesty will hardly permit me to say much of myself.
I was well-grown, active, strong, for my years; and, I am
inclined to think, reasonably well-looking; though I would
prefer that this much should be said by any one but myself.
Dirck and I often tried our manhood together, when
youngsters
,
and I was the better chap until my friend reached his
eighteenth year, when the heavy metal of the young Dutch
giant told in our struggles. After that period was past, I
found Dirck too much for me, in a close gripe, though my
extraordinary activity rendered the inequality less apparent
than it might otherwise have proved. I ought not to apply
the term of extraordinary to anything about myself, but
the word escaped me unconsciously, and I shall let it stand.
One thing I will say, notwithstanding, let the reader think
of it as he may: I was good-natured and well-disposed to
my fellow-creatures, and had no greater love of money than
was necessary to render me reasonably discreet.
Such is an outline of the characters and persons of three
of the principal actors in the scenes I am about to relate;
scenes that will possess some interest for those who love to
read accounts of adventures in a new country, however
much they may fail in interesting others, when I speak of
the condition and events of the more civilized condition of
society, that was enjoyed, even in my youth, in such old
counties as Westchester, and such towns as York.
CHAPTER IV.
Let us, then, be up and doing,
With a heart for any fate;
Still achieving, still pursuing,
Learn to labour and to wait.
Longfellow
.
The
spring of the year I was twenty, Dirck and myself
paid our first visit to town, in the characters of young men.
Although Satanstoe was not more than five-and-twenty
miles from New York, by the way of King's-Bridge, the
road we always travelled in order to avoid the ferry, it was
by no means as common to visit the capital as it has since
got to be. I know gentlemen who pass in and out from
our neighbourhood, now, as often as once a fortnight, or
even once a week; but thirty years since this was a thing
very seldom done. My dear mother always went to town
twice a year; in the spring to pass Easter week, and in the
autumn to make her winter purchases. My father usually
went down four times, in the course of the twelve months,
but he had the reputation of a gadabout, and was thought
by many people to leave home quite as much as he ought
to do. As for my grandfather, old age coming on, he
seldom
left home now, unless it were to pay stated visits to
certain old brother campaigners who lived within moderate
distances, and with whom he invariably passed weeks each
summer.
The visit I have mentioned occurred some time after
Easter, a season of the year that many of our country
families
were in the habit of passing in town, to have the
benefit of the daily services of Old Trinity, as the Hebrews
resorted to Jerusalem to keep the feast of the passover. My
mother did not go to town this year, on account of my
father's gout, and I was sent to supply her place with my
aunt Legge, who had been so long accustomed to have one
of the family with her at that season, that I was substituted.
Dirck had relatives of his own, with whom he staid, and
thus every thing was rendered smooth. In order to make a
fair start, my friend crossed the Hudson the week before,
and, after taking breath at Satanstoe for three days, we left
the Neck for the capital, mounted on a pair of as good
roadsters as were to be found in the county: and that is
saying a good deal; for the Morrises, and de Lanceys, and
Van Cortlandts all kept racers, and sometimes gave us good
sport, in the autumn, over the county course. West
Chester
,
to say no more than she deserved, was a county with
a spirited gentry, and one of which no colony need be
ashamed.
My mother was a tender-hearted parent, and full of
anxiety in behalf of an only child. She knew that
travelling
always has more or less of hazard, and was desirous
we should be off betimes, in order to make certain of our
reaching town before the night set in. Highway robbers,
Heaven be praised! were then, and are still, unknown to
the colonies; but there were other dangers that gave my
excellent parent much concern. All the bridges were not
considered safe; the roads were, and are yet, very circuitous,
and it was possible to lose one's way; while it was said
persons had been known to pass the night on Harlem
common
,
an uninhabited waste that lies some seven or eight
miles on our side of the city. My mother's first care,
therefore
,
was to get Dirck and myself off early in the morning;
in order to do which she rose with the light, gave us our
breakfasts immediately afterwards, and thus enabled us to
quit Satanstoe just as the sun had burnished the eastern sky
with its tints of flame-colour.
Dirck was in high good-humour that morning, and, to
own the truth, Corny did not feel the depression of spirits
which, according to the laws of propriety, possibly ought to
have attended the first really free departure of so youthful
an adventurer from beneath the shadows of the paternal
roof. We went our way laughing and chatting like two
girls just broke loose from boarding-school. I had never
known Dirck more communicative, and I got certain new
insights into his feelings, expectations and prospects, as we
rode along the colony's highway that morning, that
afterwards
proved to be matters of much interest with us both.
We had not got a mile from the chimney-tops of Satanstoe,
ere my friend broke forth as follows:
I suppose you have heard, Corny, what the two old
gentlemen have been at, lately?
Your father and mine?I have not heard a syllable of
any thing new.
They have been suing out, before the Governor and
Council, a joint claim to that tract of land they bought of the
Mohawks, the last time they were out together on service,
in the colony militia.
I ought to mention, here, that though my predecessors
had made but few campaigns in the regular army, each had
made several in the more humble capacity of a militia
officer.
This is news to me, Dirck, I answered. Why
should the old gentlemen have been so sly about such a
thing?
I cannot tell you, lest they thought silence the best way
to keep off the yankees. You know, my father has a
great dread of a yankee's getting a finger into any of his
bargains. He says the yankees are the locusts of the west.
But, how came you to know any thing about it, Dirck?
I am no yankee, Corny.
And your father told
you
, on the strength of this
recommendation
?
He told me, as he tells me most things that he thinks it
best I should know. We smoke together, and then we talk
together.
I would learn to smoke too, if I thought I should get
any useful information by so doing.
Dere is much to be l'arnt from ter pipe! said Dirck,
dropping into a slightly Dutch accent, as frequently
happened
with him, when his mind took a secret direction
towards
Holland, though in general he spoke English quite as
well as I did myself, and vastly better than that miracle of
taste, and learning, and virtue, and piety, Mr. Jason
Newcome
,
A. B., of Yale, and prospective president of that, or
some other institution.
So it would seem, if your father is telling you secrets
all the time you are smoking together. But where is this
land, Dirck?
It is in the Mohawk countryor, rather, it is in the
country near the Hampshire Grants, and at no great
distance
from the Mohawk country.
And how much may there be of it?
Forty thousand acres; and some of it of good, rich
flats, they say; such as a Dutchman loves.
And your father and mine have purchased all this land
in company, you sayshare and share alike, as the
lawyers
call it.
Just so.
Pray how much did they pay for so large a tract of
land?
Dirck took time to answer this question. He first drew
from his breast a pocket-book, which he opened as well as
he could under the motion of his roadster, for neither of us
abated his speed, it being indispensable to reach town before
dark. My friend succeeded at length in putting his hand on
the paper he wanted, which he gave to me.
There, he said; that is a list of the articles paid to
the Indians, which I have copied, and then there have been
several hundred pounds of fees paid to the Governor and
his officers.
I read from the list, as follows; the words coming out by
jerks, as the trotting of my horse permitted. Fifty blankets,
each with yellow strings and yellow trimmings; ten iron
pots, four gallons each; forty pounds of gunpowder; seven
muskets; twelve pounds of small beads; ten strings of
wampum
;
fifty gallons of rum, pure Jamaica, and of high proof;
a score of jews-harps, and three dozen first quality
English-made
tomahawks.
Well, Dirck, I cried, as soon as through reading,
this is no great matter to give for forty thousand acres
of land, in the colony of New York. I dare say a hundred
pounds currency ($250) would buy every thing here, even
to the rum and the first quality of English-made
tomahawks
.
Ninety-six pounds, thirteen shillings, seven pence `t'ree
fart'in's' was the footing of the whole bill, answered Dirck
deliberately, preparing to light his pipe; for he could smoke
very conveniently while trotting no faster than at the rate
of six miles the hour.
I do not find that dear for forty thousand acres; I suppose
the muskets, and rum, and other things were manufactured
expressly for the Indian trade.
Not they, Corny: you know how it is with the old
gentlemen
;they
are as honest as the day.
So much the better for them, and so much the better
for us! But what is to be done with this land, now they
own it?
Dirck did not answer, until we had trotted twenty rods;
for by this time the pipe was at work, and the moment the
smoke was seen he kept his eye on it, until he saw a bright
light in front of his nose.
The first thing will be to find it, Corny. When a patent
is signed and delivered, then you must send forth some
proper person to find the land it covers. I have heard of a
gentleman who got a grant of ten thousand acres, five years
since; and though he has had a hunt for it every summer
since, he has not been able to find it yet. To be sure, ten
thousand acres is a small object to look for, in the woods.
And our fathers intend to find this land as soon as the
season opens?
Not so fast, Corny; not so fast! That was the scheme
of your father's Welsh blood, but mine takes matters more
deliberately. Let us wait until next year, he said, and then
we can send the boys. By that time, too, the war will take
some sort of a shape, and we shall know better how to care
for the children. The subject has been fairly talked over
between the two patentees, and we are to go early
next
spring, not this.
The idea of land-hunting was not in the least
disagreeable
to me; nor was it unpleasant to think that I stood in
reversion, or as heir, to twenty thousand acres of land, in
addition to those of Satanstoe. Dirck and I talked the
matter over, as we trotted on, until both of us began to
regret
that the expedition was so far in perspective.
The war to which Dirck alluded, had broken out a few
months before our visit to town: a Mr. Washington, of
Virginia
the
same who has since become so celebrated as the
Col. Washington of Braddock's defeat, and other events at
the southhaving been captured, with a party of his men,
in a small work thrown up in the neighbourhood of the
French, somewhere on the tributaries of the Ohio; a river
that is known to run into the Mississippi, a vast distance to
the west. I knew very little then, nor do I know much now
of these remote regions, beyond the fact that there are such
places, and that they are sometimes visited by detachments,
war-parties, hunters, and other adventurers from the
colonies
.
To me, it seems scarce worth fighting about such
distant and wild territory; for ages and ages must elapse
before it can be of any service for the purposes of
civilization
.
Both Dirck and myself regretted that the summer
would be likely to go by without our seeing the enemy; for
we came of families that were commonly employed on such
occasions. We thought both our fathers might be out; though
even that was a point that still remained under discussion.
We dined and baited at Kingsbridge, intending to sup in
town. While the dinner was cooking, Dirck and I walked
out on the heights that overlook the Hudson; for I knew
less of this noble river than I wished to know of it. We
conversed as we walked; and my companion, who knew
the river much better than myself, having many occasions
to pass up and down it, between the village of Haverstraw
and town, in his frequent visits to his relatives below, gave
me some useful information.
Look here, Corny, said Dirck, after betraying a good
deal of desire to obtain a view of some object in the distance,
along the river-side; Look here, Corny, do you see yonder
house, in the little bay below us, with the lawn that extends
down to the water, and that noble orchard behind it?
I saw the object to which Dirck alluded. It was a house
that stood near the river, but sheltered and secluded, with
the lawn and orchard as described; though at the distance
of some two or three miles all the beauties of the spot could
not be discovered, and many of them had to be received on
the faith of my companion's admiration. Still I saw very
plainly, all the principal objects named; and, among others,
the house, the orchard, and the lawn. The building was of
stoneas is common with most of the better sort of houses in
the countrywas long, irregular, and had that air of solid
comfort about it, which it is usual to see in buildings of that
description. The walls were not whitewashed, according to
the lively tastes of our Dutch fellow-colonists, who appear
to expend all their vivacity in the pipe and the brush, but
were left in their native grey; a circumstance that rendered
the form and dimensions of the structure a little less distinct,
at a first glance, than they might otherwise have proved.
As I gazed at the spot, however, I began to fancy it a charm,
to find the picture thus sobered down; and found a pleasure
in drawing the different angles, and walls, and chimneys,
and roofs, from this back-ground, by means of the organ of
sight. On the whole, I thought the little sequestered bay,
the wooded and rocky shores, the small but well distributed
lawn, the orchard, with all the other similar accessories,
formed together one of the prettiest places of the sort I had
ever seen. Thinking so, I was not slow in saying as much to
my companion. I was thought to have some taste in these
matters, and had been consulted on the subject of laying
out grounds by one or two neighbours in the county.
Whose house is it, Dirck? I enquired; and how
came you to know anything about it?
That is Lilacsbush, answered my friend; and it
belongs
to my mother's cousin, Herman Mordaunt.
I had heard of Herman, or, as it is pronounced, Harman
Mordaunt. He was a man of considerable note in the
colony, having been the son of a Major Mordaunt, of the
British army, who had married the heiress of a wealthy
Dutch merchant, whence the name of Herman; which had
descended to the son along with the money. The Dutch
were so fond of their own blood, that they never failed to give
this Mr. Mordaunt his Christian name; and he was usually
known in the colony as Herman Mordaunt. Further than
this, I knew little of the gentleman, unless it might be that
he was reputed rich, and was admitted to be in the best
society, though not actually belonging to the territorial or
political aristocracy of the colony.
As Herman Mordaunt is your mother's cousin, I
suppose
,
Dirck, I resumed, that you have been at
Lilacsbush
,
and ascertained whether the inside of the house is as
pleasant and respectable as the outside.
Often, Corny; while Madam Mordaunt lived, my
mother
and I used to go there every summer. The poor lady
is now dead, but I go there still.
Why did you not ride on as far as Lilacsbush, and levy
a dinner on your relations? I should think Herman
Mordaunt
would feel hurt, were he to learn that an acquaintance,
or a relation, had put up at an inn, within a couple of miles
of his own house. I dare say he knows both Major and
Capt. Littlepage, and I protest I shall feel it necessary to
send him a note of apology for not calling. These
things ought not to be done, Dirck, among persons of a
certain stamp, and who are supposed to know what is
proper.
This would be all right enough, Corny, had Herman
Mordaunt, or his daughter, been at Lilacsbush; but they
live in Crown Street, in town, in winter, and never come out
here until after the Pinkster holidays, let
them
come when
they may.
Vol. I.  6
Oh! he is as great a man as that, is he?  a town and
country house; after all, I do not know whether it would
do to be quite so free with one of his standing, as to go to
dine with him without sending notice.
Nonsense, Corny. Who hesitates about stopping at a
gentleman's door, when he is travelling? Herman
Mordaunt
would have given us a hearty welcome, and I should
have gone on to Lilacsbush, did I not know that the family
is certain to be in town at this season. Easter came early
this year, and to-morrow will be the first day of the
Pinkster
holidays. As soon as they are over, Herman
Mordaunt
and Anneke will be out here to enjoy their lilacs and
roses.
Oh, ho! there is an Anneke, as well as the old
gentleman
.
Pray, how old may Miss Anneke be, Master
Dirck?
As this question was asked, I turned to look my friend in
the face, and I found that his handsome, smooth, fair Dutch
lineaments were covered with a glow of red, that it was not
usual to see extended so far from his ruddy cheeks. Dirck
was too much of a man, however, to turn away, or to try to
hide blushes so ingenuous; but he answered stoutly
My cousin, Anneke Mordaunt, is just turned of
seventeen
;
and, I 'll tell you what, Corny
Well  I am listening, with both ears, to hear your
what
Out with it, man; both ears are open.
Why, Anneke (On-na-
kay
), is one of the very prettiest
girls in the colony!  What is more, she is as sweet and
gootDirck grew Dutch, as he grew animatedas she
is pretty.
I was quite astounded at the energy and feeling with which
this was said. Dirck was such a matter-of-fact fellow, that
I had never dreamed he could be sensible to the passion of
love; nor had I ever paused to analyze the nature of our
own friendship. We liked each other, in the first place,
most probably, from habit; then, we were of characters so
essentially different, that our attachment was influenced by
that species of excitement which is the child of opposition.
As we grew older, Dirck's good qualities began to command
my respect, and reason entered more into my affection for
him. I was well convinced that my companion could, and
would, prove to be a warm friend; but the possibility of his
ever becoming a lover, had not before crossed my mind.
Even then, the impression made was not very deep or
lasting
,
though I well remember the sort of admiration and
wonder with which I gazed at his flushed cheek, animated
eye, and improved mien. For the moment, Dirck really
had a commanding and animated air.
Why, Anneke is one of the prettiest girls in the colony!
my friend had exclaimed.
And your cousin?
My second cousin.Her mother's father and my
mother's
mother were brother and sister.
In that case, I shall hope to have the honour of being
introduced, one of these days, to Miss Anneke Mordaunt,
who is just turned of seventeen, and is one of the prettiest
girls in the colony, and is as good as she is pretty.
I wish you to see her, Corny, and that before we go
home, Dirck replied, all his philosophy, or phlegm,
whichever
the philosophy of other people may term it, returning;
come; let us go back to the inn; our dinner will be
getting
cold.
I mused on my friend's unusual manner, as we walked
back towards the inn; but it was soon forgotten, in the
satisfaction produced by eating a good, substantial meal of
broiled ham, with hot potatoes, boiled eggs, a beefsteak,
done to a turn, with the accessions of pickles, cold-slaw,
apple-pie, and cider. This is a common New York tavern
dinner, for the wayfarer; and, I must say, I have got to
like it. Often have I enjoyed such a repast, after a sharp
forenoon's ride; ay, and enjoyed it more than I have
relished
entertainments at which have figured turkies, oysters,
hams, hashes, and other dishes, that have higher reputations.
Even turtle-soup, for which we are somewhat famous in
New York, has failed to give me the same delight.
Dirck, to do him justice, ate heartily; for it is not an easy
matter to take away his appetite. As usual, I did most of
the talking; and that was with our landlady, who, hearing
I was a son of her much-esteemed and constant customer,
Major Littlepage, presented herself with the dessert and
cheese, and did me the honour to commence a discourse.
Her name was Light; and light was she certain to cast on
everything she discussed; that is to say, innkeeper's light;
which partakes somewhat of the darkness that is so apt
to overshadow no small portion of the minds of her many
customers.
Pray, Mrs. Light, I asked, when there was an opening,
which was not until the good woman had exhausted her
breath in honour of the Littlepages, do you happen to
know anything of a family, hereabouts, of the name of
Mordaunt
?
Do I
happen
to know, sir!Why, Mr. Littlepage, you
might almost as well have asked me, if I had ever heard of
a Van Cortlandt, or a Philipse, or a Morris, or any other of
the gentry hereabouts. Mr. Mordaunt has a country-place,
and a very pretty one it is, within two miles and a half of
us; and he and Madame Mordaunt never passed our door,
when they went into the country to see Madame Van
Cortlandt
,
without stopping to say a word, and leave a shilling.
The poor lady is dead; but there is a young image of her
virtues, that is coming a'ter her, that will be likely to do
some damage in the colony. She is modesty itself, sir; so
I thought it could do her no harm, the last time she was
here, just to tell her, she ought to be locked up, for the
thefts she was likely to commit, if not for them she had
committed already. She blushed, sir, and looked for all the
world like the shell of the most delicate boiled lobster you
ever laid eyes on. She is truly a charming young lady!
Thefts of hearts, you mean of course, my good Mrs.
Light?
Of nothing else, sir; young ladies are apt to steal
hearts, you know. My word for it, Miss Anneke will turn
out a great robber, after her own fashion, you know, sir.
And whose hearts is she likely to run away with, pray?
I should be pleased to hear the names of some of the
sufferers
.
Lord, sir!she is too young to have done much
yet;
but wait a twelvemonth, and I'll answer the question.
I could see all this time that Dirck was uneasy, and had
some amusement in watching the workings of his
countenance
.
My malicious intentions, however, were suddenly
interrupted. As if to prevent further discourse, and, at the
same time, further
espionage
, my young friend rose from
table, ordering the horses and the bill.
During the ride to town, no more was said of Lilacsbush,
Herman Mordaunt, or his daughter Anneke. Dirck was
silent, but this was his habit after dinner, and I was kept a
good deal on the alert in order to find the road which
crossed the common, it being our desire to go in that
direction
.
It is true, we might have gone into town by the way
of Bloomingdale, Greenwich, the meadows and the Collect,
and so down past the common upon the head of Broadway;
but my mother had particularly desired we would fall into
the Bowery Lane, passing the seats that are to be found in
that quarter, and getting into Queen Street as soon as
possible
.
By taking this course she thought we should be less
likely to miss our way within the town itself, which is
certainly
full of narrow and intricate passages. My uncle
Legge had removed into Duke Street, in the vicinity of
Hanover Square; and Queen Street, I well knew, would lead
us directly to his door. Queen Street, indeed, is the great
artery of New York, through which most of its blood
circulates
.
It was drawing towards night when we trotted up to the
stable, where we left our horses, and obtaining a black to
shoulder our portmanteaus, we began to thread the mazes
of the capital on foot. New York was certainly, even in
1757, a wonderful place for commerce! Vessels began to
be seen some distance east of Fly Market, and there could
not have been fewer than twenty ships, brigs, and schooners,
lying in the East river, as we walked down Queen Street.
Of course I include all descriptions of vessels that go to
sea, in this estimate. At the present moment, it is probable
twice that number would be seen. There Dirck and I
stopped more than once, involuntarily, to gaze at the
exhibitions
of wealth and trade that offered themselves as we
went deeper into the town. My mother had particularly
cautioned me against falling into this evidence of country
habits, and I felt much ashamed at each occurrence of the
weakness; but I found it irresistible. At length my friend
and I parted; he to go to the residence of his aunt, while
I proceeded to that of mine. Before separating, however,
we agreed to meet next morning in the fields at the head of
6 *
Broadway, on the common, which, as it was understood,
was to be the scene of the Pinkster sports.
My reception in Duke Street was cordial, both on the
part of my uncle and on the part of my aunt; the first
being a good-hearted person, though a little too apt to run
into extravagance on the subject of the rights of the rabble.
I was pleased with the welcome I received, enjoyed an
excellent
hot supper, to which we sat down at half-past eight,
my aunt being fond of town hours, both dining and supping
a little later than my mother, as being more fashionable and
genteel.
[8]
[8]
The dinner of the last half century is, in one sense, but a
substitute
for the
petitis soupers
of the century or two that preceeded. It
is so entirely rational and natural, that the cultivated and refined
should meet for the purposes of social enjoyment after the business
of the day has terminated, that the supper has only given place to the
same meal under another name, and at hours little varying from those
of the past. The Parisian dines at half-past six, remaining at table
until eight. The Englishman, later in all his hours, and more
ponderous
in all his habits, sits down to table about the time the
Frenchman
gets up; quitting it between nine and ten. The Italian pays a
tribute to his climate, and has his early dinner and light supper, both
usually alone, the habits of the country carrying him to the opera
and the
conversazione
for social communion. But what is the
American
?
A jumble of the same senseless contradictions in his social
habits, as he is fast getting to be in his political creeds and political
practices; a being that is
in transitu
, pressed by circumstances on the
one side, and by the habit of imitation on the other; unwilling,
almost unable, to think and act for himself. The only American who
is temporarily independent in such things, is the unfledged provincial,
fresh from his village conceit and village practices, who, until corrected
by communion with the world, fancies the south-east corner of the
north-west parish, in the town of Hebron, in the county of Jericho,
and the State of Connecticut, to be the only portion of this globe
that is perfection. If he should happen to keep a school, or conduct
a newspaper, the community becomes, in a small degree, the
participant
of his rare advantages and vast experience!
Editor
.
As I was compelled to confess fatigue, after so
long a ride, as soon as we quitted the table I retired to my
own room.
The next day was the first of the three that are devoted
to Pinkster, the great Saturnalia of the New York blacks.
Although this festival is always kept with more vivacity at
Albany than in York, it is far from being neglected, even
now, in the latter place. I had told my aunt, before I left
her, I should not wait for breakfast, but should be up with
the sun, and off in quest of Dirck, in order that we might
enjoy a stroll along the wharves before it was time to repair
to the common, where the fun was to be seen. Accordingly
I got out of the house betimes, though it was an hour later
than I had intended; for I heard the rattling of cups in the
little parlour, the sign that the table was undergoing the
usual process of arrangement for breakfast. It then occurred
to me that most, if not all of the servants, seven in number,
would be permitted to enjoy the holiday; and that it might
be well if I took all my meals, that day, in the fields.
Running
back to the room, I communicated this intention to
Juno, the girl I found doing Pompey's work, and left the
house on a jump. There was no great occasion for
starving
,
I thought, in a town as large and as full of eatables as
New York; and the result fully justified this reasonable
opinion.
Just as I got into Hanover Square, I saw a grey-headed
negro, who was for turning a penny before he engaged in
the amusements of the day, carrying two pails that were
scoured to the neatness of Dutch fastidiousness, and which
were suspended from the yoke he had across his neck and
shoulders. He cried White winewhite wine! in a clear
sonours voice; and I was at his side in a moment. White
wine was, and is still, my delight of a morning; and I
bought a delicious draught of the purest and best of a
Communipaw
vintage, eating a cake at the same time. Thus
refreshed, I proceeded into the square, the beauty of which
had struck my fancy as I walked through it the previous
evening. To my surprise, whom should I find in the very
centre of Queen Street, gaping about him with a most
indomitable
Connecticut air, but Jason Newcome! A brief
explanation let me into the secret of his presence. His boys
had all gone home to enjoy the Pinkster holiday, with the
black servants of their respective families; and Jason had
seized the opportunity to pay his first visit to the great
capital
of the colony. He was on his travels, like myself.
And what has brought you down here? I demanded,
the pedagogue having already informed me that he had put
up at a tavern in the suburbs, where horse-keeping and
lodgings were reasonable. The Pinkster fields are up
near the head of Broadway, on the common.
So I hear, answered Jason; but I want to see a ship,
and all the sights this way, in the first place. It will be
time enough for Pinkster, two or three hours hence, if a
Christian ought even to look at such vanities. Can you tell
me where I am to find Hanover Square, Corny?
You are in it now, Mr. Newcome; and to my fancy, a
very noble area it is!
This
Hanover Square! repeated Jason. Why, its
shape is not that of a square at all; is is nearer a
triangle
.
What of that, sir? By a square in a town, one does
not necessarily understand an area with four equal sides
and as many right angles, but an open space that is left for
air and beauty. There are air and beauty enough to satisfy
any reasonable man. A square may be a parallelogram,
or a triangle, or any other shape one pleases.
This, then, is Hanover Square!a New York square,
or a Nassau Hall square, Corny; but not a Yale College
square, take my word for it. It is so small, moreover!
Small!the width of the street at the widest end must
be near a hundred feet; I grant you it is not half that at
the other end, but that is owing to the proximity of the
houses.
Ay, it is all owing to the proximity of the houses, as
you call it. Now, according to my notion, Hanover Square,
of which a body hears so much talk in the country, ought
to have had fifty or sixty acres in it, and statues of the
whole House of Brunswick, besides. Why is that nest of
houses left in the middle of your square?
It is not, sir. The square ceases when it reaches
them
.
They are too valuable to be torn down, although there has
been some talk of it. My uncle Legge told me, last evening,
that those houses have been valued as high as twelve
thousand
dollars; and some persons put them as high as six
thousand pounds.
This reconciled Jason to the houses; for he never failed
to defer to money, come in what shape it would. It was
the only source of human distinction that he could clearly
comprehend, though he had some faint impressions touching
the dignity of the crown, and the respect due to its
representatives
.
Corny, said Jason, in an under tone, and taking me
by the arm to lead me aside, though no one was near, like
a man who has a great secret to ask, or to communicate,
what was that I saw you taking for your bitters, a little
while ago?
Bitters! I do not understand you, Jason. Nothing
bitter have I tasted to-day; nor can I say I have any great
wish to put anything bitter into my mouth.
Why, the draught you got from the nigger who is now
coming back across the square, as you call it, and which
you seemed to enj'y particularly. I am dry, myself, and
should wonderfully like a drink.
Oh! that fellow sells `white wine,' and you will find it
delicious. If you want your `bitters,' as you call them,
you cannot do better than stop him, and give him a penny.
Will he let it go so desperate cheap as that? demanded
Jason, his eyes twinkling with a sort of bitters
expectation
.
That is the stated price. Stop him boldly; there is no
occasion for all this Connecticut modesty. Here, uncle, this
gentleman wishes a cup of your white wine.
Jason turned away in alarm, to see who was looking on;
and, when the cup was put into his hand, he shut his eyes,
determined to gulp its contents at a swallow, in the most
approved bitters style. About half the liquor went down
his throat, the rest being squirted back in a small white
stream.
Buttermilk, by Jingo! exclaimed the disappointed
pedagogue
,
who expected some delicious combination of spices
with rum. St. Jingo was the only saint, and a darnation
or darn you, were the only oaths his puritan education
ever permitted him to use.
CHAPTER V.
Here 's your fine clams!
As white as snow!
On Rockaway these clams do grow.
New York Cries
.
It
was some time before Jason's offended dignity and
disappointment
would permit him to smile at the mistake; and
we had walked some distance towards Old Slip, where I
was to meet Dirck, before the pedagogue even opened his
lips. Then, the only allusion he made to the white wine,
was to call it a plaguy Dutch cheat; for Jason had
implicitly
relied on having that peculiar beverage of his caste,
known as bitters. What he meant by a
Dutch
cheat, I
do not know; unless he thought the buttermilk was
particularly
Dutch, and
this
buttermilk an imposition.
Dirck was waiting for me at the Old Slip; and, on
inquiry
,
I found he had enjoyed his draught of white wine as
well as myself, and was ready for immediate service. We
proceeded along the wharves in a body, admiring the
different
vessels that lined them. About nine o'clock, all three
of us passed up Wall Street, on the stoops of which, no
small portion of its tenants were already seated, enjoying
the sight of the negroes, as, with happy shining faces
they left the different dwellings, to hasten to the Pinkster
field. Our passage through the street attracted a good deal
of attention; for, being all three strangers, it was not to be
supposed we could be thus seen in a body, without exciting
a remark. Such a thing could hardly have been expected
in London itself.
After showing Jason the City Hall, Trinity Church, and
the City Tavern, we went out of town, taking the direction
of a large common that the King's officers had long used
for a parade-ground, and which has since been called the
Park, though it would be difficult to say why, since it is
barely a paddock in size, and certainly has never been used
to keep any animals wilder than the boys of the town. A
park, I suppose, it will one day become, though it has little
at present that comports with my ideas of such a thing.
On this common, then, was the Pinkster ground, which was
now quite full of people, as well as of animation.
There was nothing new in a Pinkster frolic, either to
Dirck, or to myself; though Jason gazed at the whole
procedure
with wonder. He was born within seventy miles of
that very spot, but had not the smallest notion before, of
such a holiday as Pinkster. There are few blacks in
Connecticut
,
I believe; and those that are there, are so ground
down in the Puritan mill, that they are neither fish, flesh,
nor red-herring, as we say of a non-descript. No man ever
heard of a festival in New England, that had not some
immediate
connection with the saints, or with politics.
Jason was at first confounded with the noises, dances,
music, and games that were going on. By this time,
ninetenths
of the blacks of the city, and of the whole country
within thirty or forty miles, indeed, were collected in
thousands in those fields, beating banjoes, singing African
songs, drinking, and worst of all, laughing in a way that
seemed to set their very hearts rattling within their ribs.
Everything wore the aspect of good-humour, though it was
good-humour in its broadest and coarsest forms. Every
sort of common game was in requisition, while drinking was
far from being neglected. Still, not a man was drunk. A
drunken negro, indeed, is by no means a common thing.
The features that distinguish a Pinkster frolic from the usual
scenes at fairs, and other merry-makings, however, were of
African origin. It is true, there are not now, nor were
there then, many blacks among us of African birth; but
the traditions and usages of their original country were so
far preserved as to produce a marked difference between
this festival, and one of European origin. Among other
things, some were making music, by beating on skins drawn
over the ends of hollow logs, while others were dancing to
it, in a manner to show that they felt infinite delight. This,
in particular, was said to be a usage of their African
progenitors
.
Hundreds of whites were walking through the fields,
amused spectators. Among these last were a great many
children of the better class, who had come to look at the
enjoyment of those who attended them, in their own ordinary
amusements. Many a sable nurse did I see that day,
chaperoning
her young master, or young mistress, or both
together
,
through the various groups; demanding of all, and
receiving from all, the respect that one of these classes was
accustomed to pay to the other.
A great many young ladies between the ages of fifteen
and twenty were also in the field, either escorted by male
companions, or, what was equally as certain of producing
deference, under the care of old female nurses, who
belonged
to the race that kept the festival. We had been in
the field ourselves two hours, and even Jason was beginning
to condescend to be amused, when, unconsciously, I got
separated from my companions, and was wandering through
the groups by myself, as I came on a party of young girls,
who were under the care of two or three wrinkled and
grey-headed negresses, so respectably attired, as to show at
once they were confidential servants in some of the better
families. As for the young ladies themselves, most were
still of the age of school girls; though there were some of
that equivocal age, when the bud is just breaking into the
opening flower, and one or two that were even a little older;
young women in forms and deportment, though scarcely so
in years. One of a party of two of the last, appeared to
me to possess all the grace of young womanhood, rendered
radiant by the ingenuous laugh, the light-hearted
playfulness
,
and the virgin innocence of sweet seventeen. She
was simply, but very prettily dressed, and everything about
her attire, air, carriage and manner, denoted a young lady
of the better class, who was just old enough to feel all the
proprieties of her situation, while she was still sufficiently
youthful to enjoy all the fun. As she came near me, it
seemed as if I knew her; but it was not until I heard her
sweet, mirthful voice, that I recollected the pretty little
thing in whose behalf I had taken a round with the
butcher's boy, on the Bowery road, near six years before.
As her party came quite near the spot where I stood, what
was only conjecture at first, was reduced to a certainty.
In the surprise of the moment, happening to catch the
eye of the young creature, I was emboldened to make her
a low bow. At first she smiled, like one who fancies she
recognises an acquaintance; then her face became scarlet,
and she returned my bow with a very lady-like, but, at the
same time, a very distant curtsey; upon which, bending her
blue eyes to the ground, she turned away, seemingly to
speak to her companion. After this, I could not advance
to speak, though I was strongly in hopes the old black
nurse who was with her would recognise me, for she had
manifested much concern about me on the occasion of the
quarrel with the young butcher. This did not occur; and
old Katrinke, as I heard the negress called, jabbered away,
explaining the meaning of the different ceremonies of her
race, to a cluster of very interested listeners, without paying
any attention to me. The tongues of the pretty little things
went, as girls' tongues will go, though my unknown fair
one maintained all the reserve and quiet of manner that
comported with her young womanhood, and apparent
condition
in life.
Dere, Miss Anneke! exclaimed Katrinke, suddenly;
dere come a genttleum dat will bring a pleasure, I know.
Anneke
, I repeated, mentally, and gentleman that
will cause pleasure by his appearance. Can it be
Dirck? I thought. Sure enough, Dirck it proved to be,
who advanced rapidly to the group, making a general
salute, and finishing by shaking my beautiful young
stranger's
hands, and addressing her by the name of cousin
Anneke. This, then, was Annie Mordaunt, as the young
lady was commonly called in the English circles, the only
child and heiress of Herman Mordaunt, of Crown Street
and of Lilacsbush. Well, Dirck has more taste than I had
ever given him credit for! Just as this thought glanced
through my mind, my figure caught my friend's eye, and,
with a look of pride and exultation, he signed to me to
draw nearer, though I had managed to get pretty near as it
was, already.
Cousin Anneke, said Dirck, who never used
circumlocution
,
when direct means were at all available, this is
Corny Littlepage, of whom you have heard me speak so
often, and for whom I ask one of your best curtsies and
sweetest smiles.
Miss Mordaunt was kind enough to comply literally, both
curtsying and smiling precisely as she had been desired to
do, though I could see she was also slightly disposed to
Vol. I.  7
laugh. I was still making my bow, and mumbling some
unintelligible compliment, when Katrinke gave a little
exclamation
,
and using the freedom of an old and confidential
servant, she eagerly pulled the sleeve of her young
mistress
,
and hurriedly whispered something in her ear. Anneke
coloured, turned quickly towards me, bent her eyes more
boldly and steadily on my faceand then it was that I
fancied
the sweetest smile which mortal had ever received, or
that with which I had just before been received, was much
surpassed.
Mr. Littlepage, I believe, is not a total stranger, cousin
Dirck, she said. Katrinke remembers him, as a young
gentleman who once did me an important service, and now
I think I can trace the resemblance myself. I allude to the
boy who insulted me on the Bowery Road, Mr. Littlepage,
and your handsome interference in my behalf.
Had there been twenty boys, Miss Mordaunt, an insult
to
you
would have been resented by any man of ordinary
spirit.
I do not know that any youth, who was suddenly put to
his wits to be polite, or sentimental, or feeling, could have
done a great deal better than
that!
So Anneke thought too,
I fancy, for her colour increased, rendering her ravishingly
lovely, and she looked surprisingly pleased.
Yes, put in Dirck with energy,let twenty, or a
hundred try it if they please, Anneke, men or boys, and
they 'll find those that will protect you.
You for one, of course, cousin Dirck, rejoined the
charming girl, holding out her hand towards my friend,
with a frankness I could have dispensed with in her; but,
you will remember, Mr. Littlepage, or
Master
Littlepage as
he then was, was a stranger, and I had no such claim on
him
, as I certainly have on you.
Well, Corny, it is odd you never said a word of this to
me! when I was showing him Lilacsbush, and talking of
you and of your father, not a word did he say on the
subject
.
I did not then know it was Miss Mordaunt I had been
so fortunate as to serve; but here is Mr. Newcome at your
elbow, Follock, and dying to be introduced, as he sees I
have been.
Anneke turned to smile and curtsey again to Jason, who
made his bow in a very school-master sort of a fashion,
while I could see that the circumstance I had not boasted
of my exploit gave it new importance in the sweet
creature's
eyes. As for Jason, he had no sooner got along with
the introduction,the first, I fancy, he had ever gone
regularly
through,  than, profiting by some questions Miss
Mordaunt was asking Dirck about his mother and the rest
of the family, he came round to me, drew me aside by a
jerk of the sleeve, and gave me to understand he had
something
for my private ear.
I did not know before that you had ever kept school,
Corny, he half whispered earnestly.
How do you know it now, Mr. Newcome, since the
thing never happened?
How comes it, then, that this young woman called you
Master
Littlepage?
Bah! Jason, wait a year or two, and you will begin to
get truer notions of us New-Yorkers.
But I heard her with my own ears
Master
Littlepage;
as plain as words were ever called.
Well, then, Miss Mordaunt must be right, and I have
forgotten the affair. I must once have kept a woman's
school, somewhere, in my younger days, but forgotten it.
Now this is nothing (nawthin', as expressed) but your
desperate York pride, Corny; but I think all the better of
you for it. Why, as it could not have taken place after
you went to college, you must have got the start of even
me! But, the Rev. Mr. Worden is enough to start a youth
with a large capital, if he be so minded. I admit he does
understand the dead languages. It is a pity he is so very
dead in religious matters.
WellwellI will tell you all about it another time;
you perceive, now, that Miss Mordaunt wishes to move on,
and does not like to quit us too abruptly. Let us follow.
Jason complied, and for an hour or two we had the
pleasure
of accompanying the young ladies, as they strolled
among the booths and different groups of that singular
assembly
.
As has been said, most of the blacks had been
born in the colony, but there were some native Africans
among them. New York never had slaves on the system
of the southern planters, or in gangs of hundreds, to labour
in the fields under overseers, and who lived apart in cabins
of their own; but, our system of slavery was strictly
domestic
,
the negro almost invariably living under the same roof
with the master, or, if his habitation was detached, as
certainly
sometimes happened, it was still near at hand,
leaving
both races as parts of a common family. In the
country
,
the negroes never toiled in the field, but it was as ordinary
husbandmen; and, in the cases of those who laboured on
their own property, or as tenants of some extensive
landlord
,
the black did his work at his master's side. Then all,
or nearly all our household servants were, and still are,
blacks, leaving that department of domestic economy almost
exclusively in their hands, with the exception of those cases
in which the white females busied themselves also in such
occupations, united to the usual supervision of the mistresses.
Among the Dutch, in particular, the treatment of the negro
was of the kindest character, a trusty field-slave often
having
quite as much to say on the subject of the tillage and
the crops, as the man who owned both the land he worked,
and himself.
A party of native Africans kept us for half an hour. The
scene seemed to have revived their early associations, and
they were carried away with their own representation of
semi-savage sports. The American-born blacks gazed at
this group with intense interest also, regarding them as so
many ambassadors from the land of their ancestors, to
enlighten
them in usages and superstitious lore, that were
more peculiarly suited to their race. The last even
endeavoured to imitate the acts of the first, and, though the
attempt was often ludicrous, it never failed on the score of
intention and gravity. Nothing was done in the way of
caricature, but much in the way of respect and affection.
Lest the habits of this generation should pass away and
be forgotten, of which I see some evidence, I will mention
a usage that was quite common among the Dutch, and
which has passed in some measure, into the English families
that have formed connections with the children of Holland.
Two of these intermarriages had so far brought the
Littlepages
within the pale, that the usage to which I allude was
practised in my own case. The custom was this: when a
child of the family reached the age of six, or eight, a young
slave of the same age and sex, was given to him, or her,
with some little formality, and from that moment the
fortunes
of the two were considered to be, within the limits of
their respective pursuits and positions, as those of man and
wife. It is true, divorces do occur, but it is only in cases
of gross misconduct, and quite as often the misconduct is on
the side of the master, as on that of the slave. A drunkard
may get in debt, and be compelled to part with his blacks;
this one among the rest; but this particular negro remains
with him as long as anything remains. Slaves that
seriously
misbehave, are usually sent to the islands, where the
toil on the sugar plantations proves a very sufficient
punishment
.
The day I was six, a boy was given to me, in the manner
I have mentioned; and he remained not only my property,
but my factotum, to this moment. It was Yaap, or Jacob,
the negro to whom I have already had occasion to allude.
Anneke Mordaunt, whose grandmother was of a Dutch
family, it will be remembered, had with her there, in the
Pinkster
field, a negress of just her own age, who was called
Ma
ri;
not Mary, or Maria; but the last, as it would be
pronounced without the final a. This Ma
ri
was a buxom,
glistening, smooth-faced, laughing, red-lipped, pearl-toothed,
black-eyed hussy, that seemed born for fun; and who was
often kept in order by her more sedate and well-mannered
young mistress with a good deal of difficulty. My fellow
was on the ground, somewhere, too; for I had given him
permission to come to town to keep Pinkster; and he was
to leave Satanstoe, in a sloop, within an hour after I left it
myself. The wind had been fair, and I made no question
of his having arrived; though, as yet, I had not seen him.
I could have accompanied Anneke, and her party, all day,
through that scene of unsophisticated mirth, and felt no want
of interest. Her presence immediately produced an
impression
;
even the native Africans moderating their manner,
and lowering their yells, as it might be, the better to suit
her more refined tastes. No one, in our set, was too
dignified
to laugh, but Jason. The pedagogue, it is true, often
expressed his disgust at the amusements and antics of the
negroes, declaring they were unbecoming human beings;
7 *
and otherwise manifesting that disposition to hypercriticism,
which is apt to distinguish one who is only a tyro in his
own case.
Such was the state of things, when Ma
i
came rushing
up to her young mistress, with distended eyes and uplifted
hands, exclaiming, on a key that necessarily made us all
sharers in the communication
Oh! Miss Anneke!  What you t'ink, Miss Anneke!
Could you ever s'pose sich a t'ing, Miss Anneke!
Tell me at once, Mari, what it is you have seen, or
heard; and leave off these silly exclamations; said the
gentle mistress, with a colour that proved she was unused
to her own girl's manner.
Who
could
t'ink it, Miss Anneke! Dese, here, werry
niggers have sent all 'e way to deir own country, and have
had a lion cotched for Pinkster!
This was news, indeed, if true. Not one of us all had
ever seen a lion; wild animals, then, being exceedingly
scarce in the colonies, with the exception of those that were
taken in our own woods. I had seen several of the small
brown bears, and many a wolf, and one stuffed panther, in
my time; but never supposed it within the range of
possibilities
,
that I could be brought so near a living lion.
Inquiry
showed, nevertheless, that Mari was right, with the
exception of the animal's having been expressly caught for
the occasion. It was the beast of a showman, who was also
the proprietor of a very active and amusing monkey. The
price of admission was a quarter of a dollar, for adult whites;
children and negroes going in for half-price. These
preliminaries
understood, it was at once settled that all who
could muster enough of money and courage, should go in a
body, and gaze on the king of beasts. I say, of courage;
for it required a good deal for a female novice to go near a
living lion.
The lion was kept in a cage, of course, which was placed
in a temporary building of boards, that had been erected for
the Pinkster field. As we drew near the door, I saw that
the cheeks of several of the pretty young creatures who
belonged
to the party of Anneke, began to turn pale; a sign
of weakness that, singular as it may appear, very sensibly
extended itself to most of their attendant negresses. Mari
did not flinch, however; and, when it came to the trial, of
that sex, she and her mistress were the only two who held
out in the original resolution of entering. Some time was
thrown away in endeavouring to persuade two or three of
her older companions to go in with her; but, finding it
useless
,
with a faint smile, Miss Mordaunt calmly said
Well, gentlemen, Mari and myself must compose the
female portion of the party. I have never seen a lion, and
would not, by any means, miss this opportunity. We shall
find my friends waiting for such portions of us as shall not
be eaten, on our return.
We were now near the door, where stood the man who
received the money, and gave the tickets. It happened
that Dirck had been stopped by a gentleman of his
acquaintance
,
who had just left the building, and who was
laughingly relating some incident that had occurred within.
I stood on one side of Anneke, Jason on the other, while
Mari was close in the rear.
A quarter for each gentleman and the lady, said the
door-keeper, and a shilling for the wench.
On this hint, Jason, to my great surprise, (for usually he
was very backward on such occasions,) drew out a purse, and
emptying some silver into his hand, he said with a flourish
Permit me, Miss  it is an honour I covet; a quarter
for yourself, and a shilling for Mari.
I saw Anneke colour, and her eye turn hastily towards
Dirck. Before I had time to say anything, or to do
anything
in fact, she answered steadily
Give yourself no trouble, Mr. Newcome; Mr. Littlepage
will do me the favour to obtain tickets for me.
Jason had the money in his fingers, and I passed him
and bought the tickets, while he was protesting
It gave him pleasurehe was proud of the occasion
another time her brother could do the same for his sisters,
and he had six, and other matters of the sort.
I simply placed the tickets in Anneke's hand, who
received
them with an expression of thanks, and we all
passed; Dirck inquiring of his cousin, as he came up, if he
should get her tickets. I mention this little incident as
showing the tact of woman, and will relate all that pertains
to it, before I proceed to other things. Anneke said nothing
on the subject of her tickets until we had left the booth,
when she approached me, and with that grace and
simplicity
which a well-bred woman knows how to use on such
an occasion, and quietly observed
I am under obligations to you, Mr. Littlepage, for
having paid for my tickets;  they cost three shillings, I
believe.
I bowed, and had the pleasure of almost touching Miss
Mordaunt's beautiful little hand, as she gave me the money.
At this instant, a jerk at my elbow came near causing me
to drop the silver. It was Jason, who had taken this
liberty, and who now led me aside with an earnestness of
manner it was not usual for him to exhibit. I saw by the
portentous look of the pedagogue's countenance, and his
swelling manner, that something extraordinary was on his
mind, and waited with some little curiosity to learn what it
might be.
Why, what in human natur', Corny, do you mean?
he cried, almost angrily. Did ever mortal man hear of a
gentleman's making a lady pay for a treat! Do you know
you have made Miss Anneke pay for a treat?
A treat, Mr. Newcome!
Yes, a treat, Mr. Corny Littlepage! How often do you
think young ladies will accompany you to shows, and balls,
and other sights, if you make
them pay!
Then a laugh of derision added emphasis to Jason's
words.
Pay!  could I presume to think Miss Mordaunt would
suffer me to pay money for her, or for her servant?
You almost make me think you a nat'ral! Young men
always
pay for young women, and no questions asked.
Did you not remark how smartly I offered to pay for this
Miss, and how well she took it, until you stepped forward
and cut me out;  I bore it, for it saved me three
nine-pences
.
I observed how Miss Mordaunt shrunk from the
familiarity
of being called Miss, and how unwilling she was to
let you buy the tickets; and that I suspect was solely
because
she saw you had some notion of what you call a
treat.
I cannot enter into the philosophy of the thing, but
certainly
nothing is more vulgar in English, to address a
young lady as Miss, without affixing a name, whereas I
know it is the height of breeding to say Mademoiselle in
French, and am told the Spaniards, Italians and Germans,
use its synonyme in the same manner. I had been indignant
at Jason's familiarity when he called Annekethe pretty
Anneke!Miss; and felt glad of an occasion to let him
understand how I felt on the subject.
What a child you be, a'ter all, Corny! exclaimed the
pedagogue, who was much too good-natured to take offence
at a trifle. You a bechelor of arts! But this matter
must
be set right, if it be only for the honour of my school.
Folks  Jason never blundered on the words `one' or
`people' in this senseFolks may think that you have
been in the school since it has been under my care, and I
wouldn't for the world have it get abroad that a youth from
my school had neglected to treat a lady under such
circumstances
.
Conceiving it useless to remonstrate with
me
any further,
Jason proceeded forthwith to Anneke, with whom he begged
permission to say a word in private. So eager was my
companion to wipe out the stain, and so surprised was the
young lady, who gently declined moving more than a step,
that the conference took place immediately under my
observation
,
neither of the parties being aware that I
necessarily
heard or saw all that passed.
You must excuse Corny, Miss, Jason commenced,
producing his purse again, and beginning to hunt anew for
a quarter and a shilling; he is quite young, and knows
nawthin' worth speaking of, of the ways of mankind. Ah!
here is just the moneythree ninepennies, or three York
shillings. Here, Miss, excuse Corny, and overlook it all;
when he is older, he will not make such blunders.
I am not certain that I understand you, sir! exclaimed
Anneke, who had shrunk back a little at the `Miss,' and
who now saw Jason hold out the silver, with a surprise she
took no pains to conceal.
This is the price of the ticketsyes, that's all.
Nawthin'
else, on honour. Corny, you remember, was so awful
dumb as to let you pay, just as if you had been a
gentleman
.
Anneke now smiled, and glancing at me at the same
instant, a bright blush suffused her face, though the
meaning
of my eye, as I could easily see, strongly tempted her
to laugh.
It is very well as it is, Mr. Newcome, though I feel
much indebted to your liberal intentions, she said, turning
to rejoin her friends; it is customary in New York for
ladies to pay, themselves, for everything of this nature.
When I go to Connecticut, I shall feel infinitely indebted to
you for another such offer.
Jason did not know what to make of it! He long after
insisted that the young lady was `huffed,' as he called it,
and that she had refused to take the money merely because
she was thus offened.
There is a manner, you know, Corny, he said, of
doing even a genteel thing, and that is to do it genteelly. I
much doubt if a genteel thing
can
be done ungenteelly.
One thing I'm thankful for, and that is, that she don't know
that you ever were at the `Seminarian Institute' in your
life; such being the appellation Jason had given to that
which Mr. Worden had simply called a `Boys' School.'
To return to the booth.
The lion had many visitors, and we had some difficulty
in finding places. As a matter of course, Anneke was put
in front, most of the men who were in the booth giving way
to her with respectful attention. Unfortunately, the young
lady wore an exceedingly pretty shawl, in which scarlet
was a predominant colour; and that which occurred has
been attributed to this circumstance, though I am far from
affirming such to have been literally the case. Anneke,
from the first, manifested no fear; but the circle pressing
on her from without, she got so near the cage that the beast
thrust a paw through, and actually caught hold of the
shawl, drawing the alarmed girl quite up to the bars. I
was at Anneke's side, and with a presence of mind that
now surprises me, I succeeded in throwing the shawl from
the precious creature's shoulders, and of fairly lifting her
from the ground and setting her down again at a safe
distance
from the beast. All this passed so soon that half the
persons present were unconscious of what had occurred
until it was all over; and what astonishes me most is, that
I do not retain the least recollection of the pleasure I ought
to have felt while my arm encircled Anneke Mordaunt's
slender waist, and while she was altogether supported by
me. The keeper interfered immediately, and the lion
relinquished
the shawl, looking like a disappointed beast when
he found it did not contain its beautiful owner.
Anneke was rescued before she had time fully to
comprehend
the danger she had been in. Even Dirck could not
advance to her aid, though he saw and comprehended the
imminent risk ran by the being he loved best in the world;
but Dirck was always so slow! I must do Jason the
credit
to say that he behaved well, though so situated as to be
of no real use. He rushed forward to assist Anneke, and
remained to draw away the shawl, as soon as the keeper
had succeeded in making the lion relinquish his hold. But,
all this passed so rapidly, as to give little opportunity for
noting incidents.
Anneke was certainly well frightened by this adventure
with the lion, as was apparent by her changing colour, and
a few tears that succeeded. Still, a glass of water, and a
minute or two, seated in a chair, were sufficient to restore
her self-composure, and she remained with us, for half an
hour, examining and admiring her terrible assailant.
And, here, let me add, for the benefit of those who have
never had an opportunity of seeing the king of beasts, that
he is a sight well worthy to behold! I have never viewed
an elephant, which travelled gentlemen tell me is a still
more extraordinary animal, though I find it difficult to
imagine
anything finer, in its way, than the lion which came
so near injuring sweet Anne Mordaunt. I question if
any of us were aware of the full extent of the danger she
ran, until we began to reflect on it coolly, after time and
leisure were afforded. As soon as the commotion naturally
produced at first, had subsided, the incident seemed
forgotten
,
and we left the booth, after a long visit, expatiating on
the animal, and its character, apparently in forgetfulness
of that which, by one blow of his powerful paw, the lion
might have rendered fatal to one of the very sweetest and
happiest innocents of the whole province, but for the timely
and merciful interposition of a kind providence.
After the little affair of the tickets, I walked on with
Anneke, who declared her intention of quitting the field, her
escape beginning to affect her spirits, and she was afraid
that some particularly kind friend might carry an
exaggerated
account of what had happened to her father. Dirck
offered to accompany her home, for Mr. Mordaunt kept no
carriage; or, at least, nothing that was habitually used as a
town equipage. We had all gone as far as the verge of the
Common with Anneke, when the sweet girl stopped, looked
at me earnestly, and, while her colour changed and tears
rose to her eyes, she said,
Mr. Littlepage, I am just getting to be fully conscious of
what I owe to you. The thing passed so suddenly, and I
was so much alarmed, that I did not know how to express
myself at the time, nor am I certain that I do now. Believe
me, notwithstanding, that I never can forget this morning,
and I beg of you, if you have a sister, to carry to her the
proffered friendship of Anneke Mordaunt, and tell her that
her own prayers in behalf of her brother will not be more
sincere than mine.
Before I could recollect myself, so as to make a suitable
answer, Anneke had curtsied and walked away, with her
handkerchief to her eyes.
CHAPTER VI.
Nay, be brief:
I see into thy end, and am almost
A man already.
Cymbeline
.
As
Dirck accompanied Miss Mordaunt to her father's
house in Crown Street,
[9]
[9]
Now, Liberty Street.
I took an occasion to give Jason
the slip, being in no humour to listen to his lectures on the
proprieties of life, and left the Pinkster field as fast as I
could. Notwithstanding the size and importance of New
York, a holiday like this could not fail to draw great crowds
of persons to witness the sports. In 1757, James de
Lancey
was at the head of the government of the province, as
indeed he had been, in effect, for much of his life; and I
remember
to have met his chariot, carrying the younger
children
of the family to the field, on my way into the town.
As the day advanced, carriages of one sort and another
made their appearance in Broadway, principally conveying
the children of their different owners. All these belonged
to people of the first mark; and I saw the Ship that denotes
the arms of Livingston, the Lance, of the de Lanceys, the
Burning Castle, of the Morrises, and other armorial bearings
that were well known in the province. Carriages, certainly,
were not as common in 1757 as they have since become;
but most of our distinguished people rode in their coaches,
chariots, or phaetons, or conveyances of some sort or other,
when there was occasion to go so far out of town as the
Common, which is the site of the present Park. The
roads on the island of Manhattan were very pretty and
picturesque
,
winding among rocks and through valleys, being
lined with groves and copses in a way to render all the
drives rural and retired. Here and there, one came to a
country-house, the residence of some person of importance,
which, by its comfort and snugness, gave all the indications
of wealth and of a prudent taste. Mr. Speaker Nicoll
[10]
[10]
The person meant here, was William Nicoll, Esquire, Patentee
of Islip, a large estate on Long Island, that is still in the family,
under a Patent granted in 1683. This gentleman was a son of Mr.
Secretary Nicoll, who is supposed to have been a relative of Col.
Nicoll, the first English Governor. Mr. Speaker Nicoll, as the son
was called, in consequence of having filled that office for nearly a
generation, was the direct ancestor of the Nicolls of Islip and Shelter
Island, as well as of a branch long settled at Stratford, Connecticut.
The house alluded to by Mr. Littlepage, as a relic of antiquity in
his
day,  American antiquity, be it remembered,  was standing a few
years since, if it be not still standing, at the point of junction between
the Old Boston Road and the New Road, and nearly opposite to the
termination of the long avenue that led to Rosehill, originally a seat
of the Watts'. The house stood a short distance above the present
Union Square, and not far from that of the present Gramercy. It
was, or is, a brick-house of one story, with a small court-yard in
front; the House of Refuge being at a little distance on its right.
If still standing, it must now be one of the oldest buildings of any
sort, in a town of 400,000 souls! As Mr. Speaker Nicoll resigned
the chair in 1718, this house must be at least a hundred and thirty or
forty years old; and it may be questioned if a dozen as old, public or
private, can be found on the whole island.
As the regular family residences of the Nicolls were in Suffolk, or
on their estates, it is probable that the abode mentioned was, in a
measure, owing to an intermarriage with the Watts', as much as to
the necessity of the Speaker's passing so much time at the seat of
government.
Editor
.
had
occupied a dwelling of this sort for a long series of years,
that was about a league from town, and which is still
standing
,
as I pass it constantly in travelling between Satanstoe
and York. I never saw the Patentee myself, as he died
long before my birth; but his house near town still stands,
as I have said, a memorial of past ages!
The whole town seemed alive, and everybody had a
desire
to get a glance at the sports of the Pinkster Field; though
the more dignified and cultivated had self-denial enough to
keep aloof, since it would hardly have comported with their
years and stations to be seen in such a place. The war had
brought many regiments into the province, however, and I
met at least twenty young officers, strolling out to the scene
of amusement, as I walked into town. I will confess I
gazed at these youths with admiration, and not entirely
without envy, as they passed me in pairs, laughing and
diverting themselves with the grotesque groups of blacks
that were occasionally met, coming in from their sports.
These young men I knew had enjoyed the advantages of
being educated at home, some of them, quite likely, in the
Universities, and all of them amid the high civilization and
taste of England. I say all of them, too hastily; as there
were young men of the colonies among them, who probably
had not enjoyed these advantages. The easy air,
self-possession
,
and quiet, what shall I call it?  insolence would
be too strong a word, and a term that I, the son and
grandson
of old king's officers, would not like to apply, and yet
it comes nearest to what I mean as applicable to the covert
manner of these young menbut, whatever it was, that
peculiar
air of metropolitan superiority over provincial ignorance
and provincial dependence, which certainly distinguished all
the younger men of this class, had an effect on me, I find it
difficult to describe. I was a loyal subject, loved the King,
most particularly since he was so identified with the
Protestant
succession,loved all of the blood-royal, and wished
for nothing more than the honour and lustre of the English
crown. One thus disposed could not but feel amicably
towards the King's officers; yet, I will confess, there were
moments when this air of ill-concealed superiority, this
manner that so much resembled that of the master towards
the servant, the superior to the dependent, the patron to the
client, gave me deep offence, and feelings so bitter, that I
was obliged to struggle hard to suppress them. But this is
anticipating, and is interrupting the course of my narrative.
I am inclined to think there must always be a good deal of
this feeling, where the relation of principal and dependant
exists, as between distinct territories.
I was a good deal excited, and a little fatigued with the
walk and the incidents of the morning, and determined to
proceed at once to Duke Street, and share the cold dinner
of my aunt; for few private families in York, that depended
on regular cooks for their food, had anything served warm
on their tables, for that and the two succeeding days.
Here and there a white substitute was found, it is true, and
we had the benefit of such an assistant at half-past one. It
was the English servant of a Col. Mosely, an officer of the
army, who was intimate at my uncle's, and who had had
the civility to offer a man for this occasion. I afterwards
ascertained, that many officers manifested the same kind
spirit towards various other families in which they visited
on terms of friendship.
Marriages between young English officers and our pretty,
delicate York belles, were of frequent occurrence, and I
had felt a twinge or two, on the subject of Anneke, that
morning, as I passed the youths of the 55th, 60th, or Loyal
Americans, 17th, and other regiments that were then in the
province.
My aunt was descending from the drawing-room, in
dinner
dressfor that no lady ever neglects, even though she
dines on a cold dumpling. As I opened the street-door,
Mrs. Legge was not coming down alone to take her seat at
table, but, having some extra duty to perform in
consequence
of the absence of most of her household, she was
engaged in that service. Seeing me, however, she stopped
on the landing of the stairs, and beckoned me to approach.
Corny, she said, what have you been doing, my
child, to have drawn this honour upon you?
Honour!I am ignorant of having even received any.
What can you mean, my dear aunt?
Here is Herman Mordaunt waiting to see you, in the
drawing-room. He asked particularly for
you;
wishes to
see
you  expresses his regrets that
you
are not in, and
talks only of
you!
In which case, I ought to hasten up stairs in order to
receive him, as soon as possible. I will tell you all about
it at dinner, aunt;excuse me now.
Away I went, with a beating heart, to receive a visit
from Anneke's father. I can scarcely give a reason why
this gentleman was usually called, when he was spoken of,
and sometimes when he was spoken to,
Herman
Mordaunt;
unless, indeed, it were, that being in part of Dutch
extraction
,
the name which denoted the circumstance (Hermanus
pronounced by the Hollanders, Her
maa
nus,) was used by
a portion of the population in token of the fact, and adopted
by others in pure compliance. But
Herman
Mordaunt was
he usually styled; and this, too, in the way of respect, and
not as coarse-minded persons affect to speak of their
superiors
,
or in a way to boast of their own familiarity. I
should have thought it an honour, at my time of life, to
receive a visit from Herman Mordaunt; but my heart fairly
beat, as I have said, as I went hastily up stairs, to meet
Anneke's father.
My uncle was not in, and I found my visiter waiting for
me, alone, in the drawing-room. Aware of the state of the
family, and of all families, indeed, during Pinkster, he had
insisted on my aunt's quitting him, while he looked over
some new books that had recently been received from home;
among which was a new and very handsome edition of the
Spectator, a work that enjoys a just celebrity throughout
the colonies.
Mr. Mordaunt advanced to receive me with studied
politeness
,
yet a warmth that could not well be counterfeited,
the instant I approached. Nevertheless, his manner was
easy and natural; and to me he appeared to be the
highestbred
man I had ever seen.
I am thankful that the debt of gratitude I owe you, my
young friend, he said, at once, and without preface of any
sort, unless that of manner be so received, is due to the
son of a gentleman I so much esteem as Evans Littlepage.
A loyal subject, an honest man, and a well-connected and
well-descended gentleman, like him, may well be the parent
of a brave youth, who does not hesitate to face even lions,
in defence of the weaker sex.
I cannot affect to misunderstand you, sir, I answered;
and I sincerely congratulate you that matters are no worse;
though you greatly overrate the danger. I doubt if even a
lion would have the heart to hurt Miss Mordaunt, were she
in his power.
I think this was a very pretty speech, for a youth of
twenty; and I confess I look back upon it, even now, with
complacency. If I occasionally betray weakness of this
character, I beg the reader to recollect that I am acting in
the part of an honest historian, and that it is my aim to
conceal nothing that ought to be known.
Herman Mordaunt did not resume his seat, on account
of the lateness of the hour, (half-past one); but he made
me professions of friendship, and named Friday, the first
moment when he could command the services of his
domestics
,
when I should dine with him. The army had
introduced
later hours than was usual; and this invitation was
given for three o'clock; it being said, at the time, as I well
remember, that persons of fashion in London sat down to
table even later than this. After remaining with me five
minutes, Herman Mordaunt took his leave. Of course, I
accompanied him to the door, where we parted with many
bows.
At dinner, I told my uncle and aunt all that had occurred,
and was glad to hear them both speak so favourably of my
new acquaintances.
Herman Mordaunt might be a much more considerable
man than he is, observed my uncle, were he disposed to
enter into public life. He has talents, a good education, a
very handsome estate, and is well-connected in the colony,
certainly; some say at home, also.
And Anneke is a sweet young thing, added my aunt;
and, since Corny was to assist any young lady, I am
heartily glad it was Anneke. She is an excellent creature,
8 *
and her mother was one of my most intimate friends, as
she was of my sister Littlepage, too. You must go and
inquire after her health, this evening, Corny. Such an
attention
is due, after what has passed all round.
Did I wish to comply with this advice? Out of all
question
;
and yet I was too young, and too little at my ease, to
undertake this ceremony, without many misgivings. Luckily,
Dirck came in, in the evening; and my aunt repeating her
opinion before my friend, he at once deciared it was
altogether
proper, and that he thought Anneke would have a
right to expect it. As he offered to be my companion, we
were soon on our way to Crown Street, in which Mr.
Mordaunt
owned and inhabited a very excellent house. We
were admitted by Mr. Mordaunt himself, not one of his
blacks having yet returned from the Pinkster field.
Dirck appeared to be on the best terms, not only with
Herman Mordaunt, but with his charming daughter. I had
observed that the latter always called him
cousin
Dirck,
and I hardly knew whether to interpret this as a sign of
particular
or of family regard. That Dirck was fonder of
Anneke
Mordaunt than of any other human being, I could easily
see; and I confess that the discovery already began to cause
uneasiness. I loved Dirck, and wished he loved any one
else but the very being I feared he did.
Herman Mordaunt showed me the way, up the noble,
wide, mahogany-garnished staircase of his dwelling, and
ushered us into a very handsome, though not very large,
but well-lighted drawing-room. There sat Anneke, his
daughter, in the loveliness of her maiden charms, a little
more dressed than usual, perhaps, for she had three or four
young and lovely girls with her, and five or six young men;
among whom were no less than three scarlet coats.
I shall not attempt to conceal my weakness. Only twenty,
inexperienced and unaccustomed to town society, I felt
awkward
and unpleasantly the instant I entered the room; nor
did the feeling subside during the first half-hour. Anneke
came forward, one or two steps, to meet me; and I could
see, she was almost as much confused, as I was myself.
She blushed, as she thanked me for the service I had
rendered
,
and expressed her satisfaction that her father had
been fortunate enough to find me at home, and had had an
opportunity of saying a little of what he felt, on the
occasion
.
She then invited me to be seated, naming me to the
company, and telling me who two or three of the young
ladies were. From these last I received sundry approving
smiles; which I took as so many thanks for serving their
friend; while I could not help seeing that I was an object
of examination to most of the men present. The three
officers, in particular, looked at me the most intently, and
the longest.
I trust, your little accident, which could have been of no
great moment, in itself, since you escaped so well, did not
have the effect to prevent you from enjoying the rare fun
of this Pinkster affair? said one of the scarlet coats, as
soon as the movement caused by my reception had subsided.
You call it a `little accident,' Mr. Bulstrode, returned
Anneke, with a reproachful shake of her pretty head, but,
I can assure you, it is not a trifle, to a young lady, to find
herself in the paws of a lion.
Serious
accident, then; since, I see, you are resolved to
consider yourself a victim; rejoined the other; but, not
serious enough, I trust, to deprive you of the fun?
Pinkster fields, and Pinkster frolics, are no novelties to
us, sir, as they occur every season; and I am just old enough
not to have missed one of them all, for the last twelve
years.
We heard you had been `out, put in another red-coat,
whom I had heard called Billings, accompanied by a little
army, of what Bulstrode called, the Light Infantry.
Here three or four of the other young ladies joined in the
discourse, at once, protesting against Mr. Bulstrode's placing
their younger sisters in the army, in so cavalier a manner;
an accusation that Mr. Bulstrode endeavoured to parry, by
declaring his hopes of having them all, not only in the
army, but in his own regiment, one day or other. At this,
there was a certain amount of mirth, and various
protestations
of an unwillingness to enlist; in which, I was glad to
see, that neither Anneke, nor her most intimate friend, Mary
Wallace, saw fit to join. I liked their reserve of manner,
far better than the girlish trifling of their companions; and,
I could see, that all the men respected them the more for it.
There was a good deal of general and disjointed
conversation
that succeeded; which I shall not pretend to follow or
relate, but confine myself to such observations as had a
bearing on matters that were connected with myself.
As none of the young soldiers were addressed by their
military titles, such things never occurring in the better
circles, as I now discovered, and, least of all, in those
connected
with the army, I was not able, at the time, to
ascertain
the rank of the three red-coats; though I afterwards
ascertained, that the youngest was an ensign, of the name
of Harris; a mere boy, and the younger son of a member
of Parliament. The next oldest, Billings, was a captain,
and was said to be a natural son of a nobleman; while
Bulstrode was actually the oldest son of a baronet, of three
or four thousand a year, and had already bought his way
up as high as a Majority, though only four-and-twenty.
This last was a handsome fellow, too; nor had I been an
hour in his company, before I saw, plainly enough, that he
was a strong admirer of Anneke Mordaunt. The other two
evidently admired themselves too much, to have any very
lively feelings on the subject of other persons. As for Dirck,
younger than myself, and diffident, as well as slow by
nature, he kept himself altogether in the back-ground,
conversing
,
most of the time, with Herman Mordaunt, on the
subject of farming.
We had been together an hour, and I had acquired
sufficient
ease to change my seat, and to look at a picture or
two, which adorned the walls, and which were said to be
originals, from the Old World; for, to own the truth, the
art of painting has not made much progress in the colonies.
We
have
painters, it is true, and one or two are said to be
men of rare merit, the ladies being very fond of sitting to
them for their portraits; but these are exceptions. At a
future day, when critics shall have immortalized the names
of a Smybert, and a Watson, and a Blackburn, the people
of these provinces will become aware of the talents they
once possessed among them; and the grandchildren of those
who neglected these men of genius, in their dayay, their
descendants to the latest generations  will revenge the
wrongs of merit and talent, to the end of civilized time. It
is a failing of colonies to be diffident of their own opinions;
but I have heard gentlemen, who were educated at home,
and who possessed cultivated and refined tastes, affirm that
the painters of Europe, when visiting this hemisphere, have
retained all their excellence; and have painted as freely and
as well, under an American, as under a European sun. As
for a sister art, the Thespian muse had actually made her
appearance among us, five years before the time of my visit
to town in 1757, or in 1752; a theatre having actually been
built and opened in Nassau Street in 1753, with a company
under the care of the celebrated Hallam, and his family.
This theatre I had been dying to visit, while it stood, for as
yet I had never witnessed a theatrical performance; but my
mother's injunctions prevented me from entering it while at
college. When you are old enough, Corny, she used to
say, you shall have my permission to go as often as is
proper; but you are now of an age, when Shakspeare and
Rowe might unsettle your Latin and Greek. My task of
obedience had not been very difficult, inasmuch as the
building
in Nassau Street, the second regular theatre ever erected
in British America, was taken down, and a church erected
in its place.
[11]
[11]
The church is now (1845) being converted into a Post-Office.
The comedians went to the islands, and had
not re-appeared on the continent down to the period of which
I am now writing; nor did their return occur until the
following
year. That they were expected, however, and that
a new house had been built for them, in another part of the
town, I was aware, though month after month passed away,
and the much-expected company did not appear. I had
understood, however, that the large military force collecting
in the colony, would be likely to bring them back soon; and
the conversation soon took a turn, that proved how much
interest the young, the gay, and the fair, felt in the result.
I was still looking at a picture, when Mr. Bulstrode
approached
me, and entered into conversation. It will be
remembered, that this gentleman was four years my senior;
that he had been at one of the universities; was the heir to
a baronetcy; knew the world; had risen to a Majority in
the army, and was by nature, as well as training, agreeable,
when he had a mind to be, and genteel. These
circumstances
,
I could not but feel, gave him a vast advantage over
me; and I heartily wished that we stood anywhere but in
the presence of Anneke Mordaunt, as he thus saw fit to
single me out for invidious comparison, by a sort of
tte--tte
,
or aside. Still, I could not complain of his manner,
which was both polite and respectful; though I could scarce
divest myself of the idea, that he was covertly amusing
himself
,
the whole time.
You are a fortunate man, Mr. Littlepage, he
commenced
,
in having had it in your power to do so
important
a service to Miss Mordaunt. We all envy you your
luck, while we admire your spirit, and I feel certain the
men of our regiment will take some proper notice of it.
Miss Anneke is in possession of half our hearts, and we
should be still more heartless to overlook such a service.
I muttered some half-intelligible answer to this
compliment
,
and my new acquaintance proceeded.
I am almost surprised, Mr. Littlepage, he added, that
a man of your spirit does not come among us in times as
stirring as these. They tell me both your father and
grandfather
served, and that you are quite at your ease. You
will find a great many men of merit and fashion among us,
and I make no doubt they would contribute to make your
time pass agreeably enough. Large reinforcements are
expected, and if you are inclined for a pair of colours, I
think I know a battalion in which there are a vacancy or
two, and which will certainly serve in the colonies. It
would afford me great pleasure to help to further your views,
should you be disposed to turn them towards the army.
Now all this was said with an air of great apparent
frankness and sincerity, which I fancied was only the more
visible from the circumstance that Anneke was so seated
as unavoidably to hear every word of what was said. I
observed that she even turned her eyes on me as I made
my answer, though I did not dare so far to observe her in
turn as to note their expression.
I am very sensible, Mr. Bulstrode, of the liberality and
kindness of your intentions, I answered steadily enough,
for pride came to my assistance, though I fear it will not
be in my power to profit by it at once, if ever. My
grandfather
is still living, and he has much influence over me and
my fortune, and I know it is his wish that I should remain
at Satanstoe.
Where? demanded Bulstrode, with more quickness
and curiosity than strictly comported with good-breeding
perhaps.
Satanstoe; I do not wonder you smile, for it has an
odd sound, but it is the name my grandfather has given the
family place in Westchester. Given, I have said, though
translated would be better, as I understand the present
appellation is pretty literally rendered into English from
the Dutch.
I like the name exceedingly, Mr. Littlepage, and I feel
certain I should like your good, old, honest, Anglo-Saxon
grandfather. But, pardon me, it is his wish you should
remain at Satansfoot?
Satans
toe
, sir; we do not aspire to the whole foot. It
is my grandfather's wish that I remain at home until of
age, which will not be now for some months.
By way of keeping you out of Satan's footsteps, I
suppose
.
Well, these old gentlemen are often right. Should
you alter your views, however, my dear Littlepage, do not
forget me, but remember you can count on one who has
some little influence, and who will ever be ready to exert it
in the behalf of one who has proved so serviceable to Miss
Mordaunt. Sir Harry is a martyr to the gout, and talks
of letting me stand in his place at the dissolution. In that
case my wishes will naturally carry more weight. I like
that name of Satanstoe amazingly!
I am infinitely obliged to you, Mr. Bulstrode, though I
will confess I have never looked forward to rising in the
world by taxing my friends. One may own that he has
had some hopes founded on merit and honesty
Poh! poh!  my dear Littlepage, honesty is a very
pretty thing to talk about, but I suppose you remember
what Juvenal says on that interesting subject
probitas
laudatur et alget
.
I dare say you are fresh enough from
college to remember that comprehensive sentiment.
I have never read Juvenal, Mr. Bulstrode, and never
wish to, if such be the tendency of what he teaches
Juvenal was a satirist, you know, interrupted Bulstrode
a little hastily, for by this time he too had ascertained that
Anneke was listening, and he betrayed some eagerness to
get rid of so flagitious a sentiment; and satirists speak of
things as they are, rather than as they ought to be. I dare
say Rome deserved all she got, for the moralists give a very
sad account of her condition. Of all the large capitals of
which we have any account, London is the only town of
even tolerable manners.
What young Bulstrode would have ventured to say next,
it is out of my power to guess; for a certain Miss Warren,
who was of the company, and who particularly affected the
youth, luckily called out at this critical instant
Your attention one moment, if you please, Mr. Bulstrode;
is it true that the gentlemen of the army have been getting
the new theatre in preparation, and that they intend to favour
us with some representations? A secret something like this
has just leaked out, from Mr. Harris, who even goes so far
as to add that you can tell us all about it.
Mr. Harris must be put under an arrest for this, though
I hear the colonel let the cat out of the bag, at the Lt.
Governor's
table, as early as last week.
I can assure you, Mr. Bulstrode, Anneke observed
calmly, that I have heard rumours to this effect for quite
a fortnight. You must not blame Mr. Harris solely, for
your whole regiment has been hinting to the same purpose
far and near.
Then the delinquent will escape, this time. I confess
the charge; we have hired the new theatre, and do intend
to solicit the honour of the ladies coming to hear me murder
Cato, and Scrub; a pretty climax of characters, you will
admit, Miss Mordaunt?
I know nothing of Scrub, though I have read Mr.
Addison's
play, and think you have no need of being ashamed
of the character of Cato. When is the theatre to open?
We follow the sable gentry. As soon as St. Pinkster
has received his proper share of attention, we shall
introduce
Dom-Cato and Mr. Scrub to your acquaintance.
All the young ladies, but Anneke and her friend Mary
Wallace, laughed, two or three repeating the words `St.
Pinkster,' as if they contained something much cleverer
than it was usual to hear. A general burst of exclamations,
expressions of pleasure, and of questions and answers
followed
,
in which two or three voices were heard at the same
moment, during which time Anneke turned to me, who was
standing near her, at the spot occupied by Bulstrode a
minute before, and seemed anxious to say something.
Do you seriously think of the army, Mr. Littlepage?
she asked, changing colour at the freedom of her own
question.
In a war like this, no one can say when he may be
called on to go out, I answered. But, only as a defender
of the soil, if at all.
I thought Anneke Mordaunt seemed pleased with this
answer. After a short pause, she resumed the dialogue.
Of course you understand Latin, Mr. Littlepage, although
you have not been at the universities?
As it is taught in our own colleges, Miss Mordaunt.
And that is sufficient to tell me what Mr. Bulstrode's
quotation meansif it be proper for me to hear.
He would hardly presume to use even a Latin saying
in your presence, that is unfit for your ear. The maxim
which Mr. Bulstrode attributes to Juvenal, simply means
`that honesty is praised and starves.'
I thought that something like displeasure settled on the
fair, polished, brow of Miss Mordaunt, who, I could soon
see, possessed much character and high principles for one
of her tender years. She said nothing, however, though
she exchanged a very meaning glance with her friend Mary
Wallace. Her lips were moved, and I fancied I could trace
the formation of the sounds honesty is praised and
starves!
And
you
are to be Cato I hear, Mr. Bulstrode, cried
one of the young ladies, who thought more of a scarlet
coat, I fancy, than was for her own good. How very
charming! Will you play the character in regimentals or
in mohairin a modern or in an ancient dress?
In my
robe de chambre
, a little altered for the occasion,
unless St. Pinkster and his sports should suggest some
more appropriate costume, answered the young man
lightly.
Are you quite aware what feast Pinkster is? asked
Anneke, a little gravely.
Bulstrode actually changed colour, for it had never
crossed his mind to inquire into the character of the
holiday
;
and, to own the truth, the manner in which it is kept
Vol. I.9
by the negroes of New York, never would enlighten him
much on the subject.
That is information for which I perceive I am now
about to be indebted to Miss Mordaunt.
Then you shall not be disappointed, Mr. Bulstrode;
Pinkster is neither more nor less than the Festival of
Whitsunday
,
or the Feast of Pentecost. I suppose we shall now
hear no more of your saint.
Bulstrode took this little punishment, which was very
sweetly but quite steadily uttered, with perfect good-humour,
and with a manner so rebuked as to prove that Anneke
possessed great control over him. He bowed in submission,
and she smiled so kindly, that I wished the occasion for the
little pantomime had not occurred.
Our
ancestors, Miss Mordaunt, never heard of any
Pinkster, you will remember, and that must explain my
ignorance, he said meekly.
But some of
mine
have long understood it, and observed
the festival, answered Anneke.
Ay, on the side of Holland  but when I presume to
speak of
our
ancestors, I mean those which I can claim the
honour of boasting as belonging to me in common with
yourself.
Are you and Mr. Bulstrode, then, related? I asked, as
it might be involuntarily and almost too abruptly.
Anneke replied, however, in a way to show that she
thought the question natural for the circumstances, and not
in the least out of place.
My grandfather's mother, and Mr. Bulstrode's
grandfather
,
were brother and sister, was the quiet answer.
This makes us a sort of cousins, according to those Dutch
notions which he so much despises, though I fancy it would
not count for much at home.
Bulstrode protested to the contrary, stating that he knew
his father valued his relationship to Mr. Mordaunt, by the
earnest manner in which he had commanded him to
cultivate
the acquaintance of the family the instant he reached
New York. I saw by this, the footing on which the
formidable
Major was placed in the family, everybody seeming
to be related to Anneke Mordaunt but myself. I took an
occasion, that very evening, to question the dear girl on the
subject of her Dutch connections, giving her a clue to mine;
but with all our industry, and some assistance from Herman
Mordaunt, who took an interest in such a subject, as it
might be
ex officio
, we could make out no affinity worth
mentioning.
CHAPTER VII.
Sir Valentine, I care not for her, I.
I hold him but a fool, that will endanger
His body for a girl that loves him not.
I claim her not, and therefore she is thine.
Two Gentlemen of Verona
.
I saw
Anne Mordaunt several times, either in the street
or in her own house, between that evening and the day I
was to dine with her father. The morning of the last
named day Mr. Bulstrode favoured me with a call, and
announced
that he was to be of the party in Crown Street,
and that the whole company was to repair to the theatre, to
see his own Cato and Scrub, in the evening.
By giving yourself the trouble to call at the Crown and
Bible, kept hard-by here, in Hanover Square or Queen Street,
by honest Hugh Gaine, you will find a package of tickets
for yourself, Mr. and Mrs. Legge, and your relative Mr.
Dirck Follock, as I believe the gentleman is called. These
Dutch have extraordinary patronymics, you must admit,
Littlepage.
It may appear so to an Englishman, though our names
are quite as odd to strangers. But Dirck Van
Valkenburgh
is not a kinsman of mine, though he is related to the
Mordaunts,
your
relatives.
Well, it 's all the same! I knew he was related to
somebody that I know, and I fancied it was to yourself. I
am sure I never see him but I wish he was in our grenadier
company.
Dirck would do honour to any corps, but you know
how it is with the Dutch families, Mr. Bulstrode. They
still retain much of their attachment to Holland, and do not
as often take service in the army, or navy, as we of
English
descent.
I should have thought a century might have cooled
them off, a little, from their veneration of the meadows of
Holland. It is the opinion at home, that New York is a
particularly well affected colony.
So it is, as I hear from all sides. As respects the
Dutch, among ourselves, I have heard my grandfather say,
that the reign of King William had a powerful influence in
reconciling them to the new government, but, since his day,
that they are less loyal than formerly. The Van
Valkenburghs
,
notwithstanding, pass for as good subjects as any
that the house of Hanover possesses. On no account would
I injure them in your opinion.
Good or bad, we shall hope to see your friend, who is
a connection in some way, as you believe, of the
Mordaunts
.
You will get but a faint idea of what one of the
royal theatres is, Littlepage, by this representation of ours,
though it may serve to kill time. But, I must go to
rehearsal
;
we shall meet at three.
Here my gay and gallant major made his bow, and took
his leave. I proceeded on to the sign of the Crown and the
Bible, where I found a large collection of people, coming
in quest of tickets. As the
lite
of the town would not of
themselves form an audience sufficiently large to meet the
towering ambition of the players, more than half the tickets
were sold, the money being appropriated to the sick families
of soldiersthose who were not entitled to receive aid from
government. It was deemed a high compliment to receive
tickets gratis, though all who did, made it a point to leave
a donation to the fund, with Mr. Gaine. Receiving my
package, I quitted the shop, and it being the hour for the
morning promenade, I went up Wall Street, to the Mall, as
Trinity Church Walk was even then called. Here, I
expected
to meet Dirck, and hoped to see Anneke, for the
place was much frequented by the young and gay, both in
the mornings and in the evenings. The bands of different
regiments were stationed in the churchyard, and the
company
was often treated to much fine martial music. Some
few of the more scrupulous objected to this desecration of
the churchyard, but the army had everything pretty much
in its own way. As they were supposed to do nothing but
what was approved of at home, the dissenters were little
heeded, nor do I think the army would have greatly cared,
had they been more numerous.
I dare say there were fifty young ladies promenading the
church-walk when I reached it, and nearly as many young
men in attendance on them; no small portion of the last
being scarlet-coats, though the mohairs had their
representatives
there too. A few blue-jackets were among us also,
there being two or three king's cruisers in port. As no one
presumed to promenade the Mall, who was not of a certain
stamp of respectability, the company was all gaily dressed;
and I will confess that I was much struck with the air of
the place, the first time I showed myself among the gay
idlers. The impression made on me that morning was so
vivid, that I will endeavour to describe the scene, as it now
presents itself to my mind.
In the first place, there was the noble street, quite eighty
feet in width in its narrowest part, and gradually expanding
as you looked towards the bay, until it opened into an area
of more than twice that width, at the place called the
Bowling-Green
.
[12]
[12]
Mr. Cornelius Littlepage betrays not a little of provincial
admiration
,
as the reader will see. I have not thought it necessary to
prune these passages, their causes being too familiar to leave any
danger of their insertion's being misunderstood. Admiration of
Broadway, certainly not more than a third-class street, as streets
go in the old world, is so very common among us as to need no
apology.
Editor
.
Then came the Fort, crowning a sharp
eminence
,
and overlooking everything in that quarter of the
town. In the rear of the Fort, or in its front, taking a water
view, lay the batteries that had been built on the rocks
which form the south-western termination of the island.
Over these rocks, which were black and picturesque, and
over the batteries they supported, was obtained a view of
the noble bay, dotted here and there with some speck of a
sail, or possibly with some vessel anchored on its placid
bosom. Of the two rows of elegant houses, most of them
of brick, and with very few exceptions principally of two
9 *
stories in height, it is scarcely necessary to speak, as there
are few who have not heard of, and formed some notion of
Broadway; a street that all agree is one day to be the pride
of the western world.
In the other direction, I will admit that the view was not
so remarkable, the houses being principally of wood, and
of a somewhat ignoble appearance. Nevertheless the army
was said to frequent those habitations quite as much as they
did any other in the place. After reaching the Common, or
present Park, where the great Boston road led off into the
country, the view was just the reverse of that which was
seen in the opposite quarter. Here, all was inland, and
rural. It is true, the new Bridewell had been erected in
that quarter, and there was also a new gaol, both facing the
common; and the king's troops had barracks in their rear;
but high, abrupt, conical hills, with low marshy land,
orchards
and meadows, gave to all that portion of the island
a peculiarly novel and somewhat picturesque character.
Many of the hills in that quarter, and indeed all over the
widest part of the island, are now surmounted by
country-houses
,
as some were then, including Petersfield, the ancient
abode of the Stuyvesants, or that farm which, by being
called after the old Dutch governor's retreat, has given the
name of Bowery, or Bouerie, to the road that led to it; as
well as the Bowery-house, as it was called, the country
abode of the then Lieutenant Governor, James de Lancey;
Mount Bayard, a place belonging to that respectable family;
Mount Pitt, another that was the property of Mrs. Jones,
the wife of Mr. Justice Jones, a daughter of James de
Lancey
,
and various other mounts, houses, hills, and places,
that are familiar to the gentry and people of New York.
But, the reader can imagine for himself the effect
produced
by such a street as Broadway, reaching very nearly
half a mile in length, terminating at one end, in an
elevated
,
commanding Fort, with its back-ground of batteries,
rocks and bay, and, at the other, with the common, on
which troops were now constantly parading, the Bridewell
and gaol, and the novel scene I have just mentioned. Nor
is Trinity itself to be forgotten. This edifice, one of the
noblest, if not the most noble of its kind, in all the colonies,
with its gothic architecture, statues in carved stone, and
flanking walls, was a close accessory of the view, giving to
the whole grandeur, and a moral.
[13]
[13]
The provincial admiration of Mr. Cornelius Littlepage was not
quite as much in fault, as respects the church, as the superciliousness
of our more modern tastes and opinions may lead us to suspect. The
church that was burned in 1776, was a larger edifice than that just
pulled down, and, in many respects, was its superior.
Editor
.
As has been said, I found the Mall crowded with young
persons of fashion and respectability. This Mall was near
a hundred yards in length; and it follows that there must
have been a goodly show of youth and beauty. The fine
weather had commenced; spring had fairly opened;
Pinkster
Blossoms (the wild honeysuckle) had been seen in
abundance throughout the week; and everything and
person
appeared gay and happy.
I could discover that my person in this crowd attracted
attention as a stranger. I say as a stranger; for I am
unwilling
to betray so much vanity as to ascribe the manner
in which many eyes followed me, to any vain notion that I
was known or admired. Still, I will not so far disparage
the gifts of a bountiful Providence, as to leave the
impression
that my face, person, or air was particularly
disagreeable
.
This would not be the fact; and I have now reached
a time of life when something like the truth may be told,
without the imputation of conceit. My mother often boasted
to her intimates, that Corny was one of the best-made,
handsomest, most active, and genteelest youths in the
colony
.
This I know, for such things will leak out; but
mothers are known to have a remarkable weakness on the
subject of their children. As I was the sole surviving
offspring
of my dear mother, who was one of the best-hearted
women that ever breathed, it is highly probable that the
notions she entertained of her son partook largely of the
love she bore me. It is true, my aunt Legge, on more than
one occasion, has been heard to express a very similar
opinion; though nothing can be more natural than that
sisters should think alike, on a family matter of this
particular
nature, more especially as my aunt Legge never had
a child of her own to love and praise.
Let all this be as it may, well stared at was I, as I
mingled
among the idlers on Trinity Church Walk, on the
occasion named. As for myself, my own eyes were bent
anxiously on the face of every pretty, delicate young
creature
that passed, in the hope of seeing Anneke. I both
wished and dreaded to meet her; for, to own the truth, my
mind was dwelling on her beauty, her conversation, her
sentiments, her grace, her gentleness, and withal her spirit,
a good deal more than half the time. I had some qualms
on the subject of Dirck, I will confess; but Dirck was so
young, that his feelings could not be much interested, after
all; and then Anneke was a second cousin, and that was
clearly too near to marry. My grandfather had always put
his foot down firmly against any connection between
relations
that were nearer than
third
cousins; and I now saw
how proper were his reasons. If they were even farther
removed, so much the better, he said; and so much the
better it was.
If the reader should ask me why I
dreaded
to meet Anne
Mordaunt, under such circumstances, I might be at a loss to
give him a very intelligible answer. I feared even to see the
sweet face I sought; and oh! how soft, serene, and
angellike
it was, at that budding age of seventeen!but, though
I almost feared to see it, when at last I saw her I had so
anxiously sought, approaching me, arm and arm with Mary
Wallace, having Bulstrode next herself, and Harris next her
friend, my eyes were instantly averted, as if they had
unexpectedly
lighted on something disagreeable. I should have
passed without even the compliment of a bow, had not my
friends been more at their ease, and more accustomed to the
free ways of town life than I happened to be myself.
How's this, Cornelius,
Cur de Lion!
exclaimed
Bulstrode
,
stopping, thus causing the whole party to stop with
him, or to appear to wish to avoid me; will you not
recognise
us, though it is not an hour since you and I parted? I
hope you found the tickets; and when you have answered
`yes,' I hope you will turn and do me the honour to bow
to these ladies.
I apologized, I am afraid I blushed; for I detected Anneke
looking at me, as I thought, with some little concern, as if
she pitied my awkward country embarrassment. As for
Bulstrode, I did not understand him at that time; it
exceeding
my observation to be certain whether he considered me
of sufficient importance or not, to feel any concern on my
account, in his very obvious suit with Anneke. Nevertheless,
as he treated me with cordiality and respect, while he dealt
with me so frankly, there was not room to take offence.
Of course, I turned and walked back with the party, after
I had properly saluted the ladies and Mr. Harris.
Cur de Lion
is a better name for a soldier than for a
civilian; said Anneke, as we moved forward; and,
however
much Mr. Littlepage may
deserve
the title, I am not
certain, Mr. Bulstrode, he would not prefer leaving it among
you gentlemen who serve the king.
I am glad of this occasion, Mr. Littlepage, to enlist you
on my side, in a warfare I am compelled to wage with Miss
Anne Mordaunt, said the Major gaily. It is on the
subject
of the great merit of us poor fellows who have crossed
the wide Atlantic in order to protect the colonies, New York
among the number, and their people, Miss Mordaunt and
Miss Wallace inclusively, from the grasp of their wicked
enemies, the French. The former young lady has a way
of reasoning on the matter to which I cannot assent, and I
am willing to choose you as arbitrator between us.
Before Mr. Littlepage accept the office, it is proper he
should know its duties and responsibilities, said Anneke,
smiling. In the first place, he will find Mr. Bulstrode,
with loud professions of attachment to the colonies, much
disposed to think them provinces that owe their very
existence
to England; while I maintain it is English
men
, and
that it is not England, that have done so much in America.
As for New York, Mr. Littlepage, and especially as for you
and me, we can also say a word in favour of Holland. I
am very proud of my Dutch connections and Dutch descent.
I was much gratified with the as for you and me;
though I believe I cared less for Holland than she did
herself
.
I made an answer much in the vein of the moment;
but the conversation soon changed to the subject of the
military theatre that was about to open.
I shall dread you as a critic, cousin Annie, so Bulstrode
often termed Anneke, as I soon discovered; I find you are
not too well disposed to us of the cockade, and I think you
have a particular spite to our regiment. I know that Billings
and Harris, too, hold you in the greatest possible dread.
They then feel apprehensive of a very ignorant critic;
for I never was present at a theatrical entertainment in my
life, Anneke answered with perfect simplicity. So far
as I can learn, there never has been but one season of any
regular company, in this colony; and that was when I was
a very little and a very young girlas I am now neither
very large, nor very old as a young woman.
You see, Littlepage, with how much address my cousin
avoids adding, and `very uninteresting, and very ugly, and
very disagreeable, and very much unsought,' and fifty other
things she
might
add with such perfect truth and modesty!
But is it true, that the theatre was open only one season,
here?
So my father tells me, though I know very little of the
facts themselves. To-night will be my first appearance in
front
of any stage, Mr. Bulstrode, as I understand it will be
your first appearance
on
it.
In one sense the last will be true, though not altogether
in another. As a school-boy, I have often played,
school-boy
fashion; but this is quite a new thing with us, to be
amateur
players.
It may seem ungrateful, when you are making so many
efforts, principally to amuse us young ladies, I feel convinced,
to inquire if it be quite as wise as it is novel. I must ask
this, as a cousin, you know, Henry Bulstrode, to escape
entirely from the imputation of impertinence.
Really, Anneke Mordaunt, I am not absolutely certain
that it is. Our manners are beginning to change in this
respect, however, and I can assure you that various
noblemen
have permitted sports of this sort at their seats. The
custom is French, as you probably know, and whatever
is French has much vogue with us during times of peace.
Sir Harry does not altogether approve of it, and as for my
lady mother, she has actually dropped more than one
discouraging
hint on the subject in her letters.
The certain proof that you are a most dutiful son.
Perhaps when Sir Harry and Lady Bulstrode learn your
great success, however, they will overlook the field on which
your laurels have been won. But our hour has come,
Mary; we have barely time to thank these gentlemen for
their politeness, and to return in season to dress. I am to
enact a part myself, at dinner, as I hope you will all
remember
.
Saying this, Anneke made her curtsies in a way to
preclude
any offer of seeing her home, and went her way with
her silent but sensible-looking and pretty friend. Bulstrode
took my arm with an air of easy superiority, and led the
way towards his own lodgings, which happened to be in
Duke Street. Harris joined another party, making it a
point to be always late at dinner.
That is not only one of the handsomest, but she is one
of the most charming girls in the colonies, Littlepage! my
companion exclaimed, as soon as we had departed, speaking
at the same time with an earnestness and feeling I was far
from expecting. Were she in England, she would make
one of the first women in it, by the aid of a little fashion
and training; and very little would do too, for there is a
charm in her
naivet
that is worth the art of fifty women
of fashion.
Fashion is a thing that any one may want who does
not happen to be in vogue, I answered, notwithstanding
the great degree of surprise I felt. As for training, I can
see nothing but perfection in Miss Mordaunt as she is, and
should deprecate the lessons that produced any change.
I believe it was now Bulstrode's turn to feel surprise, for
I was conscious of his casting a keen look into my face,
though I did not like to return it. My companion was
silent for a minute; then, without again adverting to Anneke,
he began to converse very sensibly on the subject of
theatres
and plays. I was both amused and instructed, for Mr.
Bulstrode was an educated and a clever man; and a strange
feeling came over the spirit of my dream, even then, as I
listened to his conversation. This man, I thought, admires
Anne Mordaunt, and he will probably carry her with him
to England, and obtain for her that fashion and training of
which he has just spoken. With his advantages of birth,
air, fortune, education, and military rank, he can scarcely
fail in his suit, should be seriously attempt one; and it will
be no more than prudent to command my own feelings, lest
I become the hopeless victim of a serious passion. Young
as I was, all this I saw, and thus I reasoned; and when I
parted from my companion I fancied myself a much wiser
man than when we had met. We separated in Duke
Street, with a promise on my part to call at the Major's
lodgings half an hour later, after dressing, and walk with
him to Herman Mordaunt's door.
It is fortunate that it is the fashion of New York to
walk to a dinner party, said Bulstrode, as he again took
my arm on our way to Crown Street; for these narrow
streets must be excessively inconvenient for chariots, though
I occasionally see one of them. As for sedan chairs, I
detest them as things unfit for a man to ride in.
Many of our leading families keep carriages, and
they
seem to get along well enough, I answered.
Nevertheless
,
it is quite in fashion even for ladies to walk. I
understand
that many, perhaps most of your auditors, will walk
to the play-house door this evening.
They tell me as much, said Bulstrode, curling his lip,
a little, in a way I did not exactly like. Notwithstanding,
there will be many charming creatures among them, and they
shall be welcome. Well, Littlepage, I do not despair of
having you among us; for, to be candid, without wishing
to boast, I think you will find the th as liberal a set of
young men as there is in the service. There is a wish to
have the mohairs among us instead of shutting ourselves up
altogether in scarlet. Then your father and grandfather
have both served, and that will be a famous introduction.
I protested my unfitness for such an amusement, never
having seen such an exhibition in my life; but to this my
companion would not listen; and we picked our way, as well
as we could, through William Street, up Wall, and then by
Nassau into Crown; Herman Mordaunt owning a new
house, that stood not far from Braodway, in the latter street.
This was rather in a remote part of the town; but the
situation
had the advantage of good air; and, as a place
extends, it is necessary some persons should live on its
skirts.
I wish my good cousin did not live quite so much in the
suburbs, said Bulstrode, as he knocked in a very patrician
manner; it is not altogether convenient to go quite so
much out of one's ordinary haunts, in order to pay visits.
I wonder Mr. Mordaunt came so far out of the world, to
build.
Yet the distances of London must be much greater;
though
there
you have coaches.
True; but not a word more on
this
subject: I would
not have Anneke fancy I ever find it far to visit
her
.
We were the last but one; the trady Mr. Harris making
it a point always to be the last. We found Anneke
Mordaunt
supported by two or three ladies of her connection,
and a party of quite a dozen assembled. As most of those
present saw each other every day, and frequently two or
three times a day, the salutations and compliments were
soon over, and Herman Mordaunt began to look about him,
to see who was wanting.
I believe everybody is here but Mr. Harris, the father
observed to his daughter, interrupting some of Mr Bulstrode's
conversation, to let this fact be known. Shall we wait for
him, my dear; he is usually so uncertain and late?
Yet a very important man, put in Bulstrode, as being
entitled to lead the lady of the house to the table, in virtue
of his birthright. So much for being the fourth son of an
Irish baron! Do you know Harris's father has just been
ennobled?
This was news to the company; and it evidently much
increased the doubts of the propriety of sitting down without
the young man in question.
Failing of this son of a new Irish baron, I suppose you
fancy I shall be obliged to give my hand to the eldest son
of an English baronet, said Anneke, smiling, so as to take
off the edge of a little irony that I fancy just glimmered
in her manner.
I wish to Heaven you
would
, Anne Mordaunt,
whispered
Bulstrode, loud enough for me to hear him, so that
the heart were its companion!
I thought this both bold and decided; and I looked
anxiously
at Anneke, to note the effect; but she evidently
received
it as trifling, certainly betraying no emotion at a speech
I thought so pointed. I wished she had manifested a little
resentment. Then she was so very young to be thus
importuned
!
Dinner had better be served, sir, she calmly observed
to her father. Mr. Harris is apt to think himself ill-treated
if he do not find everybody at table. It would be a sign his
Vol. I.10
watch was wrong, and that he had come half an hour too
soon.
Herman Mordaunt nodded assent, and left his daughter's
side to give the necessary order.
I fancy Harris will regret this, said Bulstrode. I
wish I dared repeat what he had the temerity to say to me
on this very subject, no later than yesterday.
Of the propriety of so doing, Mr. Bulstrode must judge
for himself; though
repetitions
of this nature are usually
best avoided.
No, the fellow deserves it; so I will just tell you and
Mr. Littlepage in confidence. You must know, as his senior
in years, and his senior officer in the bargain, I was hinting
to Harris the inexpediency of always being so late at dinner;
and here is my gentleman's answer:`You know,' said he,
`that excepting my lord Loudon, the Commander-in-chief,
the Governor, and a few public officers, I shall now take
precedence of almost every man here; and I find, if I go
early to dinner, I shall have to hand in all the elderly ladies,
and to take my place at
their
sides; whereas, if I go a little
late, I can steal in alongside of their daughters.' Now, on
the present occasion, he will be altogether a loser, the lady
of the house not yet being quite fifty.
I had not given Mr. Harris credit for so much ingenuity,
said Anneke, quietly. But here he is to claim his rights.
Ay, the fellow has remembered
your
age, and quite
likely your
attractions!
Dinner was announced at that instant, and all eyes were
turned on Harris, in expectation that he would advance to
lead Anneke down stairs. The young man, even more
youthful than myself, had a good deal of
mauvaise honte;
for, though the son of an Irish peer, of two months' creation,
the family was not strictly Irish, and he had very little
ambition
to figure in this manner. From what I saw of him
subsequently, I do believe that nothing but a sense of duty
to his order made him respect these privileges of rank at all,
and that he would really just as soon go to a dinner-table
last, as first. In the present case, however, he was soon
relieved by Herman Mordaunt; who had been educated at
home, and understood the usages of the world very well.
Gentlemen, he said, I must ask you to waive the
privileges of rank in favour of Mr. Cornelius Littlepage,
to-day
.
This good company has met to do honour especially
to his courage and devotion to his fellow-creatures, and he
will do me the favour to hand Miss Mordaunt down stairs.
Herman Mordaunt then pointed out to the Hon. Mr.
Harris, the next lady of importance, and to Mr. Bulstrode
a third; after which all the rest took care of themselves.
As for myself, I felt my face in a glow, at this unexpected
order, and scarcely dared to look at Anneke as we led the
way to the dining-room door. So much abashed was I,
that I scarce touched the tips of her slender little fingers,
and a tremour was in the limb that performed this office, the
whole time it was thus employed. Of course, my seat was
next to that of the young and lovely mistress of the house,
at this banquet.
What shall I say of the dinner? It was the very first
entertainment of the sort at which I had ever been present;
though I had acquired some of the notions of town habits,
on such occasions, at my aunt Legge's table. To my
surprise
,
there was soup; a dish that I never saw at Satanstoe,
except in the most familiar way; while here it was taken by
every one, seemingly as a matter of course. Everything
was elegant, and admirably cooked. Abundance, however,
was the great feature of the feast; as I have heard it said,
is apt to be the case with most New York entertainments.
Nevertheless, I have always understood that, in the way of
eating and drinking, the American colonies have little reason
to be ashamed.
Could I have foreseen this dinner, Miss Mordaunt,
I said, when everybody was employed, and I thought there
was an opening to say something to my beautiful neighbour;
it would have made my father very happy to have sent a
sheepshead to town, for the occasion.
Anneke thanked me, and then we began to converse about
the game. Westchester was, and is still, famous for
partridges
,
snipe, quails, ducks, and meadow-larks; and I
understood expatiating on such a subject, as well as the best
of them. All the Littlepages were shots; and I have known
my father bag ten brace of woodcock, among the wet thickets
of Satanstoe, of a morning; and this with merely a second
class dog, and only one. Both Bulstrode and Harris listened
to what I said on this subject with great attention, and it
would soon have been the engrossing discourse, had not
Anneke pleasantly said
All very well, gentlemen; but you will remember that
neither Miss Wallace, nor I, shoot.
Except with the arrows of Cupid, answered Bulstrode,
gaily; with these you do so much execution
between you
,
emphasizing the words, so as to make me look foolish, for I
sat between them, that you ought to be condemned to hear
nothing but fowling conversation for the next year.
This produced a laugh, a little at my expense, I believe;
though I could see that Anneke blushed, while Mary Wallace
smiled indifferently; but as the healths now began, there
was a truce to trifling. And a serious thing it is, to drink
to everybody by name, at a large table; serious I mean to
a new beginner. Yet, Herman Mordaunt went through it
with a grace and dignity, that I think would have been
remarked
at a royal banquet. The ladies acquitted themselves
admirably, omitting no one; and even Harris felt the
necessity
of being particular with this indispensable part of
good-breeding. So well done was this part of the ceremony,
that I declare, I believe everybody had drunk to everybody,
within five minutes after Herman Mordaunt commenced; and
it was very apparent that there was more ease and true
gaiety
after
all had got through, than there had previously
been.
But the happy period of every dinner-party, is after the
cloth is removed. With the dark polished mahogany for a
background, the sparkling decanters making their rounds, the
fruit and cake baskets, the very scene seems to inspire
one with a wish for gaiety. Herman Mordaunt called for
toasts, as soon as the cloth disappeared, with a view I
believe
of putting everybody at ease, and to render the
conversation
more general. He was desired to set the example,
and immediately gave Miss Markham, who, as I was
told, was a single lady of forty, with whom he had carried
on a little flirtation. Anneke's turn came next, and she
chose to give a sentiment, notwithstanding all Bulstrode's
remonstrances, who insisted on a gentleman. He did not
succeed, however; Anneke very steadily gave The
Thespian
corps of the th; may it prove as successful in the
arts of peace, as in its military character it has often proved
itself to be in the art of war. Much applause followed
this toast, and Harris was persuaded by Bulstrode to stand
up, and say a few words, for the credit of the regiment.
Such a speech!It reminded me of the horse that was
advertised
as a show, in London, about this time, and which
was said `to have its tail where its head ought to be.' But,
Bulstrode clapped his hands, and cried `hear,' at every other
word, protesting that the regiment was honoured as much
in the thanks, as in the sentiment. Harris did not seem
displeased with his own effort, and, presuming on his rank,
he drank, without being called on, to the fair of New
York; eminent alike for beauty and wit, may they only
become as merciful as they are victorious.
Bravo! again cried Bulstrode,Harris is fairly
inspired
,
and is growing better and better. Had he said
imminent
,
instead of eminent, it would be more accurate, as
their frowns are as threatening, as their smiles are
bewitching
.
Is that to pass for
your
sentiment, Mr. Bulstrode, and
are we to drink it? demanded Herman Mordaunt.
By no means, sir; I have the honour to give Lady
Dolly Merton.
Who Lady Dolly was, nobody knew, I believe, though
we of the colonies always drank a titled person, who was
known to be at home, with a great deal of respectful
attention
,
not to say veneration. Other toasts followed, and
then the ladies were asked to sing. Anneke complied,
with very little urging, as became her position, and never
did I hear sweeter strains than those she poured forth! The
air was simple, but melody itself, and the sentiment had
just enough of the engrossing feeling of woman in it, to
render it interesting, without in the slightest degree
impairing
its fitness for the virgin lips from which it issued.
Bulstrode
,
I could see, was almost entranced; and I heard him
murmur an angel, by Heavens! He sang, himself, a
love song, full of delicacy and feeling, and in a way to show
that he had paid much attention to the art of music. Harris
sang, too, as did Mary Wallace; the former, much as he
spoke; the last plaintively, and decidedly well. Even
Herman
Mordaunt gave us a strain, and my turn followed.
10 *
Singing was somewhat of a
forte
with me, and I have
reason
to think I made out quite as well as the best of them.
I know that Anneke seemed pleased, and I saw tears in her
eyes, as I concluded a song that was intended to produce
just such an effect.
At length the youthful mistress of the house arose,
reminding
her father that he had at table the principal
performer
of the evening, by way of a caution, when three or
four of us handed the ladies to the drawing-room door.
Instead
of returning to the table, I entered the room, and
Bulstrode
did the same, under the plea of its being necessary
for him to drink no more, on account of the work before
him.
CHAPTER VIII.
Odd's bodikins, man, much better: use
Every man after his desert, and who shall 'scape
Whipping? use them after your own honour
And dignity: the less they deserve, the more
Merit is in your bounty.
Hamlet
.
Harris
will be
hors de combat
, Bulstrode soon
observed
,
unless I can manage to get him from the table.You
know he is to play Marcia this evening; and, though a
little
wine will give him fire and spirit for the part, too much will
impair its feminine beauties. Addison never intended that
`the virtuous Marcia,' in towering above her sex, was to be
picked out of a kennel, or from under a table. Harris is a
true Irish peer, when claret is concerned.
All the ladies held up their hands, and protested against
Mr. Harris' being permitted to act a travestie on their sex.
As yet, no one had known how the characters were to be
cast, beyond the fact that Bulstrode himself was to play
Cato, for great care had been taken to keep the bills of the
night from being seen, in order that the audience might
have the satisfaction of finding out, who was who, for
themselves
.
At the close of each piece a bill was to be sent
round, among the favoured few, telling the truth. As
Anneke
declared that her father never locked in his guests,
and had faithfully promised to bring up everybody for
coffee, in the course of half an hour, it was determined to
let things take their own way.
Sure enough, at the end of the time mentioned, Herman
Mordaunt appeared, with all the men, from the table. Harris
was not tipsy, as I found was very apt to be the case with
him after dinner, but neither was he sober. According to
Bulstrode's notion, he may have had just fire enough to play
the `virtuous Marcia.' In a few minutes he hurrried the
ensign off, declaring that, like Hamlet's ghost, their hour
had come. At seven, the whole party left the house in a
body to walk to the theatre. Herman Mordaunt did not
keep a proper town equipage, and, if he had, it would not
have contained a fourth of our company. In this, however,
we were not singular, as nine in ten of the audience that
night, I mean nine in ten of the gentle sex, went to the
theatre on foot.
Instead of going directly down Crown Street, into Maiden
Lane, which would have been the nearest way to the theatre,
we went out into Broadway, and round by Wall Street, the
walking being better, and the gutters farther from the ladies;
the centre of the street being at no great distance from the
houses, in the narrower passages of the town. We found
a great many well-dressed people moving in the same
direction
with ourselves. Herman Mordaunt remarked that he
had never before seen so many hoops, cardinals, cocked
hats and swords in the streets, at once, as he saw that
evening
.
All the carriages in town rolled past us as we went
down Wall Street, and by the time we reached William
Street, the pavements resembled a procession, more than
anything else. As every one was in full dress, the effect
was pleasing, and the evening being fine, most of the
gentlemen
carried their hats in their hands, in order not to
disturb their curls, thus giving to the whole the air of a sort
of vast drawing-room. I never saw a more lovely creature
than Anneke Mordaunt appeared, as she led our party, on
this occasion. The powder had got a little out of her fine
auburn hair, and on the part of the head that was not
concealed
by a cap, that shaded half her beautiful face, it seemed
as if the rich covering bestowed by nature was about to
break out of all restraint, and shade her bust with its
exuberance
.
Her neglige was a rich satin, flounced in front,
while the lace that dropped from her elbows seemed as if
woven by fairies, expressly for a fairy to wear. She had
paste buckles in her shoes, and I thought I had never beheld
such a foot, as was occasionally seen peeping from beneath
her dress, while she walked daintily, yet with the grace of
a queen, at my side. I do not thus describe Anneke with a
view of inducing the reader to fancy her stately and
repulsive
;
on the contrary, winning ease and natural grace were
just as striking in her manner, as were beauty, and
sentiment
,
and feeling in her countenance. More than once, as
we walked side by side, did I become painfully conscious
how unworthy I was to fill the place I occupied. I believe
this humility is one of the surest signs of sincere love.
At length we reached the theatre, and were permitted to
enter. All the front seats were occupied by blacks,
principally
in New York liveries; that is to say, with cuffs,
collars and pocket-flaps of a cloth different from the coat,
though a few were in lace. These last belonged to the
topping
families, several of which gave colours and ornaments
almost as rich as those that I understand are constantly
given at home. I well remember that two entire boxes
were retained by servants, in shoulder-knots, and much
richer dresses than common, one of whom belonged to the
Lt. Governor, and the other to my Lord Loudon, who was
then Commander-In-Chief. As the company entered, these
domestics disappeared, as is usual, and we all took our seats
on the benches thus retained for us. Bulstrode's care was
apparent in the manner in which he had provided for
Anneke, and her party, which, I will take it on myself to
say, was one of the most striking, for youth and good looks,
that entered the house that evening.
Great was the curiosity, and deep the feeling, that
prevailed
,
among the younger portion of the audience in
particular
,
as party after party was seated, that important
evening. The house was ornamented as a theatre, and I
thought it vast in extent; though Herman Mordaunt assured
me it was no great things, in that point of view, as com
pared with most of the playhouses at home. But the
ornaments
,
and the lights, and the curtain, the pit, the boxes,
the gallery, were all so many objects of intense interest.
Few of us said anything; but our eyes wandered over all
with a species of delight, that I am certain can be felt in a
theatre only once. Anneke's sweet face was a picture of
youthful expectation; an expectation, however, in which
intelligence and discretion had their full share. The
orchestra
was said to have an undue portion of wind instruments
in it; though I perceived ladies all over the house,
including
those in our own box, returning the bows of many of
the musicians, who, I was told, were
amateurs
from the
army and the drawing-rooms of the town.
At length the Commander-In-Chief and the Lt. Governor
entered together, occupying the same box, though two had
been provided, their attendants having recourse to the
second. The commotion produced by these arrivals had
hardly subsided, when the curtain arose, and a new world
was presented to our view! Of the playing, I shall not
venture to say much; though to me it seemed perfection.
Bulstrode gained great applause that night; and I
understand
that divers gentlemen, who had either been educated
at home, or who had passed much time there, declared that
his Cato would have done credit to either of the royal
theatres. His dress appeared to me to be everything it
should be; though I cannot describe it. I remember that
Syphax wore the uniform of a colonel of dragoons, and Juba,
that of a general officer; and that there was a good deal of
criticism expended, and some offence taken, because the
gentlemen who played these parts came out in wool, and
with their faces blacked. It was said, in answer to these
feelings, that the characters were Africans; and that any
one might see, by casting his eyes at the gallery, that
Africans
are usually black, and that they have woolly hair; a
sort of proof that, I imagine, only aggravated the offence.
[14]
[14]
In England, Othello is usually played as a black, while in
America
he is played as a nondescript; or of no colour that is ordinarily
seen. It is not clear that England is nearer right than America,
however; the Moor not being a negro, any more than he is of the
colour of a dried herring.
Editor
.
Apart from this little mistake, everything went off well, even
to Harris's Marcia. It is true, that some evil-inclined
persons
whispered that the virtuous Marcia was a little
how-came-you-so
;
but Bulstrode afterwards assured me that his
condition helped him along amazingly, and that it added a
liquid lustre to his eyes, that might otherwise have been
wanting. The high-heeled shoes appeared to trouble him;
but some persons fancied it gave him a pretty tottering in
his walk, that added very much to the deception. On the
whole, the piece went off surprisingly, as I could see by
Lord Loudon and the Lt. Governor, both of whom seemed
infinitely diverted. Herman Mordaunt smiled once or twice,
when he ought to have looked grave; but this I ascribed to
a want of practice, of late years, in scenic representations.
He certainly was a man of judgment, and must have known
the proper moments to exhibit particular emotions.
During the interval between the play and the farce, the
actors came among us, to receive the homage they merited,
and loud were the plaudits that were bestowed on them.
Anneke's bright eyes sparkled with pleasure as she admitted,
without reserve, to Bulstrode the pleasure she had received,
and confessed she had formed no idea, hitherto, of the
beauty and power of a theatrical representation, aided as
was this, by the auxiliaries of lights, dress and scenery.
It is true, the women had been a little absurd, and the
virtuous
Marcia particularly so; but the fine sentiments of
Addison, which, though as Herman Mordaunt observed, they
had all the accuracy and all the stiffness of a pedantic age,
were sufficiently beautiful and just, to cover the
delinquencies
of the Hon. Mr. Harris. She hoped the after-piece
would be of the same general character, that they might all
enjoy it as much as they had the play itself.
The other young ladies were equally decided in their
praise, though it struck me that Anneke
felt
the most, on
the occasion. That the Major had obtained a great
advantage
by his efforts, I could not but see; and the folly of my
having any pretensions with one who was courted by such a
rival, began to impress itself on my imagination with a force
I found painful. But the bell soon summoned away the
gallant actors, in order to dress for the farce.
The long interval that occurred between the two pieces,
gave ample opportunity for visiting one's acquaintances, and
to compare opinions. I went to my aunt's box, and found
her well satisfied, though less animated than the younger
ladies, in the expression of her pleasure. My uncle was
altogether himself; good-natured, but not disposed to award
any indiscreet amount of praise.
Pretty well for boys, Corny, he said, though the
youngster who acted Marcia had better been at school. I
do not know his name, but he completely took all the
virtue
out of Marcia. He must have studied her character
from some of the ladies who follow the camp.
My dear uncle, how differently you think from all in
our box! That gentleman is the Hon. Mr. Harris, who is
only eighteen, and has a pair of colours in the th, and is
a son of Lord Ballybannon, or Bally-something else, and is
said to have the softest voice in the army!
Ay, and the softest head, too, I 'll answer for it. I tell
you, Corny, the Hon. Mr. Ballybilly, who is only eighteen,
and has a pair of colours in the th, and the softest voice
in the army, had better been at school, instead of
undermining
the virtue of the `virtuous Marcia,' as he has so
obviously done. Bulstrode did well enough; capitally well,
for an amateur, and must be a first-rate fellow. By the
way, Janethat was my aunt's namethey tell me, he
is likely to marry that exceedingly pretty daughter of
Herman
Mordaunt, and make her Lady Bulstrode, one of these
days.
Why not, Mr. Legge?Anne Mordaunt is as sweet a
girl as there is in the colony, and is very respectably
connected
.
They even say the Mordaunts are of a high family
at home. Mary Wallace told me that Herman Mordaunt
and Sir Henry Bulstrode are themselves related; and you
know, my dear, how intimate the Mordaunts and the
Wallaces
are?
Not I;I know nothing of their intimacies, though I
dare say it may be all true. Mordaunt's father was an
English gentleman of some family, I have always heard,
though he was as poor as a church-mouse, when he
married
one of our Dutch heiresses; and as for Herman
Mordaunt
himself, he proved he had not lost the instinct by
marrying another, though she did not happen to be Dutch.
Here comes Anneke to inherit it all, and I 'll answer for it
that care is had that she shall marry an heir.
Well, Mr. Bulstrode is an heir, and the eldest son of a
baronet. I am always pleased when one of our girls makes
a good connection at home, for it does the colony credit.
It is an excellent thing, Corny, to have our interest well
sustained at homeespecially before the Privy Council, they
tell me.
Well, I am not, answered my uncle. I think it more
to the credit of the colony for its young women to take up
with its young men, and its young men with its young
women. I wish Anne Mordaunt had been substituted for
the Hon. Ballyshannon to-night. She would have made a
thousand times better `virtuous Marcia.
You surely would not have had a young lady of
respectability
appear in public, in this way, Mr. Legge.
My uncle said something to this, for he seldom let Jane
get the better of it for want of an answer; but as I left
the box, I did not hear his reply. It seemed then to be
settled, in the minds of most persons, that Bulstrode was to
marry Anneke! I cannot describe the new shock this
opinion gave me; but it seemed to make me more fully
sensible of the depth of the impression that had been made
on myself, in the intercourse of a single week. The effect
was such that I did not return to the party I had left, but
sought a seat in a distant part of the theatre, though one in
which I could distinctly see those I had abandoned.
The Beaux Stratagem soon commenced, and Bulstrode
was again seen in the character of Scrub. Those who
were most familiar with the stage, pronounced his playing
to be excellentfar better in the footman than in the Roman
Senator. The play itself struck me as being as broad and
coarse as could be tolerated; but as it had a reputation at
home, where it had a great name, our matrons did not dare
to object to it. I was glad to see the smiles soon disappear
from Anneke's face, however, and to discover that
she
found
no pleasure in scenes so unsuited to her sex and years.
The short, quick glances that were exchanged between
Anneke
and Mary Wallace, did not escape me, and the manner
in which they both rose, as soon as the curtain dropped,
told quite plainly the haste they were in to quit the theatre.
I reached their box-door in time to assist them through the
crowd.
Not a word was said by any of us, until we reached the
street, where two or three of Miss Mordaunt's female friends
became loud in the expression of their satisfaction. Neither
Anneke nor Mary Wallace said anything, and so well did
I understand the nature of their feelings, that I made no
allusion whatever to the farce. As for the others, they did
but chime in with what appeared to be the common opinion,
and were to be pitied rather than condemned. It was
perhaps
the more excusable in them to imagine such a play
right, masmuch as they must have known it was much
extolled
at home, a fact that gave any custom a certain
privilege
in the colonies. A mother country has much of the
same responsibility as a natural mother, herself, since its
opinions and example are apt to be quoted in the one case
by the dependant, in justification of its own opinions and
conduct, as it is by the natural offspring in the other.
I fancy, notwithstanding, this sort of responsibility gives
the ministers or people of England very little trouble, since
I never could discover any sensitiveness to their duties on
this score. We all went in at Herman Mordaunt's, after
walking to the house as we had walked from it, and were
made to take a light supper, including some delicious
chocolate
.
Just as we sat down to table, Bulstrode joined us, to
receive the praises he had earned, and to enjoy his triumph.
He got a seat directly opposite to mine, on Anneke's left
hand, and soon began to converse.
In the first place, he cried, you must all admit that
Tom Harris did wonders to-night as Miss Marcia Cato. I
had my own trouble with the rogue, for there is no
precedent
for a tipsy Marcia; but we managed to keep him
straight, and that was the nicest part of my management,
let me assure you.
Yes, observed Herman Mordaunt, drily; I should
think keeping Tom Harris straight, after dinner, an exploit
of no little difficulty, but a task that would demand a very
judicious management, indeed.
You were pleased to express your satisfaction with the
performance of Cato. Miss Mordaunt, said Bulstrode, in a
Vol. I.  11
very deferential and solicitous manner; but I question if
the entertainment gave you as much pleasure?
It certainly did not. Had the representation ended with
the first piece, I am afraid I should too much regret that we
are without a regular stage; but the farce will take off much
of the keenness of such regrets.
I fear I understand you, cousin Anne, and greatly
regret that we did not make another choice, returned
Bulstrode
,
with a humility that was not usual in his manner,
even when addressing Anneke Mordaunt; but I can assure
you the play has great vogue at home; and the character of
Scrub, in particular, has usually been a prodigious favourite.
I see by your look, however, that enough has been said;
but after having done so much to amuse this good company,
to-night, I shall feel authorised to call on every lady present,
at least for a song, as soon as the proper moment arrives.
Perhaps I have a right to add, a sentiment, and a toast.
And songs, and toasts, and sentiments, we had, as usual,
the moment we had done eating. It was, and indeed
is
,
rather more usual to indulge in this innocent gaiety after
supper, than after dinner, with us; and that night everybody
entered into the feeling of the moment with spirit. Herman
Mordaunt gave Miss Markham, as he had done at dinner,
and this with an air so determined, as to prove no one else
would ever be got out of
him
.
There is a compact between Miss Markham and myself,
to toast each other for the remainder of our lives, cried the
master of the house, laughing; and we are each too honest
ever to violate it.
But Miss Mordaunt is under no such engagement, put
in a certain Mr. Benson, who had manifested much interest
in the beautiful young mistress of the house throughout the
day; and I trust we shall not be put off by any such
excuse
from her.
It is not in rule to ask two of the same race for toasts
in succession, answered Herman Mordaunt. There is Mr.
Bulstrode dying to give us another English belle.
With all my heart, said Bulstrode, gaily. This time
it shall be Lady Betty Boddington.
Married or single, Bulstrode? inquired Billings, as I
thought with some little point.
No matter which, so long as she be a beauty and a
toast. I believe it is now my privilege to call on a lady,
and I beg a gentleman from Miss Wallace.
There had been an expression of pained surprise, at the
trifling between Billings and Bulstrode, in Anneke's sweet
countenance; for, in the simplicity of our provincial habits,
we of the colonies did not think it exactly in rule for the
single to toast the married, or
vice vers;
but the instant
her friend was thus called on, it changed for a look of
gentle
concern. Mary Wallace manifested no concern,
however
,
but gave Mr. Francis Fordham.
Ay, Frank Fordham, with all my heart, cried Herman
Mordaunt. I hope he will return to his native country as
straight-forward, honest, and good as he left it.
Mr. Fordham is then abroad? inquired Bulstrode. I
thought the name new to me.
If being at home can be called being abroad. He is
reading law at the Temple.
This was the answer of Mary Wallace, who looked as if
she felt a friendly interest in the young Templar, but no
more. She now called on Dirck for his lady. Throughout
the whole of that day, Dirck's voice had hardly been heard;
a reserve that comported well enough with his youth and
established diffidence. This appeal, however, seemed
suddenly
to arouse all that there was of manhood in him; and
that was not a little, I can tell the reader, when there was
occasion to use it. Dirck's nature was honesty itself; and
he felt that the appeal was too direct, and the occasion too
serious, to admit of duplicity. He loved but one, esteemed
but one, felt for one only; and it was not in his nature to
cover his preference by any attempt at deception. After
colouring to the ears, appearing distressed, he made an effort,
and pronounced the name ofAnneke Mordaunt.
A common laugh rewarded this blunder; common with
all but the fair creature who had extorted this involuntary
tribute, and myself, who knew Dirck's character too well
not to understand how very much he must be in earnest
thus to lay bare the most cherished secret of his heart.
The mirth continued some time, Herman Mordaunt
appearing
to be particularly pleased, and applauding his kinsman's
directness with several `bravos' very distinctly uttered. As
for Anneke, I saw she looked touched, while she looked
concerned, and as if she would be glad to have the thing
undone.
After all, Dirck, much as I admire your spirit and
plain dealing, boy, cried Herman Mordaunt, Miss
Wallace
can never let such a toast pass. She will insist on
having another.
I!I protest I am well pleased with it, and ask for no
other, exclaimed the lady in question. No toast can be
more agreeable to me than Anneke Mordaunt, and I
particularly
like the quarter from which this comes.
If friends can be trusted in a matter of this nature,
put in Bulstrode, with a little pique, Mr. Follock has every
reason to be contented. Had I known, however, that the
customs of New York allowed a lady who is present to be
toasted, that gentleman would not have had the merit of
being the first to make this discovery.
Nor is it, said Herman Mordaunt; and Dirck must
hunt up another to supply my daughter's place.
But no other was forthcoming from the stores of Dirck
Follock's mind. Had he a dozen names in reserve, not one
of them would he have produced under circumstances that
might seem like denying his allegiance to the girl already
given; but he
could
not name any other female. So, after
some trifling, the company attributing Dirck's hesitation to
his youth and ignorance of the world, abandoned the
attempt
,
desiring him to call on Anneke herself for a toast in
turn.
Cousin
Dirck Van Valkenburgh, said Anneke, with
the greater self-possession and ease of her sex, though
actually my friend's junior by more than two years; laying
some emphasis, at the same time, on the word
cousin
.
There! exclaimed Dirck, looking exultingly at
Bulstrode
;
you see, gentlemen and ladies, that
it
is permitted
to toast a person present, if you happen to respect and
esteem that person!
By which, sir, we are to understand how much Miss
Mordaunt respects and esteems Mr. Dirck Van Valkenburgh,
answered Bulstrode gravely. I am afraid there is only
too much justice in an opinion that might, at the first blush,
seem to savour of self-love.
An imputation I am far from denying, returned
Anneke, with a steadiness that showed wonderful
self-command
,
did she really return any of Dirck's attachment.
My kinsman gives me as his toast, and I give him as mine.
Is there anything unnatural in that?
Here there was an outbreak of raillery at Anneke's
expense
,
which the young lady bore with a calmness and
composure that at first astonished me. But when I came to
reflect that she had been virtually at the head of her father's
house for several years, and that she had always associated
with persons older than herself, it appeared more natural;
for it is certain we can either advance or retard the
character
by throwing a person into intimate association with those
who, by their own conversation, manners, or acquirements,
are most adapted for doing either. In a few minutes the
interruption was forgotten by those who had no interest in
the subject, and the singing commenced. I had obtained so
much credit by my attempt at dinner, that I had the
extreme
gratification of being asked to sing another song by
Anneke herself. Of course I complied, and I thought the
company seemed pleased. As for my young hostess, I
knew she looked more gratified with my song than with the
afterpiece, and that I felt to be something. Dirck had an
occasion to renew a little of the ground lost by the toast,
for he sang a capital comic song in Low Dutch. It is true,
not half the party understood him, but the other half laughed
until the tears rolled down their cheeks, and there was
something so droll in my friend's manner, that everybody
was delighted. The clocks struck twelve before we
broke up.
I staid in town but a day or two longer, meeting my new
acquaintances every day, and sometimes twice a-day,
however
,
on Trinity Church Walk. I paid visits of leave-taking
with a heavy heart, and most of all to Anneke and her
father.
I understood from Follock, said Herman Mordaunt,
when I explained the object of my call, that you are to
leave town to-morrow. Miss Mordaunt and her friend, Miss
Wallace, go to Lilacsbush this afternoon; for it is high time
to look after the garden and the flowers, many of which are
now in full bloom. I shall join them in the evening; and I
11 *
propose that you, young men, take a late breakfast with us,
on your way to Westchester. A cup of coffee before you
start, and getting into your saddle at six, will bring all
right. I promise you that you shall be on the road again
by one, which will give you plenty of time to reach
Satanstoe
before dark.
I looked at Anneke, and fancied that the expression of
her countenance was favourable. Dirck left everything to
me, and I accepted the invitation. This arrangement
shortened my visit in Crown Street, and I left the house
with a lighter heart than that with which I had entered it.
It is always so agreeable to get an unpleasant duty deferred!
Next day Dirck and I were in the saddle at six precisely,
and we rode through the streets just as the blacks were
washing down their stoops and side-walks; though there
were but very few of the last, in my youth. This is a
commodious improvement, and one that it is not easy to see
how the ladies could dispense with, and which is now getting
to be pretty common; all the new streets, I see, being
provided
with the convenience.
It was a fine May morning, and the air was full of the
sweet fragrance of the lilac, in particular, as we rode into
the country. Just as we got into the Bowery Lane, a
horseman
was seen walking out of one of the by-streets, and
coming our way. He no sooner caught sight of two
travellers
going in his own direction, than he spurred forward to
join us; being alone, and probably wishing company. As
it would have been churlish to refuse to travel in company
with one thus situated, we pulled up, walking our horses
until the stranger joined us; when, to our surprise, it turned
out to be Jason Newcome. The pedagogue was as much
astonished when he recognised us, as we were in recognising
him; and I believe he was a little disappointed; for Jason
was so fond of making acquaintances, that it was always a
pleasure to him to be thus employed. It appeared that he
had been down on the island to visit a relative, who had
married and settled in that quarter; and this was the reason
we had not met since the morning of the affair of the lion.
Of course we trotted on together, neither glad nor sorry at
having this particular companion.
I never could explain the process by means of which
Jason wound his way into everybody's secrets. It is true,
he had no scruples about asking questions; putting those
which most persons would think forbidden by the usages of
society, with as little hesitation as those which are
universally
permitted. The people of New England have a
reputation
this way; and I remember to have heard Mr. Worden
account for the practice in the following way: Everything
and everybody was brought under rigid church government
among the Puritans; and, when a whole community gets
the notion that it is to sit in judgment on every act of
one of its members, it is quite natural that it should extend
that right to an inquiry into all his affairs. One thing is
certain; our neighbours of Connecticut do assume a control
over the acts and opinions of individuals that is not dreamed
of in New York; and I think it very likely that the practice
of pushing inquiry into private things, has grown up under
this custom.
As one might suppose, Jason, whenever baffled in an
attempt
to obtain knowledge by means of inquiries, more or less
direct, sought to advance his ends through conjectures;
taking
those that were the most plausible, if any such could be
found, but putting up with those that had not even this
questionable
recommendation, if nothing better offered. He
was, consequently, for ever falling into the grossest errors,
for, necessarily making his conclusions on premises drawn
from his own ignorance and inexperience, he was liable to
fall into serious mistakes at the very outset. Nor was this
the worst; the tendency of human nature not being very
directly to charity, the harshest constructions were sometimes
blended with the most absurd blunders, in his mind, and I
have known him to be often guilty of assertions, that had
no better foundation than these conjectures, which might
have subjected him to severe legal penalties.
On the present occasion, Jason was not long in
ascertaining
where we were bound. This was done in a
manner
so characteristic and ingenious, that I will attempt to
relate it.
Why, you're out early, this morning, gentlemen!
exclaimed
Jason, affecting surprise. What in natur' has
started you off before breakfast?
So as to be certain not to lose our suppers at Satanstoe,
this evening, I answered.
Suppers? why, you will almost reach home (Jason
would
call this word
hum
) by dinner-time; that is, your
York dinner-time. Perhaps you mean to call by the way?
Perhaps we do, Mr. Newcome; there are many pleasant
families between this and Satanstoe.
I know there be. There 's the great Mr. Van
Cortlandt's
at Yonker's; perhaps you mean to stop there?
No, sir; we have no such intention.
Then there's the rich Count Philips's, on the river;
that would be no great matter out of the way?
It 's farther than we intend to turn.
Oh! so you
do
intend to turn a bit aside! Well, there's
that Mr. Mordaunt, whose daughter you pulled out of the
lion's paws;he has a house near King's-Bridge, called
Lilacsbush.
And how did you ascertain that, Jason?
By asking. Do you think I would let such a thing
happen, and not inquire a little about the young lady?
Nothing
is ever lost by putting a few questions, and inquiring
round; and I did not forget the rule in her case.
And you ascertained that the young lady's father has a
place called Lilacsbush, in this neighbourhood?
I did; and a queer York fashion it is to give a house a
name, just as you would a Christian being; that must be a
Roman Catholic custom, and some way connected with
idolatry
.
Out of all doubt. It is far better to say, for instance,
that we are going to breakfast at Mr. Mordaunt's-es-es, than
to say we intend to stop at Lilacsbush.
Oh! you be, be you? Well, I thought it would turn out
that some such place must have started you off so early. It
will be a desperate late breakfast, Corny!
It will be at ten o'oclock, Jason, and that is rather later
than common; but our appetites will be so much the better.
To this Jason assented, and then commenced a series of
manuvres to be included in the party. This we did not
dare to do, however, and all Jason's hints were disregarded,
until, growing desperate by our evasions, he plumply
proposed
to go along, and we as plumply told him we would
take no such liberty with a man of Herman Mordaunt's
years, position and character. I do not know that we
should have hesitated so much had we considered Jason a
gentleman, but this was impossible. The custom of the
colony admitted of great freedom in this respect, being very
different from what it is at home, by all accounts, in these
particulars; but there was always an understanding that the
persons one brought with him should be of a certain stamp
and class in life; recommendations to which Jason Newcome
certainly had no claim.
The case was getting to be a little embarrassing, when
the appearance of Herman Mordaunt himself, fortunately
removed the difficulty. Jason was not a man to be thrown
off very easily; but here was one who had the power, and
who showed the disposition to set things right. Herman
Mordaunt had ridden down the road a mile or two to meet
us, intending to lead us by a private and shorter way to his
residence, than that which was already known to us. He
no sooner saw that Jason was of our company, than he
asked that as a favour, which our companion would very
gladly have accepted as a boon.
CHAPTER IX.
I question'd Love, whose early ray
So heavenly bright appears;
And love, in answer, seem'd to say,
His light was dimm'd by tears.
Heber
.
It
was not long after the explanation occurred, as respects
Jason, and the invitation was given to include him in our
party, before Herman Mordaunt opened a gate, and led the
way into the fields. A very tolerable road conducted us
through some woods, to the heights, and we soon found
ourselves
on an eminence, that overlooked a long reach of the
Hudson, extending from Haverstraw, to the north, as far as
Staten Island, to the south; a distance of near forty miles.
On the opposite shore, rose the wall-like barrier of the
Palisadoes
,
lifting the table-land, on their summits, to an
elevation
of several hundred feet. The noble river, itself, fully
three-quarters of a mile in width, was unruffled by a breath
of air, lying in one single, extended, placid sheet, under the
rays of a bright sun, resembling molten silver. I scarce
remember a lovelier morning; everything appearing to
harmonize
with the glorious but tranquil grandeur of the view,
and the rich promises of a bountiful nature. The trees were
mostly covered with the beautiful clothing of a young
verdure
;
the birds had mated, and were building in nearly
every tree; the wild-flowers started up beneath the hoofs of
our horses; and every object, far and near, seemed, to my
young eyes, to be attuned to harmony and love.
This is a favourite ride of mine, in which Anneke often
accompanies me, said Herman Mordaunt, as we gained
the commanding eminence I have mentioned. My
daughter
is a spirited horse-woman, and is often my companion in
these morning rides. She and Mary Wallace should be
somewhere on the hills, at this moment, for they promised
to follow me, as soon as they could dress for the saddle.
A cry of something like wild delight burst out of Dirck,
and the next moment he was galloping away for an
adjoining
ridge, on the top of which the beautiful forms of the two
girls were just then visible; embellished by neatly-fitting
habits, and beavers with drooping feathers. I pointed out
these charming objects to Herman Mordaunt, and followed
my friend, at half-speed. In a minute or two the parties
had joined.
Never had I seen Anneke Mordaunt so perfectly lovely,
as she appeared that morning. The exercise and air had
deepened a bloom that was always rich; and her eyes
received
new lustre from the glow on her cheeks. Though
expected, I thought she received us as particularly acceptable
guests; while Mary Wallace manifested more than an usual
degree of animation, in her reception. Jason was not
forgotten
,
but was acknowledged as an old acquaintance, and
was properly introduced to the friend.
You frequently take these rides, Mr. Mordaunt tells me,
I said, reining my horse to the side of that of Anneke's, as
the whole party moved on; and I regret that Satanstoe is
so distant, as to prevent our oftener meeting of a morning.
We have many noted horse-women, in Westchester, who
would be proud of such an acquisition.
I know several ladies, on your side of Harlem river,
Anneke answered, and frequently ride in their company;
but none so distant as any in your immediate neighbourhood.
My father tells me, he used often to shoot over the fields of
Satanstoe, when a youth; and still speaks of your birds
with great affection.
I believe our fathers were once brother-sportsmen. Mr.
Bulstrode has promised to come and imitate their good
example
.
Now you have had time to reflect on the plays you
have seen, do you still feel the same interest in such
representations
as at first?
I only wish there was not so much to condemn. I
think Mr. Bulstrode might have reached eminence as a
player, had not fortune put it, in one sense, beyond his
reach, as an elder son, and a man of family.
Mr. Bulstrode, they tell me, is not only the heir of an
old baronetcy, but of a large fortune?
Such are the facts, I believe. Do you not think it
creditable
to him, Mr. Littlepage, that one so situated, should
come so far to serve his king and country, in a rude war
like this of our colonies?
I was obliged to assent, though I heartily wished that
Anneke's manner had been less animated and sincere, as
she put the question. Still, I hardly knew what to think of
her feelings towards that gentleman; for, otherwise, she
always heard him named with a calmness and
self-possession
that I had observed was not shared by all her young
companions, when there was occasion to allude to the gay
and insinuating soldier. I need scarcely say, it was no
disadvantage
to Mr. Bulstrode to be the heir of a baronetcy, in
an English colony. Somehow or other, we are a little apt
to magnify such accidental superiority, at a distance from
home; and I
have
heard Englishmen, themselves,
acknowledge
that a baronet was a greater man, in New York, than
a duke was in London. These were things, that passed
through my mind, as I rode along at Anneke's side; though
I had the discretion not to give utterance to my thoughts.
Herman Mordaunt rode in advance, with Jason; and
he led the party, by pretty bridle-paths, along the heights
for nearly two miles, occasionally opening a gate, without
dismounting, until he reached a point that overlooked
Lilacsbush
,
which was soon seen, distant from us less than half a
mile.
Here we are, on my own domain, he said, as he pulled
up to let us join him; that last gate separating me from
my nearest neighbour south. These hills are of no great
use, except as early pastures, though they afford many
beautiful
views.
I have heard it predicted, I remarked, that the time
would come, some day, when the banks of the Hudson would
contain many such seats as that of the Philipses, at Yonkers,
and one or two more like it, that I am told are now standing
above the Highlands.
Quite possibly; it is not easy to foretell what may come
to pass in such a country. I dare say, that in time, both
towns and seats will be seen on the banks of the Hudson,
and a powerful and numerous nobility to occupy the last.
By the way, Mr. Littlepage, your father and my friend Col.
Follock have been making a valuable acquisition in lands,
I hear; having obtained a patent for an extensive estate,
somewhere in the neighbourhood of Albany?
It is not so very extensive, sir, there being only some
forty thousand acres of it, altogether; nor is it very near
Albany, by what I can learn, since it must lie at a distance
of some forty miles, or more, from that town. Next winter,
however, Dirck and myself are to go in search of the land,
when we shall learn all about it.
Then we may meet in that quarter of the country. I
have affairs of importance at Albany, which have been too
long neglected; and it has been my intention to pass some
months at the north, next season, and early in the season,
too. We may possibly meet in the woods.
You have been at Albany, I suppose, Mr. Mordaunt?
Quite often, sir; the distance is so great, that one has
not much inducement to go there, unless carried by affairs,
however, as has been my case. I was at Albany before my
marriage, and have had various occasions to visit it since.
My father was there, when a soldier; and he tells me
it is a part of the province well worth seeing. At all events,
I shall encounter the risk and fatigue next season; for it is
useful to young persons to see the world. Dirck and
myself
may make the campaign, should there be one in that
direction.
I fancied Anneke manifested some interest in this
conversation
;
but we rode on, and soon alighted at the door of
Lilacsbush. Bulstrode was not in the way, and I had the
supreme pleasure of helping Miss Mordaunt to alight, when
we paused a moment before entering the house, to examine
the view. I have given the reader some idea of the general
appearance of the place; but it was necessary to approach
it, in order to form a just conception of its beauties. As its
name indicated, the lawn, house, and out-buildings were all
garnished or buried in lilacs, the whole of which were then
in full blossom. The flowers filled the air with a species
of purple light, that cast a warm and soft radiance even on
the glowing face of Anneke, as she pointed out to me the
magical effect. I know no flower that does so much to
embellish
a place, as the lilac, on a large scale, common as it
is, and familiar as we have become with its hues and its
fragrance.
We enjoy the month our lilacs are out, beyond any
month in the year, said Anneke, smiling at my surprise
and delight; and we make it a point to pass most of it
here. You will at least own, Mr. Littlepage, that
Lilacsbush
is properly named.
The effect is more like enchantment than anything else!
I cried. I did not know that the simple, modest lilac could
render anything so very beautiful!
Simplicity and modesty are such charms in themselves,
sir, as to be potent allies, observed the sensible but taciturn
Mary Wallace.
To this I assented, of course, and we all followed Mr.
Mordaunt into the house. I was as much delighted with the
appearance of things in the interior of Lilacsbush, as I had
been with the exterior. Everywhere, it seemed to me, I met
with the signs of Anneke's taste and skill. I do not wish
the reader to suppose that the residence itself was of the very
first character and class, for this it could not lay claim to be.
Still, it was one of those staid, story-and-a-half dwellings,
Vol. I.  12
in which most of our first families were, and are content to
dwell, in the country; very much resembling the good old
habitation at Satanstoe in these particulars. The furniture,
however, was of a higher town-finish than we found it
necessary
to use; and the little parlour in which we
breakfasted
was a model for an eating-room. The buffets in the
corners were so well polished that one might see his face in
them; the cellarets were ornamented with plated hinges,
locks, &c., and the table itself shone like a mirror. I know
not how it was, but the china appeared to me richer and
neater than common under Anneke's pretty little hand;
while the massive and highly-finished plate of the breakfast
service, was such as could be wrought only in England. In
a word, while everything appeared rich and respectable,
there was a certain indescribable air of comfort, gentility,
and neatness about the whole, that impressed me in an
unusual
manner.
Mr. Littlepage tells me, Anneke, observed Herman
Mordaunt, while we were at breakfast, that he intends to
make a journey to the north, next winter, and it may be our
good fortune to meet him there. The th expects to be
ordered up as high as Albany, this summer; and we may
all renew our songs and jests, with Bulstrode and his gay
companions, among the Dutchmen.
I was charmed with this prospect of meeting Anneke
Mordaunt at the north, and took occasion to say as much;
though I was afraid it was in an awkward and confused
manner.
I heard as much as this, sir, while we were riding,
answered the daughter. I hope cousin Dirck is to be of
the party?
Cousin Dirck assured her he was, and we discussed in
anticipation the pleasure it must give to old acquaintances
to meet so far from home. Not one of us, Herman
Mordaunt
expected, had ever been one hundred miles from his
or her birth-place, as was ascertained on comparing notes.
I was the greatest traveller; Princeton lying between eighty
and ninety miles from Satanstoe, as the road goes.
Perhaps I come nearer to it than any of you, put in
Jason, for my late journey on the island must have carried
me nearly that far from Danbury. But, ladies, I can assure
you, a traveller has many opportunities for learning useful
things, as I know by the difference there is between York
and Connecticut.
And which do you prefer, Mr. Newcome? asked Anneke,
with a somewhat comical expression about her laughing eyes.
That is hardly a fair question, Miss; no reproof could
break Jason of this vulgarism, since it might make
enemies
for a body to speak all of his mind in such matters.
There are comparisons that should never be made, on
account of circumstances that overrule all common efforts.
New York is a great colonya very great colony, Miss;
but it was once Dutch, as everybody knows, begging Mr.
Follock's pardon; and it must be confessed Connecticut has,
from the first, enjoyed almost unheard-of advantages, in the
moral and religious character of her people, the excellence
of her lands, and the purity  Jason called this word
poority; but that did not alter the sentimentthough I
must say, once for all, it is out of my power to spell every
word as this man saw fit to pronounce itof her people
and church.
Herman Mordaunt looked up with surprise, at this speech;
but Dirck and I had heard so many like it, that we saw
nothing out of the way on this particular occasion. As for
the ladies, they were too well-bred to glance at each other,
as girls sometimes will; but I could see that each thought
the speaker a very singular person.
You find, then, a difference in customs between the two
colonies, sir? said Herman Mordaunt.
A vast difference truly, sir. Now there was a little
thing happened about your daughter, 'Squire Mordaunt, the
very first time I saw her  the present was the
second
interview  that could no more have happened in
Connecticut
,
than the whole of the province could be put into
that tea-cup.
To my daughter, Mr. Newcome!
Yes, sir, to your own daughter; Miss, that sits there
looking as innocent as if it had never come to pass.
This is so extraordinary, sir, that I must beg an
explanation
.
You may well call it extr'ornary, for extr'ornary it
would be called all over Connecticut; and I 'll never give
up that York, if this be a York usage, is or can be right in
such a matter, at least.
I entreat you to be more explicit, Mr. Newcome.
Why, sir, you must know, Corny, here, and I, and
Dirck there, went in to see the lion, about which no doubt
you 've heard so much, and Corny paid for Miss's ticket.
Well,
that
was all right enough, but
Surely, Anneke, you have not forgotten to return to
Mr. Littlepage the money!
Listen patiently, my dear sir, and you will get the
whole story, my delinquencies and debts included, if any
there are.
That 's just what she did, 'Squire Mordaunt, and I
maintain there is not the man in all Connecticut that would
have taken it. If ladies can't be treated to sights, and
other amusements, I should like to know who is to be so.
Herman Mordaunt, at first, looked gravely at the speaker,
but catching the expression of our eyes he answered with the
tact of a perfectly well-bred man, as he certainly was, on
all occasions that put him to the proof
You must overlook Miss Mordaunt's adhering to her
own customs, Mr. Newcome, on account of her youth, and
her little knowledge of any world but that immediately
around her. When she has enjoyed an opportunity of
visiting Danbury, no doubt she will improve by the occasion.
But, Corny, sirthink of Corny's falling into such a
mistake!
As for Mr. Littlepage, I must suppose he labours under
somewhat of the same disadvantage. We are less gallant
here than you happen to be in Connecticut; hence our
inferiority. At some future day, perhaps, when society
shall have made a greater progress among us, our youths
will come to see the impropriety of permitting the fair sex
to pay for anything, even their own ribands. I have long
known, sir, that you of New England claim to treat your
women better than they are treated in any other portion of
the inhabited world, and it must be owing to that circumstance
that they enjoy the advantage of being `treated' for nothing.
With this concession Jason was apparently content.
How much of this provincial feeling, arising from
provincial
ignorance, have I seen since that time! It is certain
that our fellow-subjects of the eastern provinces are not
addicted to hiding their lights under bushels, but make the
most of all their advantages. That they are superior to us
of York, in some respects, I am willing enough to allow;
but there are certainly points on which this superiority is
far less apparent. As for Jason, he was entirely satisfied
with the answer of Herman Mordaunt, and often alluded to
the subject afterwards, to my prejudice, and with great
selfcomplacency
.
To be sure, it is a hard lesson to beat into
the head of the self-sufficient colonist, that his own little
corner of the earth does not contain all that is right, and
just, and good, and refined.
I left Lilacsbush, that day, deeply in love. I hold it to
be unmanly to attempt to conceal it. Anneke had made a
lively impression on me from the very first, but that
impression
had now gone deeper than the imagination, and
had very sensibly touched the heart. Perhaps it was
necessary
to see her in the retirement of the purely domestic
circle, to give all her charms their just ascendency. While
in town, I had usually met her in crowds, surrounded by
admirers or other young persons of her own sex, and there
was less opportunity for viewing the influence of nature and
the affections on her manner. With Mary Wallace at
her side, however, there was always one on whom she
could exhibit just enough of these feelings to bring out the
loveliness of her nature without effort or affectation. Anne
Mordaunt never spoke to her friend without a change
appearing
in her manner. Affection thrilled in the tones of
her voice, confidence beamed in her eye, and esteem and
respect were to be gathered from the expectation and
deference that shone in her countenance. Mary Wallace
was two years the oldest, and these years taken in
connection
with her character, entitled her to receive this tribute
from her nearest associate; but all these feelings flowed
spontaneously from the heart, for never was an intercourse
between two of the sex more thoroughly free from acting.
It was a proof that passion was getting the mastery over
me, that I now forgot Dirck, his obvious attachment, older
claims, and possible success. I know not how it was, or
why it was, but it was certain that Herman Mordaunt had
a great regard for Dirck Van Valkenburgh. The affinity
12 *
may have counted for something, and it was possible that the
father was already weighing the advantages that might
accrue from such a connection. Col. Follock had the
reputation
of being rich, as riches were then counted among
us; and the young fellow himself, in addition to a fine manly
figure, that was fast developing itself into the frame of a
youthful Hercules, had an excellent temper, and a good
reputation. Still, this idea never troubled me. Of Dirck I
had no fears, while Bulstrode gave me great uneasiness,
from the first. I saw all his advantages, may have even
magnified them; while those of my near and immediate
friend, gave me no trouble whatever. It is possible, had
Dirck presented himself oftener, or more distinctly to my
mind, a feeling of magnanimity might have induced me to
withdraw in time, and leave him a field to which he had
the earliest claim. But, after the morning at Lilacsbush,
it was too late for any such sacrifice on my part; and I rode
away from the house, at the side of my friend, as forgetful
of his interest in Anneke, as if he had never felt any.
Magnanimity
and I had no further connection in relation to my
pretensions to Anneke Mordaunt.
Well, commenced Jason, as soon as we were fairly in
the saddle, these Mordaunts are even a notch above your
folks, Corny? There was more silver vessels in that room
where we ate, than there is at this moment in all Danbury!
The extravagance amounts to waste. The old gentleman
must be desperate rich, Dirck?
Herman Mordaunt has a good estate, and very little of
it has gone for plate, Jason; that which you saw is old, and
came either from Holland, or England; one home, or the
other.
Oh! Holland is no home for me, boy. Depend on it, all
that plate is not put there for nothing. If the truth could be
come at, this Herman Mordaunt, as you call him, though I
do not see why you cannot call him '
Squire
Mordaunt, like
other folks, but this Mr. Mordaunt has some notion, I
conclude
,
to get his daughter off on one of these rich English
officers, of whom there happen to be so many in the
province
,
just at this time. I never saw the gentleman, but
there was one Bulstrode named pretty often this forenoon,
Jason's morning always terminated at his usual breakfast
hour,and I rather conclude he will turn out to be the
chap, in the long run. Such is my calculation, and
they
don't often fail.
I saw a quick, surprised start in Dirck; but I felt such a
twinge myself, that there was little opportunity to inquire
into the state of my friend's feelings, at this coarse, but
unexpected
remark.
Have you any particular reason, Mr. Newcome, for
venturing such an opinion? I asked, a little sternly.
Come, don't let us, out here in the high-way, begin to
mister one another. You are Corny, Dirck is Dirck, and
I am Jason. The shortest way is commonly the best way,
and I like given-names among friends. Have I any
particular
reason?Yes; plenty on 'em, and them that's good.
In the first place, no man has a daughter,darter  la
Jason,that he does not begin to think of setting her out
in the world, accordin' to his abilities; then, as I said
before
,
these folks from home (hum) are awful rich, and
rich husbands are always satisfactory to parents,
whatever
they may be to children. Besides, some of these
officers will fall heirs to titles, and that is a desperate
temptation
to a woman, all over the world. I hardly think there
is a young woman in Danbury that could hold out agin' a
real title.
It has always struck me as singular, that the people of
Jason's part of the provinces should entertain so much
profound
respect for titles. No portion of the world is of
simpler habits, nor is it easier to find any civilized people
among whom there is greater equality of actual condition,
which, one would think, must necessarily induce equality
of feeling, than in Connecticut, at this very moment.
Notwithstanding
these facts, the love of title is so great, that
even that of serjeant is often prefixed to the name of a man
on his tombstone, or in the announcement of his death or
marriage; and as for the militia ensigns and lieutenants,
there is no end to them. Deacon is an important title,
which is rarely omitted; and wo betide the man who should
forget to call a magistrate esquire. No such usages
prevail
among us; or, if they do, it is among that portion of
the people of this colony which is derived from New
England
,
and still retains some of its customs. Then, in no
part of the colonies is English rank more deferred to, than
in New England, generally, notwithstanding most of those
colonies possess the right to elect nearly every officer they
have among them. I allow that we of New York defer
greatly to men of birth and rank from home, and it is right
we should so do; but I do not think our deference is as
great, or by any means as general, as it is in New England.
It is possible the influence of the Dutch may have left an
impression on our state of society, though I have been told
that the colonies farther south exhibit very much the same
characteristics as we do, ourselves, on this head.
[15]
[15]
As respects the love of titles that are derived from the people,
there is nothing opposed to strict republican, or if the reader will,
democratic
,
principles, since it is deferring to the power that appoints,
and manifests a respect for that which the community chooses to elevate.
But, the deference to
English
rank, mentioned by Mr. Littlepage, is
undeniably greater among the mass in New England, than it is
anywhere
else in this country, at this very moment. One leading New
York paper, edited by New England men, during the last
controversy
about the indemnity to be paid by France, actually styled the
Duc de Broglie his grace, like a Grub Street cockney,a mode of
address that would astonish that respectable statesman, quite as much
as it must have amused every man of the world who saw it. I have
been much puzzled to account for this peculiarity  unquestionably
one that exists in the country  but have supposed it must be owing
to the diffusion of information which carries intelligence sufficiently far
to acquaint the mass with leading social features, without going far
enough to compensate for a provincial position and provincial habits.
Perhaps the exclusively English origin of the people may have an
influence. The writer has passed portions of two seasons in
Switzerland
,
and, excluding the small forest cantons, he has no hesitation
in saying that the habits and general notions of Connecticut are
more inherently democratical than those of any part of that country.
Notwithstanding, he thinks a nobleman, particularly an English
nobleman, is a far greater man in New England, than he is among
the real middle-state families of New York.
Editor
.
We reached Satanstoe a little late, in consequence of the
delay at Lilacsbush, and were welcomed with affection and
warmth. My excellent mother was delighted to see me
at home again, after so long an absence, and one which she
did not think altogether without peril, when it was
remembered
that I had passed a whole fortnight amid the
temptations
and fascinations of the capital. I saw the tears in her
eyes as she kissed me, again and again, and felt the gentle,
warm embrace, as she pressed me to her bosom, in maternal
thanksgiving.
Of course, I had to render an account of all I had seen
and done, including Pinkster, the theatre, and the lion. I
said nothing, however, of the Mordaunts, until questioned
about them by my mother, quite a fortnight after Dirck had
gone across to Rockland. One morning, as I sat
endeavouring
to write a sonnet in my own room, that excellent
parent entered and took a seat near my table, with the
familiarity
the relation she bore me justified. She was knitting
at the time, for never was she idle, except when asleep. I
saw by the placid smile on her face, which, Heaven bless
her! was still smooth and handsome, that something was
on her mind, that was far from disagreeable; and I waited
with some curiosity for the opening. That excellent
mother
!
How completely did she live out of herself in all
that had the most remote bearing on my future hopes and
happiness!
Finish your writing, my son, commenced my mother,
for I had instinctively striven to conceal the sonnet; finish
your writing; until you have done, I will be silent.
I have done, now, mother; 't was only a copy of verses
I was endeavouring to write outyou knowthat iswrite
out, you know.
I did not know you were a poet, Corny, returned my
mother, smiling still more complacently, for it
is
something
to be the parent of a poet.
I!I a poet, mother?I 'd sooner turn school-master,
than turn poet. Yes, I 'd sooner be Jason Newcome,
himself
,
than even suspect it possible I
could
be a poet.
Well, never mind; people never turn poets, I fancy,
with their eyes open. But, what is this I hear of your
having saved a beautiful young lady from the jaws of a
lion, while you were in town; and why was I left to learn
all the particulars from Mr. Newcome?
I believe my face was of the colour of scarlet, for it felt
as if it were on fire, and my mother smiled still more
decidedly
than ever. Speak! I could not have spoken to be
thus smiled on by Anneke.
There is nothing to be ashamed of, Corny, in rescuing
a young lady from a lion, or in going to her father's to
receive the thanks of the family. The Mordaunts are a
family any one can visit with pleasure. Was the battle
between you and the beast, a very desperate conflict, my
child?
Poh! mother:Jason is a regular dealer in marvels,
and he makes mountains of mole-hills. In the first place,
for `jaws,' you must substitute `paws,' and for a `young
lady,' `her shawl.'
Yes, I understand it was the shawl, but it was on her
shoulders, and could not have been disengaged time enough
to save her, had you not shown so much presence of mind
and courage. As for the `jaws,' I believe that was my
mistake, for Mr. Newcome certainly said `claws.'
Well, mother, have it your own way. I was of a little
service to a very charming young woman, and she and her
father were civil to me, as a matter of course. Herman
Mordaunt is a name we all know, and, as you say, his is a
family that any man may be proud of visiting, ay, and
pleased too.
How odd it is, Corny, added my mother, in a sort of
musing, soliloquizing way,you are an only child, and
Anneke Mordaunt is also an only child, as Dirck Follock
has often told me.
Then Dirck has spoken to you frequently of Anneke,
before this, mother?
Time and again; they are relations, you must have
heard; as, indeed, you are yourself, if you did but know
it.
I?I related to Anneke Mordaunt, without being too
near?
My dear mother smiled again, while I felt sadly ashamed
of myself at the next instant. I believe that a suspicion
of the truth, as respects my infant passion, existed in that
dear parent's mind from that moment.
Certainly related, Corny, and I will tell you how. My
great-great-grandmother, Alida van der Heyden, was a first
cousin of Herman Mordaunt's great-great-grandmother, by
his mother's side, who was a Van Kleeck. So, you see,
you and Anneke are actually related.
Just near enough, mother, to put one at ease in their
house, and not so near as to make relationship
troublesome
.
They tell me, my child, that Anneke is a sweet
creature
!
If beauty, and modesty, and grace, and gentleness, and
spirit, and sense, and delicacy, and virtue, and piety, can
make any young woman of seventeen a sweet creature,
mother, then Anneke is sweet.
My dear mother seemed surprised at my warmth, but she
smiled still more complacently than ever. Instead of
pursuing
the subject, however, she saw fit to change it, by
speaking of the prospects of the season, and the many
reasons we all had for thankfulness to God. I presume,
with a woman's instinct, she had learned enough to satisfy
her mind for the present.
The summer soon succeeded to the May that proved so
momentous to me; and I sought occupation in the fields.
Occupation, however, would not do. Anneke was with me,
go where I would; and glad was I when Dirck, about
midsummer
,
in one of his periodical visits to Satanstoe, proposed
that we should ride over, and make another visit to
Lilacsbush
.
He had written a note, to say we should be glad to
ask a dinner and beds, if it were convenient, for a day a
short distance ahead; and he waited the answer at the Neck.
This answer arrived duly by mail, and was everything
we could wish. Herman Mordaunt offered us a hearty
welcome
,
and sent the grateful intelligence that his daughter
and Mary Wallace would both be present to receive us. I
envied Dirck the manly feeling which had induced him to
take this plain and respectable course to his object.
We went across the country, accordingly, and reached
Lilacsbush several hours before dinner. Anneke received
us with a bright suffusion of the face, and kind smiles;
though I could not detect the slightest difference in her
manners to either. To both was she gracious, gentle,
attentive
,
and lady-like. No allusion was made to the past,
except a few remarks that were given on the subject of the
theatre. The officers had continued to play until the th
had been ordered up the river, when Bulstrode, Billings,
Harris, virtuous Marcia, and all, had proceeded to Albany
in company. Anneke thought there was about as much to
be displeased with, as there was to please, in these
representations
;
though her removal to the country had
prevented
her seeing more than three of them all. It was admitted
all round, however, that Bulstrode played admirably; and
it was even regretted by certain persons, that he should not
have been devoted to the stage.
We passed the night at Lilacsbush, and remained an hour
or two after breakfast, next morning. I had carried a warm
invitation from both my parents to Herman Mordaunt, to
ride over, with the young ladies, and taste the fish of the
Sound; and the visit was returned in the course of the
month of September. My mother received Anneke as a
relation; though I believe that both Herman Mordaunt and
his daughter were surprised to learn that they came within
even the wide embrace of Dutch kindred. They did not
seem displeased, however, for the family name of my mother
was good, and no one need have been ashamed of affinity to
her
, on her own account. Our guests did not remain the
night, but they left us in a sort of a chaise that Herman
Mordaunt kept for country use, about an hour before
sunset
.
I mounted my horse, and rode five miles with the
party, on its way back, and then took my leave of Anneke,
as it turned out, for many, many weary months.
The year 1757 was memorable in the colonies, by the
progress of the war, and as much so in New York as in any
other province. Montcalm had advanced to the head of
Lake George, had taken Fort William Henry, and a fearful
massacre of the garrison had succeeded. This bold
operation
left the enemy in possession of Champlain; and the
strong post of Ticonderoga was adequately garrisoned by a
formidable force. A general gloom was cast over the
political
affairs of the colony; and it was understood that a
great effort was to be made, the succeeding campaign, to
repair the loss. Rumour spoke of large reinforcements
from home, and of greater levies in the colonies themselves
than had been hitherto attempted. Lord Loudon was to
return
home, and a veteran of the name of Abercrombie was
to succeed him in the command of all the forces of the king.
Regiments began to arrive from the West Indies; and, in
the course of the winter of 1757-8, we heard at Satanstoe
of the gaieties that these new forces had introduced into the
town. Among other things, a regular corps of Thespians
had arrived from the West Indies.
CHAPTER X.
Dear Hasty-Pudding, what unpromised joy
Expands my heart to meet thee in Savoy!
Doom'd o'er the world through devious paths to roam,
Each clime my country, and each house my home,
My soul is sooth'd, my cares have found an end:
I greet my long-lost, unforgotten friend.
Barlow
.
The
winter was soon drawing to a close, and my
twenty-first
birth-day was past. My father and Col. Follock, who
came over to smoke more than usual that winter with my
father, began to talk of the journey Dirck and I were to
take, in quest of the Patent. Maps were procured,
calculations
were made, and different modes of proceeding were
proposed, by the various members of the family. I will
acknowledge that the sight of the large, coarse, parchment
map of the Mooseridge Patent, as the new acquisition was
called, from the circumstance of the surveyors having shot
a moose on a particular ridge of land in its centre, excited
certain feelings of avarice within my mind. There were
streams meandering among hills and valleys; little lakes, or
ponds, as they were erroneously called in the language of
the country, dotted the surface; and there were all the
artistical proofs of a valuable estate that a good map-maker
could devise, to render the whole pleasing and promising.
[16]
[16]
Forty years ago, a gentleman in New York purchased a
considerable
body of wild land, on the faith of the map. When he came to
examine his new property, it was found to be particularly wanting in
water-courses. The surveyor was sought, and rebuked for his
deception
,
the map having numerous streams, &c. Why did you lay
down all these streams here, where none are to be found? demanded
the irritated purchaser, pointing to the document. Why?  Why,
who the dI ever saw a map without rivers? was the answer.
Editor
.
Vol. I.  13
If it were a good thing to be the heir of Satanstoe, it was
far better to be the tenant in common, with my friend
Dirck, of all these ample plains, rich bottoms, flowing
streams and picturesque lakes. In a word, for the first
time, in the history of the colonies, the Littlepages had
become
the owners of what might be termed an estate.
According
to our New York parlance, six or eight hundred
acres are not an estate; nor two or three thousand, scarcely;
but ten, or twenty, and much more, forty thousand acres of
land might be dignified with the name of an estate!
The first knotty point discussed, was to settle the manner
in which Dirck and myself should reach Mooseridge. Two
modes of going as far as Albany offered, and on one of
these it was our first concern to decide. We might wait
until the river opened, and go as far as Albany in a sloop,
of which one or two left town each week when business
was active, as it was certain to be in the spring of the year.
It was thought, however, that the army would require most
of the means of transportation of this nature that offered;
and it might put us to both inconvenience and delay, to
wait on the tardy movements of quarter-masters and
contractors
.
My grandfather shook his head when the thing
was named, and advised us to remain as independent as
possible.
Have as little as possible to do with such people,
Corny, put in my grandfather, now a grey-headed,
venerable-looking
old gentleman, who did not wear his wig half
the time, but was content to appear in a pointed night-cap
and gown at all hours, until just before dinner was
announced
,
when he invariably came forth dressed as a
gentleman
Have
as little as possible to do with these gentry,
Corny. Money, and not honour, is their game; and you
will be treated like a barrel of beef, or a bag of potatoes, if
you fall into their hands. If you move with the army at
all, keep among the real soldiers, my boy, and, above all
things, avoid the contractors.
It was consequently determined that there was too much
uncertainty and delay in waiting for a passage to Albany
by water; for it was known that the voyage itself often
lasted ten days, or a fortnight, and it would be so late
before
we could sail, as to render this delay very inconvenient.
The other mode of journeying, was to go before the snow
had melted from the roads, by the aid of which, it was
quite possible to make the distance between Satanstoe and
Albany in three days.
Certain considerations of economy next offered, and we
settled down on the following plan; which, as it strikes me,
is, even now, worthy of being mentioned on account of its
prudence and judgment. It was well known that there
would be a great demand for horses for the army, as well
as for stores, provisions, &c., of various sorts. Now, we
had on the Neck several stout horses, that were falling into
years, though still serviceable and good for a campaign.
Col. Follock had others of the same description, and when
the cavalry of the two farms were all assembled at
Satanstoe
,
there were found to be no fewer than fourteen of the
venerable animals. These made just three four-horse teams,
besides leaving a pair for a lighter load. Old, stout lumber
sleighs were bought, or found, and repaired; and Jaap,
having two other blacks with him, was sent off at the head
of what my father called a brigade of lumber sleighs, all
of which were loaded with the spare pork and flour of the
two families. The war had rendered these articles quite
high; but the hogs that were slaughtered at Christmas had
not yet been sold; and it was decided that Dirck and myself
could not commence our career as men who had to buy and
sell from the respective farms, in any manner more likely to
be useful to us and to our parents, than this. As Yaap's
movements were necessarily slow, he was permitted to
precede
Dirck and myself by two entire days, giving him time
to clear the Highlands before we left Satanstoe. The negroes
carried the provender for their horses, and no small portion
of the food, and all of the cider that was necessary for their
own consumption. No one was ashamed of economising
with his slaves in this manner; the law of slavery itself
existing principally as a money-making institution. I
mention
these little matters, that posterity may understand the
conventional feeling of the colony, on such points.
When everything was ready, we had to listen to much
good advice from our friends, previously to launching
ourselves
into the world. What Col. Follock said to Dirck,
the latter never told me; but the following was pretty much
the form and substance of that which I received from my
own fatherthe interview taking place in a little room he
called his office; or study, as Jason used to term it.
Here, Corny, are all the bills, or invoices, properly
made out, my father commenced, handing me a small sheaf
of papers; and you will do well to consult them before
you make any sales. Here are letters of introduction to
several gentlemen in the army, whose acquaintance I could
wish you to cultivate. This, in particular, is to my old
captain, Charles Merrewether, who is now a Lt. Col., and
commands a battalion in the Royal Americans. You will
find him of great service to you while you remain with the
army, I make no doubt. Pork, they tell me, if of the quality
of that you will have, ought to bring three half joes, the
barreland you might ask that much. Should accident
procure
you an invitation to the table of the
Commander-In-Chief
,
as may happen through Col. Merrewether's friendship,
I trust you will do full credit to the loyalty of the Littlepages.
Ah! there's the flour, too; it ought to be worth two half
joes the barrel, in times like these. I have thrown in a
letter or two to some of the Schuylers, with whom I served
when of your age. They are first-rate people, remember,
and rank among the highest families of the colonies; full
of good old Van Cortlandt blood, and well crossed with the
Rensselaers. Should any of them ask you about the barrel
of tongues, that you will find marked T
Any of whom, sir; the Schuylers, the Cortlandts, or the
Rensselaers?
Poh! any of the sutlers, or contractors, I mean, of
course. You can tell them that they were cured at home,
and that you dare recommend them as fit for the
Commander-In-Chief's
own table.
Such was the character of my father's parting
instructions
.
My mother held a different discourse.
Corny, my beloved child, she said; this will be an
all-important journey to you. Not only are you going far
from home, but you are going to a part of the country where
much will be to be seen. I hope you will remember what
was promised for you, by your sponsors in baptism, and also
what is owing to your own good name, and that of your
family. The letters you take with you, will probably
introduce
you to good company, and that is a great beginning
to a youth. I wish you to cultivate the society of reputable
females, Corny. My sex has great influence on the
conduct
of yours, at your time of life, and both your manners
and principles will be aided by being as much with women
of character as possible.
But, mother, if we are to go any distance with the
army, as both my father and Col. Follock wish, it will not
be in our power to be much in ladies' society.
I speak of the time you will pass in and near Albany.
I do not expect you will find accomplished women at
Mooseridge
,
nor, should you really go any distance with the
troops, though I see no occasion for your going with them
a single foot, since you are not a soldier, do I suppose you
will find many reputable women in the camp; but, avail
yourself of every favourable opportunity to go into good
company. I have procured a letter for you, from a lady
of one of the great families of this county, to Madam
Schuyler
,
who is above all other women, they tell me, in and
around Albany. Her you must see, and I charge you, on
your duty, to deliver this letter. It is possible, too, that
Herman Mordaunt
What of Herman Mordaunt and Anneke, mother?
I spoke only of Herman Mordaunt himself, and did not
mention Anneke, boy, answered my mother, smiling,
though I doubt not that the daughter is with the father.
They left town for Albany, two months since, my sister
Legge writes me, and intend to pass the summer north. I
will not deceive you, Corny, so you shall hear all that your
aunt has written on the subject. In the first place, she says
Herman Mordaunt has gone on public service, having an
especial appointment for some particular duty of
importance
,
that is private, but which it is known will detain him
near Albany, and among the northern posts, until the close
of the season, though he gives out to the world, he is absent
on account of some land he has in Albany county. His
daughter and Mary Wallace are with him, with several
servants
,
and they have taken up with them a sleigh-load of
conveniences; that looks like remaining. Now, you ought
to hear the rest, my child, though I feel no apprehension
when such a youth as yourself is put in competition with
13 *
any other man in the colony. Yes, though your own
mother
,
I think I may say
that!
What is it, mother?never mind me; I shall do well
enough, depend on itthat isbut what is it, dear mother?
Why, your aunt says, it is whispered among a few in
town, a very few only, but whispered, that Herman
Mordaunt
got the appointment named, merely that he might
have a pretence for taking Anneke near the th, in
which regiment it seems there is a baronet's son, who is a
sort of relative of his, and whom he wishes to marry to
Anneke.
I am sorry, then, that my aunt Legge listens to any
such unworthy gossip! I indignantly cried. My life on
it, Anneke Mordaunt never contemplated so indelicate a
thing!
No one supposes Anneke does, or did. But fathers are
not daughters, Corny; no, nor mothers neither, as I can
freely say, seeing you are my only child. Herman
Mordaunt
may imagine all this in
his
heart, and Anneke be
every thing that is innocent and delicate.
And how can my aunt Legge's informants know what
is in Herman Mordaunt's heart?
How?I suppose they judge by what they find in their
own, my son; a common means of coming at a neighbour's
failings, though I believe virtues are rarely detected by the
same process.
Ay, and judge of others by themselves. The means
may be common, mother, but they are not infallible.
Certainly not, Corny, and that will be a ground of
hope to you. Remember, my child, you can bring me no
daughter I shall love half as well as I feel I can love
Anneke Mordaunt. We are related too, her father's
great-great-grandmother
Never mind the great-great-grandmother, my dear,
good, excellent, parent. After this I shall not attempt to
have any secret from you. Unless Anneke Mordaunt
consent
to be your daughter, you will never have one.
Do not say that, Corny, I beseech you, cried my
mother, a good deal frightened. Remember there is no
accounting for tastes; the army is a formidable rival, and,
after all, this Mr. Bulstrode, I think you call him, may prove
as acceptable to Anneke as to her father. Do not say so
cruel a thing, I entreat of you, dearest, dearest, Corny.
It is not a minute, mother, since you said how little you
apprehended for me, when opposed by any other man in the
province!
Yes, child, but that is a very different thing from seeing
you pass all your days as a heartless, comfortless old
bachelor. There are fifty young women in this very
county, I could wish to see you united to, in preference to
witnessing such a calamity.
Well, mother, we will say no more about it. But is it
true that Mr. Worden actually intends to be of our party?
Both Mr. Worden and Mr. Newcome, I believe. We
shall scarcely know how to spare the first, but he conceives
he has a call to accompany the army, in which there are
so few chaplains; and souls are called to their last dread
account so suddenly in war, that one does not know how to
refuse to let him go.
My poor, confiding mother! When I look back at the
past, and remember the manner in which the Rev. Mr.
Worden discharged the duties of his sacred office during
the campaign that succeeded, I cannot but smile at the
manner in which confidence manifests itself in woman.
The sex has a natural disposition to place their trusts in
priests, by a very simple process of transferring their own
dispositions to the bosoms of those they believe set apart
for purely holy objects. Well, we live and learn. I dare
say that many are what they profess to be, but I have lived
long enough now to know
all
are not. As for Mr. Worden,
he had one good point about him, at any rate. His friends
and his enemies saw the worst of him. He was no
hypocrite
,
but his associates saw the man very much as he was.
Still, I am far from wishing to hold up this imported
minister
as a model of christian graces for my descendants to
admire. No one can be more convinced than myself how
much sectarians are prone to substitute their own narrow
notions of right and wrong for the Law of God,
confounding
acts that are perfectly innocent in themselves with sin;
but, at the same time, I am quite aware too, that
appearances
are ever to be consulted in cases of morals, and that
it is a minor virtue to be decent in matters of manners.
The Rev. Mr. Worden, whatever might have been his
position
as to substantials, certainly carried the external of
liberality to the verge of indiscretion.
A day or two after the conversation I have related, our
party left Satanstoe, with some
clat
. The team belonged
equally to the Follocks and the Littlepages, one horse being
the property of my father, while the other belonged to Col.
Follock. The sleigh, an old one new painted for the
occasion
,
was the sole property of the latter gentleman, and was
consigned, in mercantile phrase, to Dirck, in order to be
disposed of as soon as we should reach the end of our
journey. On its exterior it was painted a bright sky-blue,
while its interior was of vermilion, a colour that was and
is much in vogue for this species of vehicle, inasmuch as it
carries with it the idea of warmth; so, at least, the old
people
say, though I will confess I never found my toes any
less cold in a sleigh thus painted, than in one painted blue,
which is usually thought a particularly cold colour to the
feet.
We had three buffalo-skins, or, rather, two buffalo (bison)
skins and one bear-skin. The last, being trimmed with
scarlet cloth, had a particularly warm and comfortable
appearance
.
The largest skin was placed on the hind-seat,
and thrown over the back of the sleigh, as a matter of
course; and, though this back was high enough to break
off the wind from our heads and necks, the skin not only
covered it, but it hung two or three feet down behind, as is
becoming in a gentleman's sleigh. The other buffalo was
spread in the bottom of the sleigh, as a carpet for all four,
leaving an apron to come in front upon Dirck's and my lap,
as a protection against the cold in that quarter. The
bear-skin
formed a cushion for us in front, and an apron for Mr.
Worden and Jason, who sat behind. Our trunks had gone
on the lumber sleighs, that is, mine and Dirck's had thus
been sent, while our two companions found room for theirs
in the conveyance in which we went ourselves.
It was March 1st, 1758, the morning we left Satanstoe,
on this memorable excursion. The winter had proved as
was common in our latitude, though there had been more
snow along the coast than was usual. Salt air and snow do
not agree well together; but I had driven in a sleigh over
the Neck, most of the month of February, though there
were symptoms of a thaw, and of a southerly wind, the day
we left home. My father observed this, and he advised me
to take the road through the centre of the county, and get
among the hills, as soon as possible. Not only was there
always more snow in that part of the country, but it resisted
the influence of a thaw much longer than that which had
fallen near the sea or Sound. I got my mother's last kiss,
my father's last shake of the hand, my grandfather's
blessing
,
stepped into the sleigh, took the reins from Dirck, and
drove off.
A party in a sleigh must be composed of a very sombre
sort of persons, if it be not a merry one. In our case,
everybody was disposed to good-humour; though Jason
could not pass along the highway, in York Colony, without
giving vent to his provincial, Connecticut hypercriticism.
Everything was Dutch, according to his view of matters;
and when it failed of being Dutch, why, it was York-Colony.
The doors were not in the right places; the windows were
too large, when they were not too small; things had a
cabbage-look
;
the people smelt of tobacco; and hasty-pudding
was called suppaan. But these were trifles; and being
used to them, nobody paid much attention to what our
puritanical
neighbour saw fit to pour out, in the humility and
meekness of his soul. Mr. Worden chuckled, and urged
Jason on, in the hope of irritating Dirck; but Dirck smoked
through it all, with an indifference that proved how much
he really despised the critic. I was the only one who
resented
this supercilious ignorance; but even I was often
more disposed to laugh than to be angry.
The signs of a thaw increased, as we got a few miles
from home; and by the time we reached White Plains, the
south wind did not blow softly, but freshly, and the
snow in the road became sloppy, and rills of water were
seen running down the hill-sides, in a way that menaced
destruction to the sleighing. On we drove, however, and
deeper and deeper we got among the hills, until we found
not only more snow, but fewer symptoms of immediately
losing it. Our first day's work carried us well into the
manor of the Van Cortlandts, where we passed the night.
Next morning the south wind was still blowing, sweeping
over the fields of snow, charged with the salt air of the
ocean; and bare spots began to show themselves on all the
acclivities and hill-sidesan admonition for us to be stirring.
We breakfasted in the Highlands, and in a wild and retired
part of them, though in a part where snow and beaten roads
were still to be found. We had escaped from the thaw, and
no longer felt any uneasiness on the subject of reaching the
end of our journey on runners.
The second day brought us fairly through the mountains,
out on the plains of Dutchess, permitting us to sup at
Fishkill
.
This was a thriving settlement, the people appearing
to me to live in abundance, as certainly they did in peace
and quiet. They made little of the war, and asked us many
questions concerning the army, its commanders, its force,
and its objects. They were a simple, and judging from
appearances, an honest people, who troubled themselves very
little with what was going on in the world.
After quitting Fishkill we found a great change, not only
in the country, but in the weather. The first was level, as
a whole, and was much better settled than I could have
believed possible so far in the interior. As for the weather,
it was quite a different climate from that we had left below
the highlands. Not only was the morning cold, cold as it
had been a month earlier with us, but the snow still lay two
or three feet in depth on a level, and the sleighing was as
good as heart could wish.
That afternoon we overtook Yaap and the brigade of
lumber-sleighs. Everything had gone right, and after giving
the fellow some fresh instructions, I passed him, proceeding
on our route. This parting did not take place, however,
until the following had been uttered between us:
Well, Yaap. I inquired, as a sort of close to the
previous
discourse, how do you like the upper counties?
A loud negro laugh succeeded, and a repetition of the
question was necessary to extort an answer.
Lor', Masser Corny, how you t'ink I know, when dere
not'in but snow to be seen!
There was plenty of snow in Westchester; yet, I dare
say you could give some opinion of our own county!
'Cause I know him, sah; inside and out, and all over,
Masser Corny.
Well; but you can see the houses, and orchards, and
barns, and fences, and other things of that sort.
'Em pretty much like our'n, Masser Corny; why you
bother nigger with sich question?
Here another burst of loud, hearty yahyahyahs
succeeded; and Yaap had his laugh out before another word
could be got out of him, when I put the question a third
time.
Well, den, Masser Corny, sin' you
will
know, dis is my
mind. Dis country is oncomparable wid our ole county,
sah. De houses seem mean, de barns look empty, de fences
be low, and de niggers, ebbery one of 'em, look cold, sah
yes, sah'ey look berry cold!
As a cold negro was a most pitiable object in negro
eyes, I saw by this summary that Yaap had commenced his
travels in much of the same temper of superciliousness as
Jason Newcome. It struck me as odd at the time; but,
since that day, I have ascertained that this feeling is a very
general travelling companion for those who set out on their
first journey.
We passed our third night at a small hamlet called
Rhinebeck
,
in a settlement in which many German names were
to be found. Here we were travelling through the vast
estates of the Livingstons, a name well-known in our
colonial
history. We breakfasted at Claverack, and passed
through a place called Kinderhooka village of Low Dutch
origin, and of some antiquity. That night we succeeded in
coming near Albany, by making a very hard day's drive of
it. There was no village at the place where we slept; but
the house was a comfortable, and exceedingly neat Dutch
tavern. After quitting Fishkill we had seen more or less of
the river, until we passed Claverack, where we took our
leave of it. It was covered with ice, and sleighs were
moving about it, with great apparent security; but we did
not like to try it. Our whole party preferred a solid
high-way
,
in which there was no danger of the bottom's dropping
out.
As we were now about to enter Albany, the second
largest
town in the colony, and one of the largest inland towns
of the whole country, if such a word can properly be given
to a place that lies on a navigable river, it was thought
necessary
to make some few arrangements, in order to do it
decently. Instead of quitting the tavern at daylight,
therefore
,
as had been our practice previously, we remained
until after breakfast, having recourse to our trunks in the
mean time. Dirck, Jason and myself, had provided
ourselves
with fur caps for the journey, with ear-laps and other
contrivances for keeping oneself warm. The cap of Dirck,
and my own, were of very fine martens' skins, and as they
were round and high, and each was surmounted with a
handsome tail, that fell down behind, they had both a smart
and military air. I thought I had never seen Dirck look so
nobly and well, as he did in his cap, and I got a few
compliments
on my own air in mine, though they were only
from my mother, who, I do think, would feel disposed to
praise me, even if I looked wretchedly. The cap of Jason
was better suited to his purse, being lower, and of fox-skins,
though it had a tail also. Mr. Worden had declined
travelling
in a cap, as unsuited to his holy office. Accordingly
he wore his clerical beaver, which differed a little from the
ordinary cocked-hats, that we all wore as a matter of course,
though not so much so as to be very striking.
All of us had over-coats well trimmed with furs, mine
and Dirck's being really handsome, with trimmings of
marten
,
while those of our companion were less showy and
expensive. On a consultation, Dirck and I decided that it
was better taste to enter the town in traveller's dresses, than
to enter it in any other, and we merely smartened up a
little
,
in order to appear as gentlemen. The case was very
different with Jason. According to his idea a man should
wear his best clothes on a journey, and I was surprised to
see him appear at breakfast, in black breeches, striped
woollen stockings, large plated buckles in his shoes, and a
coat that I well knew he religiously reserved for high-days
and holidays. This coat was of a light pea-green colour,
and but little adapted to the season; but Jason had not much
notion of the fitness of things, in general, in matters of taste.
Dirck and myself wore our ordinary snuff-coloured coats,
under our furs; but Jason threw aside all the overcoats,
when we came near Albany, in order to enter the place in
his best. Fortunately for him, the day was mild, and there
was a bright sun to send its warm rays through the
pea-green
covering, to keep his blood from chilling. As for
Mr. Worden, he wore a cloak of black cloth, laying aside
all the furs, but a tippet and muff, both of which he used
habitually in cold weather.
In this guise, then, we left the tavern, about nine in the
morning, expecting to reach the banks of the river about
ten. Nor were we disappointed; the roads being excellent,
a light fall of snow having occurred in the night, to freshen
the track. It was an interesting moment to us all, when
the spires and roofs of that ancient town, Albany, first
appeared
in view! We had journeyed from near the southern
boundary of the colony, to a place that stood at no great
distance
from its frontier settlements on the north. The town itself
formed a pleasing object, as we approached it, on the opposite
side of the Hudson. There it lay, stretching along the low
land on the margin of the stream, and on its western bank,
sheltered by high hills, up the side of which, the principal
street extended, for the distance of fully a quarter of a mile.
Near the head of this street stood the fort, and we saw a
brigade paraded in the open ground near it, wheeling and
marching about. The spires of two churches were visible,
one, the oldest, being seated on the low land, in the heart
of the place, and the other on the height at no great
distance
from the fort; or about half-way up the acclivity,
which forms the barrier to the inner country, on that side
of the river. Both these buildings were of stone, of course,
shingle tenements being of very rare occurrence in the
colony of New York, though common enough further east.
[17]
[17]
In nothing was the difference of character between the people of
New England, and those of the middle colonies, more apparent than
in the nature of the dwellings. In New York, for instance, men worth
thousands dwelt in humble, low, (usually one story) dwellings of stone,
having window-shutters, frequently within as well as without, and the
other appliances of comfort; whereas the farmer farther east, was
seldom
satisfied, though his means were limited, unless he lived in a
house as good as his neighbour's; and the strife dotted the whole of
their colonies with wooden buildings, of great pretension for the age,
that rarely had even exterior shutters, and which frequently stood for
generations unfinished. The difference was not of Dutch origin, for
it was just as apparent in New Jersey or Pennsylvania as in New
York, and I think it may be attributed to a very obvious consequence
of a general equality of condition, a state of society in which no one is
content to wear even the semblance of poverty, but those who cannot
by any means prevent it; but, in which all strive to get as high as
possible
,
in appearance at least.
Editor
.
Vol. I.  14
I will own that not one of our party liked the idea of
crossing the Hudson, in a loaded sleigh, on the ice, and that
in the month of March. There were no streams about us
to be crossed in this mode, nor was the cold exactly
sufficient
to render such a transit safe, and we felt as the
inexperienced
would be apt to feel in circumstances so
unpleasant
.
I must do Jason the credit to admit that he showed
more plain, practical, good sense than any of us,
determining
our course in the end by his view of the matter. As
for Mr. Worden, however, nothing could induce him to
venture on the ice in a sleigh, or
near
a sleigh, though Jason
remonstrated in the following terms
Now, look here, Rev. Mr. Worden  Jason seldom
omitted anybody's
title
you 've only to turn your eyes
on the river to see it is dotted with sleighs, far and near.
There are highways north and south, and if that be the
place, where the crossing is at the town, it is more like a
thoroughfare than a spot that is risky. In my judgment,
these people who live hereabouts ought to know whether
there is any danger or not.
Obvious as was this truth, `Rev. Mr. Worden' made us
stop on terra firma, and permit him to quit the sleigh, that
he might cross the river on foot. Jason ventured a hint or
two about faith and its virtues, as he stripped himself to the
pea-green, in order to enter the town in proper guise,
throwing aside everything that concealed his finery. As
for Dirck and myself, we kept our seats manfully, and
trotted
on the river at the point where we saw sleighs and
foot-passengers
going and coming in some numbers. The Rev.
Mr. Worden, however, was not content to take the beaten
path, for he knew there was no more security in being out
on the ice,
near
a sleigh, than there was in being
in
it, so
he diverged from the road, which crossed at the ferry,
striking diagonally atwhart the river towards the wharves
of the place.
It seemed to me to be a sort of a holiday among the
young and idle, one sleigh passing us after another, filled
with young men and maidens, all sparkling with the
excitement
of the moment, and gay with youth and spirits.
We passed no less than four of these sleighs on the river,
the jingling of the bells, the quick movement, the laughter
and gaiety, and the animation of the whole scene, far
exceeding
anything of the sort I had ever before witnessed.
We were nearly across the river, when a sleigh more
handsomely
equipped than any we had yet seen, dashed down
the bank, and came whirling past us like a comet. It was
full of ladies, with the exception of one gentleman, who
stood erect in front, driving. I recognised Bulstrode, in furs
like all of us, capped and
tailed
, if not plumed, while
among the half-dozen pairs of brilliant eyes that were
turned with their owner's smiling faces on us, I saw one
which never could be forgotten by me, that belonged to
Anneke Mordaunt. I question if we were recognised, for
the passage was like that of a meteor; but I could not avoid
turning to gaze after the gay party. This change of
position enabled me to be a witness of a very amusing
consequence
of Mr. Worden's experiment. A sleigh was coming
in our direction, and the party in it seeing one who was
known for a clergyman,
walking
on the ice, turned aside
and approached him on a gallop, in order to offer the
courtesy of a seat to a man of his sacred profession. Our
divine heard the bells, and fearful of having a sleigh so
near him, he commenced a downright flight, pursued by the
people in the sleigh, as fast as their horses could follow.
Everybody on the ice pulled up to gaze in wonder at this
strange spectacle, until the whole party reached the shore,
the Rev. Mr. Worden pretty well blown, as the reader may
suppose.
CHAPTER XI.
Bid physicians talk our veins to temper,
And with an argument new-set a pulse,
Then think, my lord, of reasoning unto love.
Young
.
As
the road from the ferry into the town ran along the
bank of the river, we reached the point where the Rev. Mr.
Worden had landed precisely at the same instant with his
pursuers, who had been obliged to make a little circuit, in
order to get off the ice. I do not know which party
regarded
the other in the greatest astonishment,the hunted,
or the hunters. The sleigh had in it two fine-looking
young fellows, that spoke English with a slight Dutch
accent, and three young women, whose bright coal-black
eyes betokened surprise a little mitigated by a desire to
laugh. Seeing that we were all strangers, I suppose, and
that we claimed the runaway as belonging to our party,
one of the young men raised his cap very respectfully, and
opened the discourse by asking in a very civil tone
What ails the reverent gentleman, to make him run so
fast?
Run! exclaimed Mr. Worden, whose lungs had been
playing like a blacksmith's bellows  Run! and who
would not run to save himself from being drowned?
Drowned! repeated the young Dutchman, looking
round at the river, as if to ascertain whether the ice were
actually movingwhy does the Dominie suppose there
was any danger of
that?
As Mr. Worden's bellows were still hard at work, I
explained
to the young Albanians that we were strangers just
arrived from the vicinity of New York; that we were
unaccustomed
to frozen rivers, and had never crossed one on
the ice before; that our reverend companion had chosen to
walk at a distance from the road, in order to be in less
danger should any team break in, and that he had naturally
run to avoid their sleigh when he saw it approaching. The
Albanians heard this account in respectful silence, though I
could see the two young men casting sly glances at each
other, and that even the ladies had some little difficulty in
altogether suppressing their smiles. When it was through,
the oldest of the Dutchmena fine, dare-devil,
roystering-looking
fellow of four or five-and-twenty, whose dress and
mien, however, denoted a person of the upper class,begged
a thousand pardons for his mistake, quitting his sleigh and
insisting on having the honours of shaking hands with the
whole of us. His name was `Ten Eyck,' he said;' `Guert
Ten Eyck,' and he asked permission, as we were strangers,
of doing the honour of Albany to us. Everybody in the
place knew him, which, as we afterwards ascertained, was
true enough, for he had just as much reputation for fun and
frolic as at all comported with respectability; keeping along,
as it were, on the very verge of the pale of reputable
people
,
without being thrown entirely out of it. The young
females with him were a shade below his own natural
position
in society, tolerating his frolics on account of this
circumstance
,
aided as it was by a singularly manly face and
person, a hearty and ready laugh, a full purse, and possibly
by the secret hope of being the happy individual who was
designed by Providence to convert `a reformed rake into the
best of husbands.' In a word, he was always welcome with
them, when those a little above them felt more disposed to
frown.
Of course, all this was unknown to us at the time, and
we accepted Guert Ten Eyck's proffers of civility in the
spirit in which they were offered. He inquired at what
tavern we intended to stop, and promised an early call.
Then, shaking us all round by the hand again with great
cordiality, he took his leave. His companion doffed a very
dashing, high, wolf-skin cap to us, and the black-eyed trio,
on the hind seat, smiled graciously, and away they drove at
a furious rate, startling all the echoes of Albany with their
bells. By this time Mr. Worden was seated, and we
followed
more moderately, our team having none of the Dutch
courage of a pair of horses fresh from the stable. Such
were the circumstances under which we made our entrance
into the ancient city of Albany. We were all in hopes, the
little affair of the chase would soon be forgotten, for no one
likes to be associated with a ridiculous circumstance; but
14 *
we counted without our host. Guert Ten Eyck was not of
a temperament to let such an affair sleep, but, as I
afterwards
ascertained, he told it with the laughing
embellishments
that belonged to his reckless character, until, in turn,
the Rev. Mr. Worden came to be known, throughout all that
region, by the nickname of the Loping Dominie.
The reader may be assured our eyes were about us, as
we drove through the streets of the second town in the
colony. We were not unaccustomed to houses constructed
in the Dutch style, in New York, though the English mode
of building had been most in vogue there, for half a century.
It was not so with Albany, which remained, essentially, a
Dutch town, in 1758. We heard little beside Dutch, as we
passed along. The women scolded their children in Low
Dutch, a use, by the way, for which the language appears
singularly well adapted; the negroes sang Dutch songs;
the men called to each other in Dutch, and Dutch rang in
our ears, as we walked our horses through the streets,
towards
the tavern. There were many soldiers about, and
other proofs of the presence of a considerable military force
were not wanting; still, the place struck me as very
provincial
and peculiar, after New York. Nearly all the
houses were built with their gables to the streets, and each
had heavy wooden Dutch stoops, with seats, at its door. A
few had small court-yards in front, and, here and there, was
a building of somewhat more pretension than usual. I do
not think, however, there were fifty houses in the place,
that were built with their gables off the line of the streets.
[18]
[18]
The population of Albany could not have reached 4000 in 1758.
Its Dutch character remained down to the close of this century, with
gradual changes. The writer can remember when quite as much
Dutch as English was heard in the streets of Albany, though it has
now nearly disappeared. The present population must be near
40,000.
[20] Mr. Littlepage's description was doubtless correct, at the time he
wrote; but Albany would now be considered a first-class country
town, in Europe. It has much better claims to compare with the
towns of the old world, in this character, than New York has to
compare
with their capitals.
Editor
.
We were no sooner housed, than Dirck and I sallied forth
to look at the place. Here we were, in one of the oldest
towns of America; a place that could boast of much more
than a century's existence, and it was natural to feel curious
to look about one. Our inn was in the principal street,
that which led up the hill towards the fort. This street was
a wide avenue, that quite put Broadway out of countenance,
so far as mere width was concerned. The streets that led
out of it, however, were principally little better than lanes,
as if the space that had been given to two or three of the
main streets had been taken off of the remainder. The High
Street, as we English would call it, was occupied by sleds
filled with wood for sale; sleds loaded with geese, turkeys,
tame and wild, and poultry of all sorts; sleds with venison,
still in the skin, piled up in heaps, &c.,all these eatables
being collected, in unusual quantities as we were told, to
meet the extraordinary demand created by the different
military messes. Deer were no strangers to us; for Long
Island was full of all sorts of game, as were the upper
counties
of New Jersey. Even Westchester, old and well
settled as it had become, was not yet altogether clear of
deer, and nothing was easier than to knock over a buck in
the highlands. Nevertheless, I had never seen venison,
wild turkeys and sturgeons, in such quantities as they were
to be seen that day in the principal street of Albany.
The crowd collected in this street, the sleighs that were
whirling past, filled with young men and maidens, the
incessant
jingling of bells, the spluttering and jawing in Low
Dutch, the hearty English oaths of serjeants and
sutlers'men
and cooks of messes, the loud laughs of the blacks,
and the beauty of the cold clear day, altogether produced
some such effect on me, as I had experienced when I went
to the theatre. Not the least striking picture of the scene,
was Jason, in the middle of the street, gaping about him, in
the cocked-hat, the pea-green coat, and the striped woollen
stockings.
Dirck and myself naturally examined the churches.
These were two, as has been said already,  one for the
Dutch, and the other for the English. The first was the
oldest. It stood at the point where the two principal streets
crossed each other, and in the centre of the street, leaving
sufficient passages all round it. The building was square,
with a high pointed roof, having a belfry and weathercock
on its apex; windows, with diamond panes and painted glass,
and a porch that was well suited both to the climate and to
appearances.
[19]
[19]
There were two churches, of this character, built on this spot.
The second, much larger than the first, but of the same form, was
built
round
the other, in which service was held to the last, when it
was literally thrown out of the windows of its successor. The last
edifice disappeared about forty years since.
Editor
.
We were examining this structure, when Guert Ten Eyck
accosted us, in his frank, off-hand way
Your servant, Mr. Littlepage; your servant, Mr.
Follock
,
he cried, again shaking each cordially by the hand.
I was on the way to the tavern to look you up, when I
accidentally saw you here. A few gentlemen of my
acquaintance
,
who are in the habit of supping together in the
winter time, meet for the last jollification of the season
to-night
,
and they have all express't a wish to have the
pleasure
of your company. I hope you will allow me to say you
will come? We meet at nine, sup at ten, and break up
at twelve, quite regularly, in a very sedate and prudent
manner.
There was something so frank and cordial, so simple and
straight-forward in this invitation, that we did not know how
to decline it. We both knew that the name of Ten Eyck
was respectable in the colony; our new acquaintance was
well dressed, he seemed to be in good company when we
first met him, his sleigh and horses had been actually of a
more dashing stamp than usual, and his own attire had all
the peculiarities of a gentleman's, with the addition of
something
even more decided and knowing than was common.
It is true, the style of these peculiarities was not exactly
such as I had seen in the air, manners and personal
decorations
of those of Billings and Harris; but they were none
the less striking, and none the less attractive; the two
Englishmen
being macaronis, from London, and Ten Eyck
being a buck of Albany.
I thank you, very heartily, Mr. Ten Eyck, I
answered
,
both for myself and for my friend
And will let me come for you at half-past eight, to show
you the way?
Why, yes, sir; I was about to say as much, if it be
not giving you too much trouble.
Do not speak of tr-r-ouplethis last word will give a
very good notion of Guert's accent, which I cannot stop to
imitate at all times in writingand do not say your
fre'nt
, but your
fre'ntz
.
As to the two that are not here, I cannot positively
answer
;
yonder, however, is one that can speak for himself.
I see him, Mr. Littlepage, and will answer for
him
, on
my own account. Depent on it,
he
will come. But the
Dominiehe has a hearty look, and can help eat a turkey
and swallow a glass of goot Madeira  I think I can rely
on. A man cannot take all that active exercise without
food.
Mr. Worden is a very companionable man, and is
excellent
company at a supper-table. I will communicate
your invitation, and hope to be able to prevail on him to be
of the party.
T'at is enough, sir, returned Ten Eyck, or Guert, as I
shall henceforth call him, in general; vere dere ist a vill,
dere ist a vay. Guert frequently broke out in such
specimens
of broken English, while at other times he would
speak almost as well as any of us. So Got pless you
my dear Mr. Littlepage, and make us lasting friends. I
like your countenance, and my eye never deceives me in
these matters.
Here, Guert shook us both by the hand again, most
cordially
,
and left us. Dirck and I next strolled up the hill,
going as high as the English church, which stood also in
the centre of the principal street, an imposing and massive
edifice in stone. With the exception of Mother Trinity in
New York, this was the largest, and altogether the most
important edifice devoted to the worship of my own church
I had ever seen. In Westchester, there were several of
Queen Anne's churches, but none on a scale to compare
with this. Our small edifices were usually without
galleries
,
steeples, towers, or bells; while St. Peter's, Albany,
if not actually St. Peter's, Rome, was a building of which
a man might be proud. A little to our surprise, we
found the Rev. Mr. Worden and Mr. Jason Newcome had
met at the door of this edifice, having sent a boy to the
sexton in quest of the key. In a minute or two, the urchin
returned, bringing not only the key of the church, but the
excuses of the sexton for not coming himself. The door
was opened, and we went in.
I have always admired the decorous and spiritual manner
in which the Rev. Mr. Worden entered a building that had
been consecrated to the services of the Deity. I know not
how to describe it; but it proved how completely he had
been drilled in the decencies of his profession. Off came
his hat, of course; and his manner, however facetious and
easy it may have been the moment before, changed on the
instant to gravity and decorum. Not so with Jason. He
entered St. Peter's, Albany, with exactly the same
indifferent
and cynical air with which he had seemed to regard
everything but money, since he entered York Colony.
Usually, he wore his cocked-hat on the back of his head,
thereby lending himself a lolloping, negligent, and, at the
same time, defying air; but I observed that, as we all
uncovered
,
he brought his own beaver up over his eye-brows,
in a species of military bravado. To uncover to a church,
in his view of the matter, was a sort of idolatry; there
might be images about, for anything he knew; and a man
could never be enough on his guard ag'in being carried
away by such evil deceptions, as he had once before
answered
to a remonstrance of mine, for wearing his hat in
our own parish church.
I found the interior of St. Peter's quite as imposing as its
exterior. Three of the pews were canopied, having coats
of arms on their canopies. These, the boy told us, belonged
to the Van Rensselaer and Schuyler families. All these
were covered with black cloth, in mourning for some death
in those ancient families, which were closely allied. I was
very much struck with the dignified air that these patrician
seats gave the house of God.
[20]
[20]
I cannot recollect one of these canopied pews that is now
standing
,
in this part of the Union. The last, of my knowledge, were in
St. Mark's, New York, and, I believe, belonged to the Stuyvesants;
the patron family of that church. They were taken down when
that building was repaired, a few years since. This is one of the most
innocent of all our innovations of this character. Distinctions in the
House of God are opposed to the very spirit of the Christian religion;
and it were far more fitting that pews should be altogether done away
with, the true mode of assembling under the sacred roof, than that
men should be classed even at the foot of the altar.
It may be questioned if a hatchment is now hung up, either on the
dwelling, or in a church, in any part of America. They were to be
seen, however, in the early part of the present century. Whenever
any such traces of ancient usages are met with among us, by the
traveller from the old world, he is apt to mistake them for the shadows
that coming events cast before, instead of those of the past.
Editor
.
There were also several
hatchments suspended against the walls; some being placed
there in commemoration of officers of rank, from home, who
had died in the king's service in the colony; and others to
mark the deaths of some of the more distinguished of our
own people.
Mr. Worden expressed himself well pleased with
appearances
of things, in and about this building; though Jason
regarded all with ill-concealed disgust.
What is the meaning of them pews with tops to them,
Corny? the pedagogue whispered me, afraid to encounter
the parson's remarks, by his own criticism.
They are the pews of families of distinction in this
place, Mr. Newcome; and the canopies, or tops, as you call
them, are honourable signs of their owners' conditions.
Do you think their owners will sit under such coverings
in paradise, Corny? continued Jason, with a sneer.
It is impossible for me to say, sir; it is probable,
however
,
the just will not require any such mark to distinguish
them from the unjust.
Let me see, said Jason, looking round and affecting to
count; there are just threeBishop, Priest, and Deacon,
I suppose. Waal, there's a seat for each, and they can be
comfortable
here
, whatever may turn up
herea'ter
.
I turned away, unwilling to dispute the point, for I knew
it was as hopeless to expect that a Danbury man would feel
like a New Yorker, on such a subject, as it was to expect
that a New Yorker could be made to adopt Danbury
sentiments
.
As for the
argument
, however, I have heard others
of pretty much the same calibre often urged against the three
orders of the ministry.
On quitting St. Peter's, I communicated the invitation of
Guert Ten Eyck to Mr. Worden, and urged him to be of the
party. I could see that the notion of a pleasant supper was
anything but unpleasant to the missionary. Still he had
his scruples, inasmuch as he had not yet seen his reverend
brother who had the charge of St. Peter's, did not know
exactly the temper of his mind, and was particularly
desirous
of officiating for him, in the presence of the principal
personages of the place, on the approaching Sunday. He
had written a note to the chaplain; for the person who had
the cure of the Episcopalians held that rank in the army,
St. Peter's being as much of an official chapel as a parish
church; and he must have an interview with that individual
before he could decide. Fortunately, as we descended the
street, towards our inn, we saw the very person in question.
The marks of the common office that these two divines bore
about their persons in their dress, sufficed to make them
known to each other at a glance. In five minutes, they had
shaken hands, heard each man's account of himself, had
given and accepted the invitation to preach, and were
otherwise
on free and easy terms. Mr. Worden was to dine in
the fort, with the chaplain. We then walked forward
towards
the tavern.
By the way, Mr. , said Mr. Worden, in a
parenthesis
of the discourse, the family of Ten Eyck is quite
respectable, here in Albany.
Very much so, sir  a family that is held in much
esteem. I shall count on your assisting me, morning and
evening, my dear Mr. Worden.
It is surprising how the clergy do depend on each other
for `assistance!'
Make your arrangements accordingly, my good brother
I am quite fresh, and have brought a good stock of
sermons
;
not knowing how much might remain to be done in
the army. Corny, in a half-whisper, you can let our
new friends know that I will sup with them; and, harkee
just drop a hint to them, that I am none of your puritans.
Here, then, we found everything in a very fair way to
bring us all out in society, within the first two hours of our
arrival. Mr. Worden was engaged to preach the next day
but one; and he was engaged to supper that same day. All
looked promising, and I hurried on in order to ascertain if
Guert Ten Eyck had made his promised call. As before,
he was met in the street, and the acceptance of the
Dominie
was duly communicated. Guert seemed highly pleased
at this success; and he left me, promising to be punctual to
his hour. In the mean time, we had to dine.
The dinner proved a good one; and, as Mr. Worden
remarked, it was quite lucky that the principal dish was
venison, a meat that was so easy of digestion, as to promise
no great obstacle to the accommodation of the supper. He
should dine on venison, therefore; and he advised all three
of us to follow his example. But, certain Dutch dishes
attracted
the eye and taste of Dirck; while Jason had alighted
on a hash, of some sort or other, that he did not quit until
he had effectually disposed of it. As for myself, I confess,
the venison was so much to my taste, that I stuck by the
parson. We had our wine, too, and left the table early, in
order not to interfere with the business of the night.
After dinner, it was proposed to walk out in a body, to
make a further examination of the place, and to see if we
could not fall in with an army contractor, who might be
disposed
to relieve Dirck and myself of some portion of our
charge. Luck again threw us in the way of Guert Ten
Eyck, who seemed to live in the public street. In the
course of a brief conversation that took place, as a passing
compliment, I happened to mention a wish to ascertain
where one might dispose of a few horses, and of two or three
sleigh-loads of flour, pork, &c., &c.
My dear Mr. Littlepage, said Guert, with a frank smile
and a friendly shake of the hand, I am delighted that you
have mentioned these matters to me; I can take you to the
very man you wish to see; a heavy army-contractor, who
is buying up everything of the sort he can lay his hands
on.
Of course, I was as much delighted as Guert could very
well be, and left my party to proceed at once to the
contractor's
office, with the greatest alacrity; Dirck
accompanying
me. As we went along, our new friend advised us
not to be very backward in the way of price, since the king
paid, in the long run.
Rich dealers ought to pay well, he added; and, I
can tell you, as a useful thing to know, that orders came on,
no later than yesterday, to buy up everything of the sort
that offered. Put sleigh and harness, at once, all in a heap,
on the king's servants.
Vol. I.  15
I thought the idea not a bad one, and promised to profit
by it. Guert was as good as his word, and I was properly
introduced to the contractor. My business was no sooner
mentioned, than I was desired to send a messenger round to
the stables, in order that my conveyance, team, &c., might
make their appearance. As for the articles that were still
on the road, I had very little trouble. The contractor knew
my father, and he no sooner heard that Mr. Littlepage, of
Satanstoe, was the owner of the provisions, than he
purchased
the whole on the guaranty of his name. For the
pork I was to receive two half-joes the barrel, and for the
flour one. This was a good sale. The horses would be
taken, if serviceable, as the contractor did not question, as
would the lumber-sleighs, though the prices could not be set
until the different animals and objects were seen and
examined
.
It is amazing what war will do for commerce, as well as
what it does against it! The demand for everything that
the judgment of my father had anticipated, was so great,
that the contractor told me very frankly the sleighs would
not be unloaded in Albany at all, but would be sent on
north, on the line of the expected route of the army, so as
to anticipate the disappearance of the snow and the
breaking
up of the roads.
You shall be paid liberally for your teams, harness and
sleighs, he continued, though no sum can be named until
I see them. These are not times when operations are to
be retarded on account of a few joes, more or less, for the
King's service must go on. I very well know that Major
Littlepage and Col. Follock both understand what they are
about, and have sent us the right sort of things. The
horses are very likely a little old, but are good for one
campaign; better than if younger, perhaps, and were they
colts we could get no more than that out of them. These
movements in the woods destroy man and beast, and cost
mints of money. Ah! There comes your team.
Sure enough, the sleigh drove round from the tavern, and
we all went out to look at the horses, &c. Guert now
became
an important person. On the subject of horses he
was accounted an oracle, and he talked, moved, and acted
like one in all respects. The first thing he did was to step
up to the animal's head, and to look into the mouth of each
in succession. The knowing way in which this was done,
the coolness of the interference, and the fine, manly form
of the intruder, would have given him at once a certain
importance and a connection with what was going on, had
not his character for judgment in horse-flesh been well
established
,
far and near, in that quarter of the country.
Upon my word, wonderfully good mouths! exclaimed
Guert, when through. You must have your grain ground,
Mr. Littlepage, or the teeth never could have stood it so
well!
What age do you call the animals, Guert? demanded
the contractor.
That is not so easily told, sir. I admit that they are
aged horses; but they may be eight, or nine, or even ten,
as for what can be told by their teeth. By the looks of
their limbs, I should think they might be nine coming
grass.
The near-horse is eleven, I said, and the off-horse
is supposed to be
Poh! poh! Littlepage, interrupted Guert, making signs
to me to be quietyou may
think
the off-horse ten, but
I should place him at about nine. His teeth are excellent,
and there is not even a wind-gall on his legs. There is a
cross of the Flemish in that beast.
Well, and what do you say the pair is worth, Master
Guert, demanded the contractor, who seemed to have a
certain confidence in his friend's judgment, notwithstanding
the recklessness and freedom of his manner. Twelve
half-joes for them both?
That will never do, Mr. Contractor, answered Guert,
shaking his head. In times like these, such stout animals,
and beasts too in such heart and condition, ought to bring
fifteen.
Fifteen let it be then, if Mr. Littlepage assents. Now
for the sleigh, and harness, and skins. I suppose Mr.
Littlepage
will part with the skins too, as he can have no use for
them without the sleigh?
Have
you
, Mr. Contractor? asked Guert, a little
abruptly. That bear-skin fills my eye beautifully, and if
Mr. Littlepage will take a guinea for it, here is his money.
As this was a fair price, it was accepted, though I pressed
the skin on Guert as a gift, in remembrance of our accidental
acquaintance. This offer, however, he respectfully, but
firmly resisted. And here I will take occasion to say, lest
the reader be misled by what is met with in works of fiction,
and other light and vain productions, that in all my dealings,
and future connection with Guert, I found him strictly
honourable in money matters. It is true, I would not have
purchased a horse on his recommendation, if he owned the
beast; but we all know how the best men yield in their
morals when they come to deal in horses. I should scarcely
have expected Mr. Worden to be orthodox, in making such
bargains. But, on all other subjects connected with money,
Guert Ten Eyck was one of the honestest fellows I ever dealt
with.
The contractor took the sleigh, harness, and skins, at
seven more half-joes; making twenty-three for the whole
outfit. This was certainly receiving two half-joes more
than my father had expected; and I owed the gain of
sixteen
dollars to Guert's friendly and bold interference. As
soon as the prices were settled, the money was paid me in
good Spanish gold; and I handed over to Dirck the portion
that properly fell to his father's share. As it was
understood
that the remaining horses, sleighs, harness, provisions,
&c., were to be taken at an appraisal, the instant they
arrived, this hour's work relieved my friend and myself
from any further trouble on the subject of the property
entrusted
to our care. And a relief it was to be so well rid of
a responsibility that was as new as it was heavy to each
of us.
The reader will get some idea of the pressure of affairs,
and how necessary it was felt to be on the alert in the month
of March  a time of the year when twenty-four hours
might bring about a change in the seasonby the
circumstance
that the contractor sent his new purchase to be loaded
up from the door of his office, with orders to proceed on
north, with supplies for a dpt that he was making as near
to Lake George as was deemed prudent; the French being
in force at Ticonderoga and Crown Point, two posts at the
head of Champlain; a distance considerably less than a
hundred miles from Albany. Whatever was forwarded as
far as Lake George while the snow lasted, could then be
sent on with the army, in the contemplated operations of the
approaching summer, by means of the two lakes, and their
northern outlets.
Well, Mr. Littlepage, cried Guert, heartily;
that
affair is well disposed of. You got goot prices, and I hope
the King has got goot horses. They are a little venerable,
perhaps; but what of that? The army would knock up
the best and youngest beast in the colony, in one campaign
in the woots; and it can do no more with the oldest and
worst. Shall we walk rount into the main street,
gentlemen
?
This is about the hour when the young ladies are
apt to start for their afternoon sleighing.
I suppose the ladies of Albany are remarkable for their
beauty, Mr. Ten Eyck, I rejoined, wishing to say
something
agreeable to a man who seemed so desirous of serving
me. The specimens I saw in crossing the river this
morning, would induce a stranger to think so.
Sir, replied Guert, walking towards the great avenue
of the town, we are content with our ladies, in general,
for they are charming, warm-hearted and amiable; but
there has been an arrival among us this winter, from your
part of the colony, that has almost melted the ice on the
Hudson!
My heart beat quicker, for I could only think of one
being
of her sex, as likely to produce such a sensation. Still,
I could not abstain from making a direct inquiry on the
subject.
From
our
part of the colony, Mr. Ten Eyck!You
mean from New York, probably?
Yes, sir, as a matter of course. There are several
beautiful English women who have come up with the army;
but no colonel, major, or captain, has brought such
paragons
with him, as Herman Mordaunt, a gentleman who
may be known to you by name?
Personally too, sir. Herman Mordaunt is even a
kinsman
of Dirck Follock, my friend here.
Then is Mr. Follock to be envied, since he can call
cousin with so charming a young lady as Anneke
Mordaunt
.
15 *
True sir, most true! I interrupted, eagerly; Anne
Mordaunt passes for the sweetest girl in York!
I do not know that I should go quite as far as that, Mr.
Littlepage, returned Guert, moderating his warmth, in a
manner that a little surprised me, though his handsome face
still glowed with honest, natural admiration; since there
is a Miss Mary Wallace in her company, that is quite as
much thought of, here in Albany, as her friend, Miss
Mordaunt
.
Mary Wallace! The idea of comparing the silent,
thoughtful, excellent though she were, Mary Wallace, with
Anneke could never have crossed my mind. Still, Mary
Wallace certainly
was
a very charming girl. She was
even handsome; had a placid, saint-like character of
countenance
that had often struck me, singular beauty and
development of form, and, in any other company than that
of Anneke's, might well have attracted the first attention of
the most fastidious beholder.
And Guert Ten Eyck admired,perhaps loved, Mary
Wallace! Here, then, was fresh evidence how much we
are all inclined to love our opposites; to form close
friendships
with those who resemble us least, principles excepted,
for virtue can never cling to vice, and how much more
interest
novelty possesses in the human breast, than the
repetition of things to which we are accustomed. No two
beings could be less alike than Mary Wallace and Guert
Ten Eyck; yet the last admired the first.
Miss Wallace is a very charming young lady, Mr.
Ten Eyck, I rejoined, as soon as wonder would allow me
to answer, and I am not surprised you speak of her in
terms of so much admiration.
Guert stopped short in the street, looked me full in the
face with an expression of truth that could not well be
feigned, squeezed my hand fervently, and rejoined with a
strange frankness, that I could not have imitated, to be
master of all I saw
Admiration, Mr. Littlepage, is not a wort strong
enough for what I feel for Mary! I would marry her in
the next hour, and love and cherish her for all the rest of
my life. I worship
her
, and love the earth she treads on.
And you have told her this, Mr. Ten Eyck?
Fifty times, sir. She has now been two months in
Albany
,
and my love was secured within the first week. I
offered myself too soon, I fear; for Mary is a prutent,
sensible
young woman, and girls of that character are apt to
distrust the youth who is too quick in his advances. They
like to be served, sir, for seven years and seven years, as
Joseph served for Potiphar.
You mean, most likely, Mr. Ten Eyck, as Jacob served
for Rachel.
Well, sir, it may be as you say, dough I t'ink that in
our Dutch Bibles, it stands as Joseph served for Potiphar
but you know what I mean, Mr. Littlepage. If you wish to
see the ladies, and will come with me, I will go to a place
where Herman Mordaunt's sleigh invariaply passes at this
hour, for the ladies almost live in the air. I never miss
the occasion of seeing them.
I had now a clue to Guert's being so much in the street.
He was as good as his word, however, for he took a stand
near the Dutch church, where I soon had the happiness of
seeing Anneke and her friend driving past, on their
evening's
excursion. How blooming and lovely the former
looked! Mary Wallace's eye turned, I fancied
understandingly
,
to the corner where Guert had placed himself, and
her colour deepened as she returned his bow. But, the
start of surprise, the smile, and the lightening eye of Anneke,
as she unexpectedly saw me, filled my soul with delight,
almost too great to be borne.
CHAPTER XII.
Then the wine it gets into their heads,
And turns the wit out of its station;
Nonsense gets in, in its stead,
And their puns are now all botheration.
The Punning Society
.
Guert
Ten Eyck looked at me expressively, as the sleigh
whirled round an angle of the building and disappeared.
He then proposed that we should proceed. On ascending
the main street, I was not a little surprised at discovering
the sort of amusement that was going on, and in which it
seemed to me all the youths of the place were engaged.
By youths, I do not mean lads of twelve and fourteen, but
young men of eighteen and twenty, the amusement being
that of sliding down hill, or coasting, as I am told it is
called in Boston. The acclivity was quite sharp, and of
sufficient length to give an impetus to the sled, that was set
in motion at a short distance above the English church; an
impetus that would carry it past the Dutch churcha
distance
that was somewhat more than a quarter of a mile.
The hand-sleds employed, were of a size and construction
suited to the dimensions of those that used them; and, as a
matter of course, there was no New Yorker that had not
learned how to govern the motion of one of these vehicles,
even when gliding down the steepest descent, with the nicest
delicacy and greatest ease. As children, or boys as late in
life as fourteen even, every male in the colony, and not a
few of the females, had acquired this art; but this was the
first place in which I had ever known adults to engage in
the sport. The accidental circumstance of a hill's
belonging
to the principal street, joined to the severity of the
winters
,
had rendered an amusement suited to grown people,
that, elsewhere, was monopolized by the children.
By the time we had ascended as high as the English
church, a party of young officers came down from the fort,
gay with the glass and the song of the regimental mess.
No sooner did they reach the starting-point, than three or
four of the more youthful got possession of as many sleds,
and off they went, like the shot starting from its gun. Nobody
seemed to think it strange; but, on the contrary, I observed
that the elderly people looked on with a complacent gravity,
that seemed to say how vividly the sight recalled the days
of their own youth. I cannot say, however, that the
strangers
succeeded very well in managing their sleds, generally
meeting with some stoppage before they reached the bottom
of the hill.
Will you take a slide, Mr. Littlepage? Guert demanded,
with a courteous gravity, that showed how serious a business
he fancied the sport. Here is a large and strong sled that
will carry double, and you might trust yourself with me,
though a regiment of horse were paraded down below.
But are we not a little too
old
for such an amusement,
in the streets of a large town, Mr. Ten Eyck? I answered,
doubtingly, looking round me in an uncertain manner, as
one who did not like to adventure, even while he hesitated
to refuse. Those king's officers are privileged people,
you know.
No man has a higher privilege to use the streets of
Albany, than Mr. Cornelius Littlepage, sir, I can assure
you. The young ladies often honour me with their
company
,
and no accident has ever happened.
Do the young ladies venture to ride down
this
street,
Mr. Ten Eyck?
Not often, sir, I grant you; though that
has
been done,
too, of a moonlight night. There is a more retired spot, at
no great distance from this street, however, to which the
ladies are rather more partial. Look, Mr. Littlepage!
There goes the Hon. Capt. Monson, of the th, and he
will be down the hill and up again before we are off, unless
you hurry. Take your seat, lady-fashion, and leave me to
manage the sled.
What could I do! Guert had been so very civil, was so
much in earnest, everybody seemed to expect it of me, and
the Hon. Capt. Monson was already a hundred yards on his
way to the bottom, shooting ahead with the velocity of an
arrow. I took my seat, accordingly, placing my feet
together
on the front round,
lady-fashion
, as directed. In
an instant, Guert's manly frame was behind me, with a leg
extended on each side of the sled, the government of which,
as every American who has been born north of the Potomac
well knows, is effected by delicate touches of the heels.
Guert called out to the boys for a shove, and away we
went, like the ship that is bound for her destined element,
as the poets say. We got a good start, and left the spot as
the arrow leaves its bow.
Shall I own the truth, and confess I had a momentary
pleasure in the excitement produced by the rapidity of the
motion, by the race we were running with another sled, and
by the skill and ease with which Guert, almost without
touching the ground, carried us unharmed through sundry
narrow passages, and along the line of wood and venison
loaded sleighs, barely clearing the noses of their horses. I
forgot that I was making this strange exhibition of myself,
in a strange place, and almost in strange company. So
rapid was our motion, however, that the danger of being
recognised was not very great; and there were so many to
divide attention, that the act of folly would have been
overlooked
,
but for a most untimely and unexpected accident.
We had gone the entire length between the two churches
with great success,several steady, grave, and
respectable-looking
old burghers calling out, on a high key, Vell
done, Guert!for Guert appeared to be a general
favourite
,
in the sense of fun and frolic at least,when, turning
an angle of the Old Dutch Temple, in the ambitious wish
of shooting past it, in order to run still lower and shoot off
the wharf upon the river, we found ourselves in imminent
danger of running under the fore-legs of two foaming
horses, that were whirling a sleigh around the same corner
of the church. Nothing saved us but Guert's readiness and
physical power. By digging a heel into the snow, he
caused the sled to fly round at a right angle to its former
course, and us to fly off it, heels over head, without much
regard to the proprieties, so far as postures or grace was
concerned. The negro who drove the sleigh pulled up, at
the same instant, with so much force as to throw his horses
on their haunches. The result of these combined
movements
was to cause Guert and myself to roll over in such a
way as to regain our feet directly alongside of the sleigh.
In rising to my feet, indeed, I laid a hand on the side of the
vehicle, in order to assist me in the effort.
What a sight met my eyes! In the front stood the negro,
grinning from ear to ear; for
he
deemed every disaster that
occurred on runners a fit subject for merriment. Who ever
did anything but laugh at seeing a sleigh upset?and it
was consequently quite in rule to do so on seeing two
overgrown
boys roll over from a hand-sled. I could have
knocked the rascal down, with a good will, but it would not
have done to resent mirth that proceeded from so legitimate
a cause. Had I been disposed to act differently, however,
the strength and courage necessary to effect such a purpose
would have been annihilated in me, by finding myself
standing
within three feet, and directly in front of Anneke
Mordaunt
and Mary Wallace! The shame at being thus
detected
in the disastrous termination of so boyish a flight, at
first nearly overcame me. How Guert felt I do not know,
but, for a single instant, I wished him in the middle of the
Hudson, and all Albany, its Dutch Church, sleds, hill, and
smoking burghers included, on top of him.
Mr. Littlepage! burst out of the rosy lips of Anneke,
in a tone of voice that was not to be misunderstood.
Mr. Guert Ten Eyck! exclaimed Mary Wallace, in
an accent and manner that bespoke chagrin.
At your service, Miss Mary, answered Guert, who
looked a little sheepish at the result of his exploit, though
for a reason I did not at first comprehend, brushing some
snow from his cap at the same timeAt your service,
now and ever, Miss Mary. But, do not suppose it was
awkwardness that produced this accident, I entreat of you.
It was altogether the fault of the boy who is stationed to
give warning of sleighs below the church, who must have
left his post. Whenever either of you young ladies will do
me the honour to take a seat with me, I will pledge my
character
,
as an Albanian, to carry her to the foot of the
highest
and steepest hill in town without disturbing a riband.
Mary Wallace made no answer; and I fancied she looked
a little sad. It is possible Anneke saw and understood this
feeling, for she answered with a spirit that I had never seen
her manifest before
No, no, Mr. Ten Eyck, she said; when Miss
Wallace
or I wish to ride down hill, and become little girls again,
we will trust ourselves with boys, whose constant practice
will be likely to render them more expert than men can be,
who have had time to forget the habits of their childhood.
Pompey, we will return home.
The cold inclination of the head that succeeded, while it
was sufficiently gracious to preserve appearances, proved
too plainly that neither Guert nor myself had risen in the
estimation of his mistress, by this boyish exhibition of his
skill with the hand-sled. Had either of these young ladies
been Albanians, it is probable they would have laughed at
our mishap; but no high hill running directly into New
York, the custom that prevailed at Albany did not prevail
in the capital. Small boys alone used the hand-sled in that
part of the colony, while the taste continued longer among
the more stable and constant Dutch. Of course, we had
nothing to do but to make profound bows, and suffer the
negro to move on.
There it is, Littlepage, exclaimed Guert, with a species
of sigh; I shall have nothing but iced looks for the next
week, and all for riding down hill four or five years later
than is the rule. Everybody, hereabouts, uses the hand-sled
until eighteen, or so; and I am only five-and-twenty. Pray,
what may be your age, my dear fellow?
Twenty-one, only about a month since. I wish, with
all my heart, it were ten!
Turned the corner!well, that's unlucky; but we must
make the best of it. My taste is for
fun
, and so I have
admitted to Miss Wallace, twenty times; but she tells me
that, after a certain period, men should look to graver things,
and think of their country. She has lectured me already,
once, on the subject of sliding; though she allows that
skating is a manly exercise.
When a lady takes the trouble to lecture, it is a sure
sign she feels some interest in the subject.
By St. Nicholas! I never thought of that, Littlepage!
cried Guert, who, notwithstanding the great advantages he
possessed in the way of face and figure, turned out to have
less personal vanity about him than almost any man I ever
met with.
Lecture
me she has, and that more than once,
too!
The lady who lectures
me
, sir, will not get rid of me,
at the end of the discourse.
That's manly! I like it, Littlepage; and I like
you
. I
foresee we shall be great friends; and we'll talk more of
this matter another time. Now, Mary has spoken to me
of the war, and hinted that a single man, like myself, with
the world before him, might do something to make his name
known in it. I did not like that; for a girl who loved a
fellow would not wish to have him shot.
A girl who took no interest in her suitor, Mr. Ten Eyck,
would not care whether he did anything or not. But I must
now quit you, being under an engagement to meet Mr.
Worden
at the inn, at six.
Guert and I shook hands, for the tenth or twelfth time
that day, parting with an understanding that he was to call
for us, to accompany our party to the supper, at the
previously
appointed hour. As I walked towards the inn, I
pondered
on what had just occurred, in a most mortified temper.
That Anneke was displeased, was only too apparent; and
I felt fearful that her displeasure was not entirely free from
contempt. As for Guert's case, it did not strike me as being
half so desperate as my own; for there was nothing
unnatural
,
but something quite the reverse, in women of sense
and stability, when they admire any youth of opposite
temperament
,and
I remembered to have heard my grandfather
say that such was apt to be the case,wishing to elevate
their suitors in their pursuits and characters. Had Anneke
taken the pains to remonstrate with me about the folly of
what I had done, I should have been encouraged; but the
cold indifference of her manner, not to call it contempt, cut
me to the quick. It is true, Anneke seemed to feel most on
her friend's account; but I could not mistake the look of
surprise with which she saw me, Cornelius Littlepage, rise
from under her sleigh, and stand brushing the snow from
my clothes, like a great calf as I was! No man can bear
to be rendered ridiculous in the presence of the woman he
loves.
Near the inn I met Dirck, his whole face illuminated with
a look of pleasure.
I have just met Anneke and Mary Wallace! he said,
and they stopped their sleigh to speak to me. Herman
Mordaunt has been here half the winter, and he means to
remain most of the summer. There will be no Lilacsbush
this season, the girls told me, but Herman Mordaunt has
got a house, where he lives with his own servants, and boils
his own pot, as he calls it. We shall be at home there, of
course, for you are such a favourite, Corny, ever since that
affair of the lion! As for Anneke, I never saw her looking
so beautiful!
Did Miss Mordaunt say she would be happy to see us
on the old footing, Dirck?
Did she?I suppose so. She said I shall be glad to
see you, cousin Dirck, whenever you can come, and I hope
Vol. I.  16
you will bring with you sometimes the clergyman of whom
you have spoken.
But nothing of Jason Newcome or Corny Littlepage?
Tell the truth at once, Dirck; my name was not
mentioned
?
Indeet it was, t'ough;
I
mentioned it several times, and
told them how long we had been on the roat, and how you
trove, and how you had sold the sleigh and horses already,
and a dozen other t'ings. Oh! we talket a great deal of
you, Corny; that is, I dit, and the girls listened.
Was my name mentioned by either of the young ladies,
Dirck, in direct terms?
To be sure; Anneke had something to say about you,
though it was so much out of the way, I can hardly tell
you what it was now. Oh! I remember: she said `I have
seen Mr. Littlepage, and think he has grown since we last
met; he promises to make a
man
one of these days.' What
could t'at mean, Corny?
That I am a fool, a great overgrown boy, and wish I
had never seen Albany; that's what it means. Come, let
us go in; Mr. Worden will be expecting us. Ha! Who
the devil's that, Dirck?
A loud Dutch shout from Dirck broke out of him,
regardless
of the street, and his whole face lighted up into a broad
sympathetic smile. I had caught a glimpse of a sled
coming down the acclivity we were slowly ascending, which
sled glided past us just as I got the words out of my mouth.
It was occupied by Jason alone, who seemed just as much
charmed with the sport as any other grown-up boy on the
hill. There he went, the cocked hat uppermost, the
pea-green
coat beneath, and the striped woollens and heavy
plated buckles stuck out, one on each side, governing the
movement of the sled with the readiness of a lad
accustomed
to the business.
That must be capital fun, Corny! my companion said,
scarce able to contain himself for the pleasure he felt. I
have a great mind to borrow a sled and take a turn myself.
Not if you intend to visit Miss Mordaunt, Dirck. Take
my word for it, she does not like to see men following the
pleasures of boys.
Dirck stared at me, but being taciturn by nature, he said
nothing, and we entered the house. There we found Mr.
Worden reading over an old sermon, in readiness for his
next Sunday's business; and sitting down, we began to
compare
notes on the subject of the town and its advantages.
The divine was in raptures. As for the Dutch he cared
little for them, and had seen but little of them, overlooking
them in a very natural, metropolitan sort of way; but he
had found so many English officers, had heard so much
from home, and had received so many invitations, that
his
campaign promised nothing but agreeables. We sat
chatting
over these matters until the tea was served, and for an
hour or two afterwards. My bargains were applauded, my
promptitude  the promptitude of Guert would have been
more justwas commended, and I was told that my parents
should hear the whole truth in the matter. In a word, our
Mentor being in good-humour with himself, was disposed to
be in good humour with every one else.
At the appointed hour, Guert came to escort us to the
place of meeting. He was courteous, attentive, and as frank
as the air he breathed, in manner. Mr. Worden took to
him excessively, and it was soon apparent that he and
young Ten Eyck were likely to become warm friends.
You must know, gentlemen, that the party to which I
have had the honour of inviting you, will be composed of
some of the heartiest young men in Albany, if not in the
colony. We meet once a month, in the house of an old
bachelor, who belongs to us, and who will be delighted to
converse with you, Mr. Worden, on the subject of religion.
Mr. Van Brunt is very expert in religion, and we make him
the umpire of all our disputes and bets on
that
subject.
This sounded a little ominous, I thought; but Mr. Worden
was not a man to be frightened from a good hot supper, by
half-a-dozen inadvertent words. He could tolerate even a
religious discussion, with such an object in view. He
walked on, side by side with Guert, and we were soon at
the door of the house of Mr. Van Brunt, the Bachelor in
Divinity, as I nicknamed him. Guert entered without
knocking, and ushered us into the presence of our
quasi
nost.
We found in the room a company of just twelve, Guert
included; that being the entire number of the club. It
struck me, at the first glance, that the whole set had a sort
of slide-down-hill aspect, and that we were likely to make
a night of it. My acquaintance with Dirck, and indeed my
connection with the old race, had not left me ignorant of a
certain peculiarity in the Dutch character. Sober, sedate,
nay phlegmatic as they usually appeared to be, their
roystering
was on a pretty high key, when it once fairly
commenced
.
We thought one lad of the old race, down in
Westchester, fully a match for two of the Anglo-Saxon
breed, when it came to a hard set-to; no ordinary fun
appeasing
the longings of an excited Dutchman. Tradition
had let me into a good many secrets connected with their
excesses, and I had heard the young Albanians often
mentioned
as being at the head of their profession in these
particulars
.
Nothing could be more decorous, or considerate, however,
than our introduction and reception. The young men
seemed particularly gratified at having a clergyman of their
party, and I make no doubt it was intended that the evening
should be one of unusual sobriety and moderation. I heard
the word Dominie whispered from mouth to mouth, and
it was easy to see the effect it produced. Most eyes were
fastened on Van Brunt, a red-faced, square-built, somewhat
dissolute-looking man of forty-five, who seemed to find his
apology for associating with persons so much his juniors,
in his habits, and possibly in the necessity of the case; as
men of his own years might not like his company.
And, gentlemen, it is dry business standing here
looking
at each other, observed Mr. Van Brunt; and we will
take a little punch, to moisten our hearts, as well as our
throats. Guert, yon is the pitcher.
Guert made good use of the pitcher, and each man had
his glass of punch,a beverage then, as now, much used
in the colony. I must acknowledge that the mixture was
very knowingly put together, though I had no sooner
swallowed
my glass, than I discovered it was confounded strong.
Not so with Guert. Not only did he swallow
one
glass, but
he swallowed
two
, in quick succession, like a man who was
thirsty; standing at the time in a fine, manly, erect attitude,
as one who trifled with something that did not half tax his
powers. The pitcher, though quite large, was emptied at
that one assault, in proof of which it was turned bottom
upwards, by Guert himself.
Conversation followed, most of it being in English, out
of compliment to the Dominie, who was not supposed to
understand Dutch. This was an error, however, Mr.
Worden
making out tolerably well in that language, when he
tried. I was felicitated on the bargains I had made with the
contractor; and many kind and hospitable attempts were made
to welcome me in a frank, hearty manner among strangers.
I confess I was touched by these honest and sincere
endeavours
to put me at my ease, and when a second pitcher of
punch was brought round, I took another glass with right
good-will, while Guert, as usual, took two; though the
liquor
he
drank, I had many occasions to ascertain
subsequently
,
produced no more visible effect on him, in the way
of physical consequences, than if he had not swallowed it.
Guert was no drunkard, far from it; he could only drink
all near him under the table, and remain firm in his chair
himself. Such men usually escape the imputation of being
sots, though they are very apt to pay the penalty of their
successes at the close of their career. These are the men
who break down at sixty, if not earlier, becoming subject
to paralysis, indigestion, and other similar evils.
Such was the state of things, the company gradually
getting into a very pleasant humour, when Guert was called
out of the room by one of the blacks, who bore a most
ominous physiognomy while making his request. He was
gone but a moment, when he returned with a certain sort
of consternation painted in his own handsome face. Mr.
Van Brunt was called into a corner, where two or three
more of the principal persons present soon collected, in an
earnest, half-whispered discourse. I was seated so near this
group, as occasionally to overhear a few expressions, though
to get no clear clue to its meaning. The words I overheard
were, old Cuyler  capital supper  vension and
duckspartridges and quailsknows us allnever
doDominie the manstrangershow to do it?
and several other similar expressions, which left a vague
impression on my mind that our supper was in great peril
from some cause or other; but what that cause was I could
16 *
not learn. Guert was evidently the principal person in this
consultation, everybody appearing to listen to his suggestions
with respect and attention. At length our friend came out
of the circle, and in a courteous, self-possessed manner
communicated
the difficulty in the following words:
You must know, Rev. Mr. Worden, and Mr. Littlepage,
and Mr. Follock, and Mr. Newcome, that we have certain
customs of our own, among us youths of Albany, that perhaps
are not familiar to you gentlemen nearer the capital. The
trut' is, that we are not always as wise and as sober as our
parents, and grandparents in particular, could wish us to be. It
is t'ought a good thing among us sometimes, to rummage the
hen-roosts and poultry-yards of the burghers, and to sup
on the fruits of such a forage. I do not know how it is
with you, gentlemen; but I will own, that to me, ducks and
geese got in this innocent, game-like way, taste sweeter than
when they are bought in the market-hall: our own supper
for to-night was a
bought
supper, but it has become the
victim of a little enlargement of the practice I have
mentioned
.
How!how's that, friend Ten Eyck! exclaimed Mr.
Worden, in no affected consternation. The
supper
a victim,
do you say?
Yes, sir; to be frank at once, it is gone; gone to a pullet,
a steak, and a potatoe. They have not left us a dish!
They! echoed the parsonAnd who can
they
be?
That is a point yet to be ascertained, for the operation
has been carried on in so delicate and refined a way, that
none of our blacks know anything of the matter. It seems
there was a cry of fire just now, and it took every one of
the negroes into the street; during which time all our game
has been put up, and has flown.
Bless me! bless me! what a calamity!what a
rascally
theft! Did you not mark it down?
No sir, I am sorry to say we have not; nor do we apply
such hard names to a frolic, even when we lose our supper
by it. It is the act of some of our associates and friends,
who hope to feast at our expense to-night; and who will,
gentlemen, unless you will consent to aid us in recovering
our lost dishes.
Aid you, my dear sirI will do any thing you can
wishwhat will you have me attempt? Shall I go to the
fort, and ask for succour from the army?
No, sir; our object can be effected short of t'at. I am
quite certain we can find what we want, only two or three
doors from this, if you will consent to lend us a little, a very
little of your assistance.
Name itname it, at once, for Heaven's sake, Mr.
Guert. The dishes must be getting cold, all this time,
cried Mr. Worden, jumping up with alacrity, and looking
about him, for his hat and cloak.
The service we ask of you, gentlemen, is just this,
rejoined Guert, with a collness that, when I came to reflect
on the events of that night, has always struck me as
singularly
astonishing. Our supper, and an excellent one it is,
is close at hand, as I have said. Nothing will be easier
than to get it on our own table, in the next room, could we
only manage to call old Doortje off duty, and detain her
for five minutes at the area gate of her house. She knows
every one of
us
, and would smell a rat in a minute, did
we
show ourselves; but Mr. Worden and Mr. Littlepage, here,
might amuse her for the necessary time, without any
trouble
.
She is remarkably fond of Dominies, and would not
be able to trace
you
back to this house, leaving us to eat
the supper in peace. After
t'at
, no one cares for the rest.
I'll do it!I'll do it! cried Mr. Worden, hurrying
into the passage, in quest of his hat and cloak. It is no
more than just that you should have your own, and the
supper will be either eaten, or overdone, should we go for
constables.
No fear of constables, Mr. Worden, we never employ
them in our poultry wars. All we, who will get the supper
back again, can expect, will be merely a little hot water, or
a skirmish with our friends.
The details of the movement were now intelligibly and
clearly settled. Guert was to head a party provided with
large clothes-baskets, who were to enter the kitchen, during
Doortje's absence, and abstract the dishes, which could not
yet be served, as all in Albany, of a certain class, sat down
to supper at nine precisely. As for Doortje, a negro who
was in the house, in waiting on one of the guests, his
master
,
would manage to get her out to the area gate, the house
having a cellar kitchen, where it would depend on Mr.
Worden
to detain her, three or four minutes. To my surprise,
the parson entered on the execution of the wild scheme with
boyish eagerness, affirming that he could keep the woman
half an hour, if it were necessary, by delivering her a
lecture
on the importance of observing the eighth
commandment
.
As soon as the preliminaries were thus arranged,
the two parties proceeded on their respective duties, the
hour admonishing us of the necessity of losing no time
unnecessarily
.
I did not like this affair from the first, the experiment of
sliding
down hill, having somewhat weakened my confidence in
Guert Ten Eyck's judgment. Nevertheless, it would not do
for
me
to hold back, when Mr. Worden led, and, after all, there
was no great harm in recovering a supper that had been
abstracted from our own house. Guert did not proceed, like
ourselves, by the street, but he went with his party, out of
a back gate into an alley, and was to enter the yard of the
house he assailed, by means of a similar gate in its rear. Once
in that yard, the access to the kitchen, and the retreat, were
very easy, provided the cook could be drawn away from
her charge at so important a moment. Everything,
therefore
,
depended on the address of the young negro who was
in the house, and ourselves.
On reaching the gate of the area, we stopped while our
negro descended to invite Doortje forth. This gave us a
moment to examine the building. The house was large,
much larger than most of those round it, and what struck
me as unusual, there was a lighted lamp over the door.
This looked as if it might be a sort of a tavern, or eating
house, and rendered the whole thing more intelligible to me.
Our roystering plunderers doubtless intended to sup on their
spoils at that tavern.
The negro was gone but a minute, when he came out
with a young black of his own sex, a servant whom he
was leading off his post, on some pretence of his own, and
was immediately followed by the cook. Doortje made many
curtsies as soon as she saw the cocked-hat and black cloak
of the Dominie, begging his pardon and asking his pleasure.
Mr. Worden now began a grave and serious lecture on the
sin of stealing, holding the confounded Doortje in discourse
quite three minutes. In vain the cook protested she had
taken nothing; that her master's property was sacred in
her eyes, and ever had been; that she never gave away
even cold meats without an order, and that she could not
imagine why
she
was to be talked to in this way. To give
him his due, Mr. Worden performed his part to admiration,
though it is true he had only an ignorant wench, who was
awed by his profession, to manage. At length we heard a
shrill whistle from the alley, the signal of success, when
Mr. Worden wished Doortje a solemn good-night, and
walked away with all the dignity of a priest. In a minute
or two we were in the house again, and were met by Guert
with cordial shakes of the hand, thanks for our acceptable
service, and a summons to supper. It appears that Doortje
had actually dished-up everything, all the articles standing
before a hot fire waiting only for the clock to strike nine to
be served. In this state, then, the only change the supper
had to undergo, was to bring it a short distance through the
alley and to place it on our table, instead of that for which
it was so lately intended.
Notwithstanding the rapidity with which the changes had
been made, it would not have been very easy for a
stranger
to detect any striking irregularity in our feast. It is
true, there were two sets of dishes on the table, or rather
dishes of two different sets; but the ducks, game, &c., were
not only properly cooked, but were warm and good. To
work everybody went, therefore, with an appetite, and for
five minutes little was heard beyond the clatter of knives
and forks. Then came the drinking of healths, and finally
the toasts, and the songs, and the stories.
Guert sang capitally, in a fine, clear, sweet, manly voice,
and he gave us several airs with words both in English and
in Dutch. He had just finished one of these songs, and the
clapping of hands was still loud and warm, when the young
man called on Mr. Worden for a lady, or a sentiment.
Come, Dominie, he called out, for by this time the
feast had produced its familiarityCome, Dominie, you
have acquitted yourself so well as a lecturer, that we are
all dying to hear you preach.
A lady do you say, sir? asked the parson, who was as
merry as any of us.
A latya latyshouted six or seven at once. The
Tominie's latythe Tominie's laty.
Well, gentlemen, since you will have it so, you shall
have one. You must not complain if she prove a little
venerable,but I give you `Mother Church.'
This produced a senseless laugh, as such things usually
do, and then followed my turn. Mr. Van Brunt very
formally called on me for a lady. After pausing a moment
I said, as I flatter myself, with spirit
Gentlemen, I will give you another almost as heavenly
Miss Anneke Mordaunt!
Miss Anneke Mordaunt! was echoed round the table,
and I soon discovered that Anneke was a general favourite,
and a very common toast already at Albany.
I shall now ask Mr. Guert Ten Eyck for his lady, I
said, as soon as silence was restored, there being very little
pause between the cups that night.
This appeal changed the whole character of the
expression
of Guert's face. It became grave in an instant, as if
the recollection of her whose name he was about to utter
produced a pause in his almost fierce mirth. He coloured,
then raised his eyes and looked sternly round as if to
challenge
denial, and gave
Miss Mary Wallace.
Ay, Guert, we are used to that name, now, said Van
Brunt, a little drily. This is the tenth time I have heard
it from you within two months.
You will be likely to hear it twenty more, sir; for I shall
give Mary Wallace, and nobody but Mary Wallace, while
the lady remains Mary Wallace. How, now, Mr. Constable!
What may be the reason we have the honour of a visit
from you at this time of night.
[21]
[21]
In this whole affair of the supper, the reader will find incidents
that bear a striking resemblance to certain local characteristics
pourtrayed by Mrs. Grant, of Laggan, in her memoirs of an
American
Lady; thus corroborating the fidelity of the pictures of our
ancient manners, as given by that respectable writer, by the
unquestioned
authority of Mr. Cornelius Littlepage.
Editor
.
CHAPTER XIII.
Masters, it is proved already
That you are little better than false knaves;
And it will go near to be thought so, shortly.
Dogberry
.
The
sudden appearance of the city constable, a
functionary
whose person was not unknown to most of the
company, brought every man at table to his feet, the Rev.
Mr. Worden, Dirck and myself, included. For my own
part, I saw no particular reason for alarm, though it at
once struck me that this visit might have some connection
with the demolished supper, since the law does not, in all
cases, suffer a man to reclaim even his own, by trick or
violence. As for the constable himself, a short, compact,
snub-nosed, Dutch-built person, who spoke English as if it
disagreed with his bile, he was the coolest of the whole
party.
Vell, Mr. Guert, he said, with a sort of good-natured
growl of authority, here I moost coome ag'in! Mr. Mayor
woult be happy to see you, and ter Tominie, dat ist of your
party; and ter gentleman dat acted as clerk, ven he
lectured
old Doortje, Mr. Mayor's cook.
Mr. Mayor's cook! Here, then, a secret was out, with a
vengeance! Guert had not reclaimed his own lost supper,
which, having passed into the hands of the Philistines, was
hopelessly gone; but he had actually stolen and eaten the
supper prepared for the Mayor of Albany,Peter Cuyler,
a man of note, and standing, in all respects; a functionary
who had held his office from time immemorial;the lamp
was the symbol of authority, and not the sign of an inn, or
an eating-house;the supper, moreover, was never prepared
for one man, or one family, but had certainly been got up
for the honourable treatment of a goodly company;
fifteen
stout men had mainly appeased their appetites on it;
and the fragments were that moment under discussion
among half-a-dozen large-mouthed, shining negro faces, in
the kitchen! Under circumstances like these, I looked
inquiringly
at the Rev. Mr. Wordenand the Rev. Mr.
Worden
looked inquiringly at me. There was no apparent
remedy, however; but, after a brief consultation with Guert,
we, the summoned parties, took our hats and followed
Dogberry
to the residence of Mr. Mayor.
You are not to be uneasy, gentlemen, at this little
interruption
of our amusements, said Guert, dropping in
between
Mr. Worden and myself, as we proceeded on our
way, these things happening very often among us. You
are innocent, you know, under all circumstances, since you
supposed that the supper was our ownbrought back by
direct means, instead of having recourse to the shabby
delays
of the law.
And whose supper may this have been, sir, that we
have just eaten? demanded Mr. Worden.
Why, there can be no harm, now, in telling you the
trut', Dominie; and I will own, therefore, it belonged in law
to Mr. Mayor Cuyler. There is no great danger, however,
as you will see, when I come to explain matters. You
must know that the Mayor's wife was a Schuyler, and my
mother has some of that blood in her veins, and we count
cousins as far as we can see, in Albany. It is just supping
with one's relations, a little out of the common way, as you
will perceive, gentlemen.
Have you dealt fairly with Mr. Littlepage and myself,
sir, in this affair? Mr. Worden asked, a little sternly. I
might, with great propriety, lecture to a cook, on the eighth
commandment, when that cook was a party to robbing you
of your supper; but how shall I answer to His Honour, Mr.
Mayor, on the charge which will now be brought against
me? It is not for myself, Mr. Guert, that I feel so much
concern, as for the credit and reputation of my sacred office,
and that, too, among your disciples of the schools of
Leyden!
Leave it all to me, my dear Dominieleave it all to
me, answered Guert, well disposed to sacrifice himself,
rather than permit a friend to suffer. I am used to these
little matters, and will take care of you.
I vill answer for t'at, put in the constable, looking over
his shoulder. No young fly-away in All
pon
ny hast more
knowletge in t'ese matters t'an Mr. Guert, here. If any
potty can draw his heat out of the yoke, Mr. Guert can.
Yaas  yaas  he know all apout t'ese little matters, sure
enough.
This was encouraging, of a certainty! Our associate
was so well known for his tricks and frolics, that even the
constable who took him calculated largely on his address in
getting out of scrapes! I did not apprehend that any of us
were about to be tried and convicted of a downright robbery;
for I knew how far the Dutch carried their jokes of this
nature, and how tolerant the seniors were to their juniors;
and especially how much all men are disposed to regard any
exploit of the sort of that in which we had been engaged,
when it has been managed adroitly, and in a way to excite
a laugh. Still, it was no joke to rob a Mayor of his supper,
these functionaries usually passing to their offices through
the probationary grade of Alderman.
[22]
[22]
The American Mayor is usually a different person from the
English
Mayor. Until within the last five-and-twenty or thirty years,
the Mayor of New York was invariably a man of social and political
importance, belonging strictly to the higher class of society. The
same was true of the Mayor of Albany. At the present time, the
rule has been so far enlarged, as to admit a selection from all of the
more reputable classes, without any rigid adherence to the highest.
The elective principle has produced the change. During the writer's
boyhood, Philip Van Rensselaer, the brother of the late Patroon, was
so long Mayor of Albany, as to be universally known by the
sobriquet
of The Mayor.
Editor
.
Guert was not free
from uneasiness, as was apparent by a question he put to the
officer, on the steps of Mr. Cuyler's house, and under the
very light of the official lamp.
How is the old gentleman, this evening, Hans? the
principal asked, with some little concern in his manner. I
hope he and his company have supped?
Vell, t'at is more t'an I can telt you, Mr. Guert. He
look't more as like himself, when he hat the horse t'ieves
from New Englant taken up, t'an he hast for many a tay.
'Twas most too pat, Mr. Guert, to run away wit' the Mayor's
own
supper! I coult have tolt you who hast your own tucks
and venison.
I wish you had, Hans, with all my heart; but we were
hard pushed, and had a strange Dominie to feed. You know
a body must provide
well
for company.
Vol. I.  17
Yaas, yaas; I understants it, and knows how you moost
have peen nonplush't to do sich a t'ing; put it was
mo-o-st
too pat. Vell, we are all young, afore we live to be olt
t'at effery potty knows.
By this time the door was open, and we entered. Mr.
Mayor had issued orders we should all be shown into the
parlour, where I rather think, from what subsequently passed,
he intended to cut up Guert a little more than common, by
exposing him before the eyes of a particular person. At all
events, the reader can judge of my horror, at finding that
the party whose supper I had just helped to demolish,
consisted
,
in addition to three or four sons and daughters of the
house, of Herman Mordaunt, Mary Wallace, and Anneke!
Of course, everybody knew
what
had been done; but, until
we entered the room, Mr. Mayor alone knew
who
had done
it. Of Mr. Worden and myself even, he knew no more
than he had learned from Dootje's account of the matter;
and the cook, quite naturally, had represented us as rogues
feigning our divinity.
Guert was a thoroughly manly fellow, and he did us the
justice to enter the parlour first. Poor fellow! I can feel
for him, even at this distance of time, when his eye first fell
on Mary Wallace's pallid and distressed countenance. It
could scarcely be less than I felt myself, when I first beheld
Anneke's flushed features, and the look of offended propriety
that I fancied to be sparkling in her estranged eye.
Mr. Mayor evidently regarded Mr. Worden with surprise,
as indeed he did me; for, instead of strangers, he probably
expected to meet two of those delinquents whose faces were
familiar to him, by divers similar jocular depredations,
committed
within the limits of his jurisdiction. Then the
circumstance
that Mr. Worden was a real Dominie, could not
be questioned by those who saw him standing, as he did,
face to face, with all the usual signs of his sacred office in
his dress and air.
I believe there must be some mistake here, constable!
exclaimed Mr. Mayor. Why have you brought these two
strange gentlemen along with Guert Ten Eyck?
My orters, Mr. Mayor, wast to pring Dootje's `rapscallion
Tominie,' and his `rapscallion frient;' and t'at is one, and
t'is ist t'ot'er.
This gentleman has the appearance of being a
real
clergyman, and that too, of the church of England.
Yaas, Mr. Mayor, t'at is yoost so. He wilt preach
fifteen minutes wit'out stopping, if you wilt give him a plack
gownt; and pray an hour in a white shirt.
[23]
[23]
This opinion of the constable's must refer to the notion common
amongst the non-Episcopal sects, that the value of spiritual provender
was to be measured by the quantity. Preaching, however,
might
be
overdone in the Dutch Reformed Churches; for, quite within my
recollection
,
a half-hour glass stood on the pulpit of the Dutch edifice
named in the text, to regulate the dominie's wind. It was said it
might be turned
once
with impunity; but wo betide him who should
so far trespass on his people's patience as to presume to turn it
twice
.
Editor
.
Will you do me the favour, Guert Ten Eyck, to let me
have the names of the strangers I have the pleasure to
receive
,
said the mayor, a little authoritatively.
Certainly, Mr. Mayor; certainly, and with very great
pleasure. I should have done this at once, had we been
ushered into your house by any one but the city constable.
Whenever I accompany that gentleman anywhere, I always
wait to ascertain my welcome.
Guert laughed with some heart at this allusion to his own
known delinquencies, while Mr. Cuyler only smiled. I
could see, notwithstanding the severe measures to which he
had resorted in this particular case, that the last was not
unfriendly to the first, and that our friend Guert had not
fallen literally among robbers, in being brought to the place
where we were.
This reverend dominie, continued Guert, as soon as
he had had his laugh, and had ventured to cast a short,
inquiring
glance at Mary Wallace, is a gentleman from
England, Mr. Mayor, who is to preach in St. Peter's the
day after to-morrow, by special invitation from the chaplain;
when, I make no doubt, we shall all be much edified; Miss
Mary Wallace among the rest, if she will do him the honour
to attend the servicegood, and angelic, and
forgiving
, as
I know she is by nature.
This speech caused all eyes to turn on the young lady,
whose face crimsoned, though she made no reply. I now
felt satisfied that Guert's manly, frank, avowed, and sincere
admiration had touched the heart of Mary Wallace, while
her reason condemned that which her natural tenderness
encouraged; and the struggle in her mind was then, and
long after, a subject of curious study with me. As for
Anneke, I thought she resented this somewhat indiscreet, not
to say indelicate though indirect avowal of his feelings
towards
his mistress; and that she looked on Guert with even
more coldness than she had previously done. Neither of
the ladies, however, said anything. During this dumb-show,
Mr. Cuyler had leisure to recover from the surprise of
discovering
that one of his prisoners was really a clergyman,
and to inquire who the other might be.
That gentleman, then, is in fact a clergyman! he
answered. You have forgotten to name the other, Guert.
This is Mr. Corny Littlepage, Mr. Mayorthe only
son of Major Littlepage, of Satanstoe, Westchester.
The Mayor looked a little puzzled, and I believe felt
somewhat
embarrassed as to the manner in which he ought to
proceed. The incursion of Guert upon his premises much
exceeded in boldness, anything of the kind that had ever
before occurred in Albany. It was common enough for
young men of his stamp to carry off poultry, pigs, &c.,
and feast on the spoils; and cases had occurred, as I
afterwards
learned, in which rival parties of these depredators
preyed on each other  the same materials for a supper
having been known to change hands two or three times
before they were consumedbut no one had ever presumed,
previously to this evening, to make an inroad even on Mr.
Mayor's hencoop, much less to molest the domains of his
cook. In the first impulse of his anger, Mr. Cuyler had
sent for the constable; and Guert's club, with its place of
meeting being well known, that functionary having had
many occasions to visit it, the latter proceeded thither
forthwith
.
It is probable, however, a little reflection satisfied the
mayor that a frolic could not well be treated as a larceny; and
that Guert had some of his own wife's blood in his veins.
When he came to find that two respectable strangers were
implicated in the affair, one of whom was actually a
clergyman
,
this charitable feeling was strengthened, and he changed
his course of proceeding.
You can return home, Hans, said Mr. Mayor, very
sensibly mollified in his manner. Should there be
occasion
for your further services, I will send for you. Now,
gentlemen, as soon as the door closed on the constable, I
will satisfy you that old Peter Cuyler can cover a table, and
feed his friends, even though Guert Ten Eyck be so near a
neighbour. Miss Wallace, will you allow me the honour to
lead you to the table? Mr. Worden will see Mrs. Cuyler,
in safety, to the same place.
On this hint, the missionary stepped forward with
alacrity
,
and led Mrs. Mayoress after Mary Wallace, with the
utmost courtesy. Guert did the same to one of the young
ladies of the house; Anneke was led in by one of the young
men; and I took the remaining young lady, who, I
presumed
,
was also one of the family. It was very apparent
we were respited; and all of us thought it wisest to appear
as much at our ease as possible, in order not to balk the
humour of the principal magistrate of the ancient town of
Albany.
To do Mr. Mayor justice, the lost time had been so well
improved by Doortje, that, on looking around the table, I
thought the supper to which we were thus strangely invited,
was, of the two, the best I had seen that evening. Luckily,
game was plenty; and, by means of quails, partridges,
oysters, venison patties, and other dishes of that sort, the
cook had managed to send up quite as good a supper, at ten
o'clock, as she had previously prepared for nine.
I will not pretend that I felt quite at my ease, as I took
my seat at the table, for the second time that night. All the
younger members of the party looked exceedingly grave, as
if they could very well dispense with our company; the old
people alone appearing to enter into the scene with any
spirit. Anneke did not even look at me, after the first
astounded look given on my entrance; nor did Mary
Wallace
once cast her eyes towards Guert, when we reached
the supper-room. Mr. Mayor, notwithstanding, had
determined
to laugh off the affair; and he and Mr. Worden soon
became excellent friends, and began to converse freely and
naturally.
Come, cousin Guert, cried Mr. Mayor, after two or
three glasses of Madeira had still further warmed his heart,
fill, and pledge meunless you prefer to give a lady. If
17 *
the last, everybody will drink to her, with hearty good-will.
You eat nothing, and must drink the more.
Ah! Mr. Mayor, I have toasted one lady, to-night, and
cannot toast another.
Not present company excepted, my boy?
No, sir, not even with that license. I pledge you, with
all my heart, and thank you, with all my heart, for this
generous
treatment, after my own foolish frolic;but, you know
how it is, Mr. Mayor, with us Albany youths, when our
pride is up, and a supper must be had
Not I, Guert; I know nothing about it; but should very
well like to learn. How came you, in the first place, to
take such a fancy to my cook's supper? Did you imagine
it better than Van Brunt's cook could give you?
The supper of Arent Van Brunt's cook has disappeared
gone on the hill, I fancy, among the red-coats; and, to
own the truth, Mr. Mayor, it was yours, or nothing. I had
invited these gentlemen to pass the evening with us. One
of our blacks happened to mention what was going on here,
and hospitality led us all astray. It was nothing more, I do
assure you, Mr. Mayor.
And so your hospitable feelings made your guests work
for their supper, by sending them to preach to old Doortje,
while you were dishing up my ducks and game?
Your pardon, Mr. Mayor; Doortje had dished-up, before
she went to lecture. Your cook is too well trained to
neglect
her duty, even to hear a sermon by the Rev. Mr.
Worden
!
But, these gentlemen were quite as much deceived as
the old woman; for, they supposed we were after our own
lost goods, and did not know that you dwelt here; and were
as much my dupes as old Doortje herself. Truth obliges me
to own this much, in their justification.
There was a general clearing up of countenances, at
this frank avowal; and I saw that Anneke, herself, turned
her looks inquiringly upon the speaker, and suffered a smile
to relieve the extreme gravity of her sweet countenance.
From that moment, a very sensible change came over the
feelings and deportment of the younger part of the company,
and the conversation became easier and more natural. It
was certainly much in our favour to have it known, we had
not officiously and boyishly joined in a gratuitous attempt
to rob and insult this particular and unoffending family, but
that Mr. Worden and I supposed we were simply aiding in
getting back those things which properly belonged to our
hosts, and getting them back, too, in a manner of which the
party we supposed we were acting against, would certainly
have no right to complain, inasmuch as they had set the
example. Guert was encouraged to go on further with his
explanations; which he did, in his own honest, candid
manner, exculpating us, in effect, from everything but being
a little too much disposed to waggery, for a minister of the
church, and his pupil, who had just commenced his travels.
Anneke's face brightened up, more and more, as the
explanations
proceeded; and, soon after they were ended, she
turned to me in a very gracious manner, and inquired after
my mother. As I sat directly opposite to her, and the table
was narrow, we could converse without attracting much
attention
to ourselves; Mr. Mayor and his other guests
keeping
up a round of reasonably noisy jokes, on the events of
the evening, nearer the foot of the table.
You find some customs in Albany, Mr. Littlepage, that
are not known to us, in New York, Anneke observed,
after a few preliminary remarks had opened the way to
further
communication.
I scarce know, Miss Anneke, whether you allude to
what has occurred this evening, or to what occurred this
afternoon?
To both, I believe, answered Anneke, smiling, though
she coloured, as I thought, with a species of feminine
vexation
;
for, certainly, one is no more a custom with us than
the other.
I have been most unfortunate, Miss Mordaunt, in the
exhibitions I have made of myself in the course of the few
hours I have passed in this, to me, strange place. I am
afraid you regard me as little more than an overgrown boy,
who has been permitted by his parents to leave home sooner
than he ought.
This is your construction, and not mine, Mr.
Littlepage
.
I suppose you knowbut, we will talk of this in the
other room, or at some other time.
I took the hint, and said no more on the subject while at
table. Mr. Mayor, I suppose in consideration of our having
gone through the exactions of one feast already that
evening
,
permited us to leave the supper-room much earlier than
common, and the hour being late, the whole party broke up
immediately afterwards. Before we separated, however,
Herman Mordaunt approached me, in a friendly, free way,
and invited me to come to his house at eight next morning
to breakfast, requesting the pleasure of Dirck's company at
the same time; the invitation to the latter going through
me. It is scarcely necessary to say how gladly I accepted,
and how much I was relieved by this termination of an
adventure
that, at one moment, menaced me with deep
disgrace
.
Had Mr. Mayor seen fit to pursue the affair of the
abstraction of his first supper in a serious vein, although
the legal consequences could not probably have amounted
to anything very grave, they might prove very ridiculous;
and I have no doubt they would have brought about a very
abrupt termination of my visit to the north. As it was, my
mind was vastly relieved, as I believe was the case also
with that of the Rev. Mr. Worden.
Corny, said that gentleman, after we had wished Guert
good-night, and were well on our way to the inn again,
this second supper has helped surprisingly to digest the
first. I doubt if our new acquaintance, here, will be likely
to turn out very profitable to us.
Yet, sir, you appeared to take to him exceedingly, and
I had thought you excellent friends.
I like the fellow well enough too; for he is hearty, and
frank, and good-natured; but there was some little policy in
keeping on good terms with him. I 'm afraid, Corny, I did
not altogether consult the dignity of my holy office, this
morning, on the ice! It is exceedingly unbecoming in a
clergyman, to be seen running in a public place like a
school-boy
,
or a youngster contending in a match. I thought,
moreover, I overheard one of those young Dutchmen call
me the `Loping Dominie;' and so, taking altogether, it
struck me it would be wisest to keep on good terms with this
Guert Ten Eyck.
I see your policy, sir, and it does not become me to deny
it. As for myself, I confess I like Guert surprisingly, and
shall not give him up easily; though he has already got me
into two serious scrapes in the short time we have been
acquainted
.
He is a hearty, good-natured, thoughtless young
fellow; who, Dutchman-like, when he does make an attempt
to enjoy life, does it with all his heart.
I then related the affair of the hand-sled to Mr. Worden,
who gave me some of that sort of consolation, of which a
man receives a great deal, as he elbows his way through
this busy, selfish world.
Well, Corny, said my old master, I am not certain
you did not look more like a fool, as you rolled over from
that sled, than I looked while `loping' from our friends in
the sleigh!
We both laughed as we entered the tavern; I, to conceal
the vexation I really felt, and Mr. Worden, as I presume,
because he was flattered with the belief that I must have
appeared quite as ridiculous as himself.
Next morning I proceeded to Herman Mordaunt's
residence
at the earliest hour the rules of society would allow.
I found the family established in one of those Dutch edifices,
of which Albany was mainly composed, and which stood a
little removed from the streethaving a tiny yard in front,
with the
stoop
in the gable, and that gable towards the yard.
The battlement-walls of this house diminished towards the
high apex of a very steep roof by steps, as we are all so
much accustomed to see, and the whole was surmounted by
an iron weathercock, that was perched on a rod of some
elevation. It was always a matter of importance with the
Dutch to know which way the wind blew; nor did it
comport
with their habits of minute accuracy, to trust to the
usual indications of the feeling on the skin, the bending of
branches, the flying of clouds, or the driving of smoke; but
they must and would have the certainty of a machine, that
was constructed expressly to let them know the fact. Smoke
might err, but a weathercock would not!
No one was in the little parlour into which I was shown
by the servant who admitted me to the house, and in whom
I recognised Herman Mordaunt's principal male attendant,
of the household in New York. How pleasantly did that
little room appear to me, in the minute or two that I was
left in it alone. There lay the very shawl that Anneke had
on, the day I met her in the Pinkster Field; and a pair of
gloves that it seemed to me no other hands but hers were
small enough to wear, had been thrown on the shawl,
carelessly
,
as one casts aside a thing of that sort, in a hurry.
A dozen other articles were put here and there, that denoted
the habits and presence of females of refinement. But the
gloves most attracted my attention, and I must needs rise
and examine them. It is true, these gloves might belong to
Mary Wallace, for she, too, had a pretty little hand, but I
fancied they belonged to Anneke. Under this impression,
I raised them to my lips, and was actually pressing them
there, with a good deal of romantic feeling, when a light
footstep in the room told me I was not alone. Dropping the
gloves, I turned and beheld Anneke herself. She was
regarding
me with an expression of countenance I did not then
know how to interpret, and which I now hardly know how
to describe. In the first place, her charming countenance
was suffused with blushes, while her eyes were filled with an
expression of softened interest, that caused my heart to beat
so violently, that I did not know but it would escape by the
channel of the throat. How near I was to declaring all I
felt, at that moment; of throwing myself at the feet of the
dear, dear creature, and of avowing how much and
engrossingly
she had filled both my waking and sleeping thoughts
during the last year, and of beseeching her to bless the
remainder
of my days, by becoming my wife! Nothing
prevented
this sally, but the remark which Anneke made,
the instant she had gracefully curtsied, in return to my
confused and awkward bow, and which happened to be this:
What do you find so much to admire in Miss Wallace's
gloves? asked the wilful girl, biting her lip, as I fancied,
to suppress a smile, though her cheeks were still suffused,
and her eyes continued to give forth that indescribable
expression
of bewitching softness. It is a pair my father
presented to her, and she wore them last evening in
compliment
to him.
I beg pardon, Miss MordauntMiss Annekethat is
I beg pardon. Is there not a very delightful odour about
those glovesthat is, I was thinking so, and was
endeavouring
to ascertain what it might be by the scent.
It must be the lavender with which we young ladies are
so coquettish as to sprinkle our gloves and handkerchiefs
or it may be musk. Mary is rather fond of musk, though
I prefer lavender. But what an evening we had, Mr.
Littlepage
!
and what an introduction you have had to Albany!
and most of all, what a master of ceremonies!
Do you then dislike Guert Ten Eyck as an
acquaintance
,
Miss Anneke?
Far from it. It is quite impossible to
dislike
Guert;
he is so manly; so ready to admit his own weaknesses; so
sincere in all he does and says; so good natured; and, in
short, so much that, were one his sister, she might wish him
to be, and yet so much that a sister must regret.
I thought last evening that all the ladies felt an interest
in him, notwithstanding the numberless wild and ill-judged
things he does. Is he not a favourite with Miss Wallace?
The quick, sensitive glance that Anneke gave me, said
plainly enough that my question was indiscreet, and it was no
sooner put than it was regretted. A shadow passed athwart
the sweet face of my companion, and a moment of deep,
and, as I fancied, of painful thought succeeded. Then a
light broke over all, a smile illumined her features, after
which a light girlish laugh came to show how active were
the agents within, and how strong was the native tendency
to happiness and humour.
After all, Corny Littlepage, said Anneke, turning her
face towards me with an indescribable character of fun and
feeling so blended in it, as fairly to puzzle me, you must
admit that your exploit in the hand-sled was sufficiently
ridiculous to last a young man for some time!
I confess it all, Anneke, and shall have a care how I
turn boy again in a strange place. I am rejoiced to find,
however, that you look upon the foolish affair of the slide
as more grave than that of the supper, which I was fearful
might involve me in serious disgrace.
Neither is very serious, Mr. Littlepage, though the last
might have proved awkward, had not the Mayor known the
ways of the young men of the town. They say, however,
that nothing so bold has ever before been attempted in that
way, in Albany, great as are the liberties that are often
taken with the neighbours' hen-coops.
And she laughed, and this time it was naturally, and
without the least restraint.
I hope you will not think it shabby in me, if I seem to
wish to throw all the blame on this harum-scarum Guert
Ten Eyck. He drew me into both affairs, and into the last,
in a great measure, innocently and ignorantly.
So it is understood, and so it would be understood, the
moment Guert Ten Eyck was found to be connected with
the affair at all.
I may hope, then, to be forgiven, Anneke? I said,
holding out a hand to invite her to accept it as a pledge of
pardon.
Anneke did not prudishly decline putting her own little
hand in mine, though I got only the ends of two or three
slender delicate fingers; and her colour increased as she
bestowed this grace.
You must ask forgiveness, Corny, she answered,I
believe she now used this familiar name simply to show
how completely she had forgotten the little spleen she had
certainly felt at my untoward exhibition in the street.
You must ask forgiveness of those who possess the right
to pardon. If Corny Littlepage chooses to slide down hill,
like a boy, what right has Anneke Mordaunt to say him
nay?
Every right in the worldthe right of friendshipthe
right of a superior mind, of superior mannersthe right
that my
Hush!that is Mr. Bulstrode's footstep in the passage,
and he will not understand this discussion on the subject of
my manifold rights. It takes him some time, however, to
throw aside his overcoats, and furs, and sword; and I will
just tell you that Guert Ten Eyck is a dangerous master of
ceremonies for Corny Littlepage.
Yet, he has sense enough, feeling enough,
heart
enough
to admire and love Mary Wallace.
Has he told you this, so soon! But, I need not ask, as
he tells his love to every one who will listen.
And to Miss Wallace herself, I trust, among the
number
.
The man who loves, and loves truly, should not long
permit its object to remain in any doubt of his feelings and
intentions. It has ever appeared to me, Miss Mordaunt, as
a most base and dastardly feeling in a man to wish to be
certain of a woman's returning his love, before he has the
manliness to let his mistress understand his wishes. How
is a sensitive female to know when she is safe in yielding
her affections, without this frankness on the part of her
suitor? I 'll answer for it that Guert Ten Eyck has dealt
thus honestly and frankly with Mary Wallace.
That is a merit which cannot be denied him, answered
Anneke, in a low, thoughtful tone of voice. Mary has
heard this from his own mouth, again and again. Even
my presence has been no obstacle to his declarations, for
three times have I heard him beg Mary to consider him as
a suitor for her hand, and entreat her not to decide on his
offer until he has had a longer opportunity to win her
esteem.
And this you will admit, Miss Mordaunt, is to his credit;
is manly, and like himself?
It is certainly frank and honourable, Mr. Littlepage,
since it enables Miss Wallace to understand the object of
his attentions, and leaves nothing to doubt, or uncertainty.
I am glad you approve of such fair and frank
proceedings
;though
but a moment remains to say what I wish,
it will suffice to add, that the course Guert Ten Eyck has
taken towards Mary Wallace, Cornelius Littlepage would
wish to pursue towards Anneke Mordaunt.
Anneke started, turned pale; then showed cheeks that
were suffused with blushes, and looked at me with timid
surprise. She made no answer; though that earnest, yet
timid gaze, long remained, and for that matter, still remains,
vividly impressed upon my recollection. It seemed to
express
astonishment, startled sensibility, feminine
bashfulness
,
and maiden coyness; but it did not appear to me that
it expressed displeasure. There was no time, however, to
ask for explanations, since the voices of Herman Mordaunt
and Bulstrode were now heard at the very door, and, at the
next instant, both entered the room.
Vol. I.  18
CHAPTER XIV.
My beautiful! my beautiful! that standest meekly by,
With thy proudly arch'd and glossy neck, and dark and fiery eye
Thus, thus I leap upon thy back, and scour the distant plains:
Away! who overtakes me now, shall claim thee for his pains.
The Arab to his Steed
.
Bulstrode
seemed happy to meet me, complaining that
I had quite forgotten the satisfaction with which all New
York, agreeably to his account of the matter, had received
me the past spring. Of course, I thanked him for his
civility
;
and we soon became as good friends as formerly. In
a minute or two, Mary Wallace joined us, and we all
repaired
to the breakfast-table, where we were soon joined by
Dirck, who had been detained by some affairs of his own.
Herman Mordaunt and Bulstrode had the conversation
principally to themselves for the first few minutes. Mary
Wallace was habitually silent; but Anneke, without being
loquacious, was sufficiently disposed to converse. This
morning, however, she said little beyond what the civilities
of the table required from the mistress of the house, and
that little in as few words as possible. Once or twice I
could not help remarking that her hand remained on the
handle of a richly-chased tea-pot, after that hand had
performed
its office; and that her sweet, deep blue eye was
fixed on vacancy, or on some object before her with a
vacant
regard, in the manner of one that thought intensely.
Each time as she recovered from these little
reveries
, a
slight flush appeared on her face, and she seemed anxious
to conceal the involuntary abstraction. This absence of
mind continued until Bulstrode, who had been talking with
our host on the subject of the movements of the army,
suddenly
directed his discourse to me.
I hope we owe this visit to Albany, he said, to an
intention on your part, Mr. Littlepage, to make one among
us in the next campaign. I hear of many gentlemen of the
colonies who intend to accompany us in our march to
Quebec.
That is somewhat farther than I had thought of going,
Mr. Bulstrode, was my answer, inasmuch as I have
never supposed the king's forces contemplated quite so
distant
a march. It is the intention of Mr. Follock and
myself
to get permission to attach ourselves to some regiment,
and to go forward as far as Ticonderoga, at least; for we
do not like the idea of the French holding a post like that,
so far within the limits of our own province.
Bravely said, si; and I trust I shall be permitted to be
of some assistance when the time comes to settle details.
Our mess would always be happy to see you; and you
know that I am at its head, since the Lt. Colonel has left
us.
I returned my thanks, and the discourse took another
direction.
I met Harris, as I was walking hither this morning,
Bulstrode continued, and he gave me, in his confused Irish
wayfor I insist he is Irish, although he was born in
London
but
he gave me a somewhat queer account of a supper
he was at last night, which he said had been borne off by a
foraging party of young Albanians, and brought into the
barracks
,
as a treat to some of our gentlemen. This was bad
enough, though they tell me a Dutchman always pardons
such a frolic; but Harris makes the matter much worse,
by adding that the supperless party indemnified itself by
making an attack on the kitchen of Mr. Mayor, and
carrying
off his ducks and partridges, in a way to leave him
without even a potatoe!
I felt that my face was as red as scarlet, and I fancied
everybody was looking at me, while Herman Mordaunt
took on himself the office of making a reply.
The story does not lose in travelling, as a matter of
course, answered our host, though it is true in the main.
We all supped with Mr. Cuyler last evening, and know that
he had much more than a potatoe on the table.
All!What, the ladies?
Even to the ladiesand Mr. Littlepape in the bargain,
returned Herman Mordaunt, casting a glance at me, and
smiling. Each and all of us will testify he not only had
a plenty of supper, but that which was good.
I see by the general smile, cried Bulstrode, that there
is a
sous entendu
here, and shall insist on being admitted
to the secret.
Herman Mordaunt now told the whole story, not being
particularly careful to conceal the more ludicrous parts,
dwelling with some emphasis on the lecture Mr. Worden
had delivered to Doortje, and appealing to me to know
whether
I did not think it excellent. Bulstrode laughed, of
course; though I fancied both the young ladies wished
nothing
had been said on the subject. Anneke even attempted,
once or twice, to divert her father from certain comments
that he made, in which he spoke rather lightly of such sort
of amusements, in general.
That Guert Ten Eyck is a character! exclaimed
Bulstrode
,
and one I am sometimes at a loss to comprehend.
A more manly-looking, fine, bold young fellow, I do not
know; and he is often as manly and imposing in his
opinions
and judgments, as he is to the eye; while, at times, he
is almost childish in his tastes and propensities. How do
you account for this, Miss Anneke?
Simply, that nature intended Guert Ten Eyck for better
things than accident and education, or the want of
education
,
have enabled him to become. Had Guert Ten Eyck
been educated at Oxford, he would have been a very different
man from what he is. If a man has only the instruction
of a boy, he will long remain a boy.
I was surprised at the boldness and decision of this opinion,
for it was not Anneke's practice to be so open in delivering
her sentiments of others; but, it was not long ere I
discovered
that she did not spare Guert, in the presence of her
friend, from a deep conviction he was not worthy of the
hold he was sensibly gaining on the feelings of Mary
Wallace
.
Herman Mordaunt, as I fancied, favoured his
daughter's
views in this behalf; and there was soon occasion to
observe that poor Guert had no other ally, in that family,
than the one his handsome, manly person, open disposition,
and uncommon frankness had created in his mistress's own
bosom. There was certainly a charm in Guert's habitual
manner of underrating himself, that inclined all who heard
him to his side; and, for myself, I will confess I early
became
his friend in all that matter, and so continued to the
last.
Bulstrode and I left the house together, walking arm and
arm to his quarters, leaving Dirck with the ladies.
This is a charming family, said my companion, as we
left the door; and I feel proud of being able to claim some
affinity to it, though it is not so near as I trust it may one
day become.
I started, almost twitching my arm away from that of the
Major's, turning half round, at the same instant, to look him
in the face. Bulstrode smiled, but preserved his own
self-possession
,
in the stoical manner common to men of fashion
and easy manners, pursuing the discourse.
I see that my frankness has occasioned you some little
surprise, he added; but the truth is the truth; and I hold
it to be unmanly for a gentleman who has made up his mind
to become the suitor of a lady, to make any secret of his
intentions;is not that your own way of thinking, Mr.
Littlepage?
Certainly, as respects the lady; and possibly, as respects
her family; but not as respects all the world.
I take your distinction, which may be a good one, in
ordinary cases; though, in the instance of Anneke Mordaunt,
it may be merciful to let wandering young men, like
yourself
,
Corny, comprehend the real state of the case. I very
well understand your own particular relation to the family
of the Mordaunts; but others may approach it with different
and more interested views.
Am I to understand, Mr. Bulstrode, that Miss Mordaunt
is your betrothed?
Oh! by no means; for she has not yet made up her
mind to accept me. You are to understand, however, that
I have proposed to Herman Mordaunt, with my father's
knowledge and approbation, and that the affair is
in petto
.
You can judge for yourself of the probable termination,
being a better judge, as a looker-on, than I, as a party
interested
,
of Anneke's manner of viewing my suit.
You will remember I have not seen you together these
ten months, until this morning; and I presume you do not
wish me to suppose you have been waiting all that time for
an answer.
As I consider you an
ami de famille
, Corny, there is
no reason why there should not be a fair statement of things
18*
laid before you, for that affair of the lion will ever render
you half a Mordaunt, yourself. I had proposed to Anneke,
when you first saw me, and got the usual lady-like answer
that the dear creature was too young to think of contracting
herself, which was certainly truer then than now; that I
had friends at home who ought to be consulted, that time
must be given, or the answer would necessarily be `no,'
and all the usual substance of such replies, in the
preliminary
state of a negotiation.
And there the matter has stood ever since?
By no means, my dear fellow; as far from that as
possible
.
I heard Herman Mordaunt, for he did most of the
talking on that side, with the patience of a saint, observed
how proper it all was, and stated my intention to lay every
thing before my father, and then advance to the assault
anew, reinforced by his consent, and authority to offer
settlements
.
All of which you got, by return of vessel, on writing
home? I added, unable to imagine how any man could
hesitate about receiving Anneke Mordaunt for a
daughter-in-law
.
Why, not exactly by return of vessel, though Sir Harry
is much too well-bred to neglect answering a letter. I never
knew him to do such a thing in his life; no, not when I
have pushed him a little closely on the subject of my
allowance
having been out before the quarter was up, as will
sometimes happen at college, you know, Corny. To tell
you the truth, my dear boy, Sir Harry's consent did
not
come by return of vessel, though an answer did. It is a
confounded distance across the Atlantic, and it takes time
to argue a question, when the parties are `a thousand
leagues asunder.'
Argue!What argument could be required to convince
Sir Harry Bulstrode of the propriety of your getting
Anneke
Mordaunt for a wife,
if you could?
Quite plain and sincere, upon my honour!But, I love
you for the simplicity of your character, Corny, and so
shall view all favourably. If I
could!
Well, we shall
know at the end of the approaching campaign, when you
and I come back from our trip to Quebec.
You have not answered my question, in the mean time,
concerning Sir Harry Bulstrode.
I beg Sir Harry's and your pardon. What argument
could be required to convince my father?Why, you have
never been at home, Littlepage, and cannot easily
understand
,
therefore, what the feeling is precisely in relation to
the coloniesmuch depends on that, you know.
I trust the mother loves her children, as I am certain
the children love their mother.
Yes, you are all loyal;I will say that for you, though
Albany is not exactly Bath, or New York, Westminster. I
suppose you know, Littlepage, that the church upon the
hill, yonder, which is called St. Peter's, though a very good
church, and a very respectable church, with a very
reputable
congregation, is not exactly Westminster Abbey, or even
St. James's?
I believe I understand you, sir; and so Sir Harry proved
obstinate?
As the devil!It took no less than three letters, the
last of which was pretty bold, to get him round, which I did
at last, and his consent, in due form, has been handed in to
Herman Mordaunt. I contended, with some advantages in
the affair, or I never should have prevailed. But, you will
see how it was. Sir Harry is gouty and asthmatic both,
and no great things of a life, at the best, and every acre he
has on earth is entailed, just making the whole thing a
question
of time.
All of which you communicated, of course, to Anneke
and Herman Mordaunt?
If I did I'll be hanged! No, no; Master Corny, I am
not so green as that would imply. You provincials are as
thin-skinned as
raisons de Fontainbleau
, and are not to be
touched so rudely. I do not believe Anneke would marry
the Duke of Norfolk himself, if the family raised the least
scruple about receiving her.
And would not Anneke be right, in acting under so
respectable
a feeling?
Why, you know she would only marry the duke, and
not his mother, and aunts, and uncles. I cannot see the
necessity of a young woman's making herself
uncomfortable
on that account. But, we have not come to that yet,
for I would wish you to understand, Littlepage, that I am
not accepted. No, no! justice to Anneke demands that I
should say this much. She knows of Sir Harry's consent,
however, and that is a good deal in my favour, you must
allow. I suppose her great objection will be to quitting her
father, who has no other child, and on him it
will
bear a
little hard; and, then, it is likely she will say something about
a change of country, for you Americans are all great
sticklers
for living in your own region.
I do not see how you can justly accuse us of that, since
it is universally admitted among us that everything is
better
at home than it is in the colonies.
I really think, Corny, rejoined Bulstrode, smiling
good-naturedly
,
were you to pay the old island a visit, now,
you yourself would confess that some things
are
.
I to visit!I am at a loss to imagine why I am named
as one disposed to deny it. Had it been Guert Ten Eyck,
now, or even Dirck Follock, one might imagine such a
thing; but I, who come from English blood, and who have
an English-born grandfather, at this moment, alive and well
at Satanstoe, am not to be included among the disaffected
to England.
Bulstrode pressed my arm, and his conversation took a
more confidential air, as it proceeded. I believe you are
right, Corny, he said; the colony is loyal enough,
Heaven
knows; yet I find these Dutch look on us red-coats more
coldly than the people of English blood, below. Should it
be ascribed to the phlegm of their manners, or to some
ancient
grudge connected with the conquest of their colony?
Hardly the last, I should think, since the colony was
traded away, under the final arrangement, in exchange for
a possession the Dutch now hold in South America. There
is nothing strange, however, in the descendants of the
people
of Holland preferring the Dutch to the English.
I assure you, Littlepage, the coldness with which we are
regarded by the Albanians has been spoken of among us;
though most of the leading families treat us well, and aid us
all they can. They should remember that we are here to
fight their battles, and to prevent the French from
overrunning
them.
To that they would probably answer that the French
would not molest them, but for their quarrel with England.
Here we must part, Mr. Bulstrode, as I have business to
attend to. I will add one word, however, before we separate,
and that is, that King George II. has not more loyal subjects
in his dominions, than those who dwell in his American
provinces
.
Bulstrode smiled, nodded in assent, waved his hand, and
we parted.
I had plenty of occupation for the remainder of that day.
Yaap arrived with his `brigade of sleighs' about noon, and
I went in search of Guert, in whose company I repaired
once more to the office of the contractor. Horses, harness,
sleighs, provisions and all were taken at high prices, and I
was paid for the whole in Spanish gold; joes and half-joes
being quite as much in use among us in that day as the
coin of the realm. Spanish silver has always formed our
smaller currency, such a thing as an English shilling, or a
sixpence, being quite a stranger among us. Pieces of
eight, or dollars, are our commonest coin, it is true, but we
make good use of the half-joe in all heavy transactions. I
have seen two or three Bank of England notes in my day,
but they are of very rare occurrence in the colonies. There
have been colony bills among us, but they are not favourites,
most of our transactions being carried on by means of the
Spanish gold and Spanish silver, that find their way up from
the islands and the Spanish main. The war of which I am
now writing, however, brought a great many guineas among
us, most of the troops being paid in that species of coin;
but the contractors, in general, found it easier to command
the half-joe than the guinea. Of the former, when all our
sales were made, Dirck and myself had, between us, no
less than one hundred and eleven, or eight hundred and
eighty-eight dollars in value.
I found Guert just as ready and just as friendly on this
occasion, as he had been on the previous day. Not only
were all our effects disposed of, but all our negroes were
hired to the army for the campaign, Yaap excepted. The
boys went off with their teams towards the north that same
afternoon, in high spirits, as ready for a frolic as any
white youths in the colony. I permitted Yaap to go on
with his sleigh, to be absent for a few days, but he was to
return and join us before we proceeded in quest of the
`Patent,' after the breaking up of the winter.
It was late in the afternoon before everything was settled,
when Guert invited me to take a turn with him on the
river in his own sleigh. By this time I had ascertained that
my new friend was a young man of very handsome property,
without father or mother, and that he lived in as good style
as was common for the simple habits of those around him.
Our principal families in New York were somewhat
remarkable
for the abundance of their plate, table-linen, and other
household effects of the latter character, while here and
there one was to be found that possessed some good pictures.
The latter, I have reason to think, however, were rare,
though occasionally the work of a master did find its way
to America, particularly from Holland and Flanders. Guert
kept bachelor's hall, in a respectable house, that had its
gable to the street, as usual, and which was of no great
size; but everything about it proved that his old black
housekeeper had been trained under a
rgime
of thorough
neatness; for that matter, everything around Albany wore
the appearance of being periodically scoured. The streets
themselves could not undergo that process with snow on the
ground; but once beneath a roof, and everything that had
the character of dirt was banished. In this particular
Guert's bachelor residence was as faultless as if it had a
mistress at its head, and that mistress were Mary Wallace.
If she ever consent to have me, said Guert, actually
sighing as he spoke, and glancing his eyes round the very
pretty little parlour I had just been praising, on the
occasion
of the visit I first made to his residence that afternoon;
if she ever consent to have me, Corny, I shall have to
build a new house. This is now a hundred years old, and
though it was thought a great affair in its day, it is not half
good enough for Mary Wallace. My dear fellow, how I
envy you that invitation to breakfast this morning! what a
favourite you must be with Herman Mordaunt!
We are very good friends, Guert,for, with the
freedom
of our colony manners, we had already dropped into
the familiarity of calling each other `Corny' and `Guert'
we are very good friends, Guert, I answered, and, I
have some reason to think, Herman Mordaunt does not
dislike
me. It was in my power to be of a trifling service to
Miss Anneke, last spring, and the whole family is disposed
to remember it.
So I can see, at a glance; even Anneke remembers it.
I have heard the whole story from Mary Wallace; it was
about a lion. I would give half of what I am worth, to see
Mary Wallace in the paws of a lion, or any other wild beast;
just to let her see that Guert Ten Eyck has a heart, as well
as Corny Littlepage. But, Corny my boy, there is one
thing you must do; you are in such favour, that it will be
easy for you to effect it; though I might try in vain, for
ever.
I will do anything that is proper, to oblige you, Guert;
for you have a claim on me for services rendered by
yourself
.
Pshaw!  Say nothing of such matters; I am never
happier than when buying or selling a horse; and, in
helping
you to get off your old cattle, why, I did the King no
harm, and you some good. But, it was about horses I was
thinking. You must know, Littlepage, there is not a young
man, or an old man, within twenty miles of Albany, that
drives such a pair of beasts as myself.
You surely do not wish me to sell these horses to Mary
Wallace, Guert! I rejoined, laughing.
Ay, my lad; and this house, and the old farm, and two
or three stores along the river; and all I have, provided
you can sell me with them. As the ladies have no present
use for horses, however, Herman Mordaunt having brought
up with him a very good pair, that came near running over
you and me, Corny; so there is no need of any sale; but
I
should
like to drive Mary and Anneke a turn of a few
miles, with that team of mine, and in my own sleigh!
That cannot prove such a difficult affair; young ladies,
ordinarily, consenting readily enough to be diverted with a
sleigh-ride.
The off-one carries himself more like a colonel, at the
head of his regiment, than like an ignorant horse!
I will propose the matter to Herman Mordaunt, or to
Anneke, herself, if you desire it.
And the near-one has the movement of a lady in a
minuet
,
when you rein him in a little. I drove those cattle,
Corny, across the pine-plains, to Schenectady, in one hour
and twenty-six minutes;sixteen miles, as the crow flies
and nearer sixty, if you follow all the turnings of the fifty
roads.
Well, what am I to do? tell this to the ladies, or beg
them to name a day?
Name a day!I wish it had come to that, Corny, with
my whole soul. They are two beauties!
Yes, I think everybody will admit
that
, I answered
innocently
;
yet, very different in their charms.
Oh! not a bit more alike than is just necessary for a
good match. I call one Jack, and the other Moses. I never
knew an animal that was named `Jack,' who would not do
his work. I would give a great deal, Corny, that Mary
Wallace could see that horse move!
I promised Guert that I would use all my influence with
the ladies, to induce them to trust themselves with his team;
and, in order that I might speak with authority, the sleigh
was ordered round to the door forthwith, with a view first to
take a turn with me. The winter equipage of Guert Ten
Eyck was really a tasteful and knowing thing. I had often
seen handsomer sleighs, in the way of paint, varnish, tops
and mouldings; for to these he appeared to pay very little
attention. The points on which its owner most valued his
sleigh, was the admirable manner in which it rested on its
runners  pressing lightly both behind and before. Then
the traces were nearer on a level with the horses, than was
common; though not so high as to affect the draft. The
colour, without, was a sky-blue; a favourite Dutch tint;
while within, it was fiery-red. The skins were very ample;
all coming from the grey wolf. As these skins were lined
with scarlet cloth, the effect of the whole was sufficiently
cheering and warm. I ought not to forget the bells. In
addition to the four sets buckled to the harness, the usual
accompaniment of every sort of sleigh-harness, Guert had
provided two enormous strings (always leathern straps), that
passed from the saddles quite down under the bodies of Jack
and Moses; and another string around each horse's neck;
thus increasing the jingling music of his march, at least
fourfold beyond the usual quantity.
[24]
[24]
As it is possible this book may pass into the hands of others than
Americans, it may be well to say that a sleigh-bell is a small hollow ball,
made of bell-metal, having a hole in it that passes round half of its
circumference
,
and containing a small
solid
ball, of a size not to escape.
These bells are fastened to leathern straps, which commonly pass round
the necks of the horses. In the time of Guert Ten Eyck, most of the bells
were attached to small plates, that were buckled to various parts of
the harness; but, as this caused a motion annoying to the animals,
Mr. Littlepage evidently wishes his readers to understand that his
friend, Ten Eyck, was too knowing to have recourse to the practice.
Even the straps are coming into disuse, the opinion beginning to
obtain that sleigh-bells are a nuisance, instead of an advantage.
Twenty years since, the laws of most large towns rendered them
necessary, under the pretence of preventing accidents by apprising
the footman of the approach of a sleigh; but more horses are now
driven, in the state of New York, without than with bells, in winter.
Sleigh, as spelt, is purely an American word. It is derived from
slee, in Dutch; which is pronounced like sleigh. Some persons
contend that the Americans ought to use the old English words
sled, or sledge. But these words do not precisely express the
things we possess. There is as much reason for calling a
pleasure-conveyance
by a name different from sled, as there is for saying
coach instead of wagon. Sleigh
will
become English, ere
long, as it is now American. Twenty millions of people not only
can make a word, but they can make a language, if it be needed.
Editor
.
In this style, then, we dashed from the door of the old
Ten Eyck-house; all the blacks in the street gazing at us in
delight, and shaking their sides with laughtera negro
always
expressing his admiration of anything, even to a
sermon
,
in that mode. I remember to have heard a traveller
who had been as far as Niagara, declare that his black did
nothing but roar with laughter, the first half-hour he stood
confronted with that mighty cataract.
Nor did the blacks alone stop to admire Guert Ten Eyck,
his sleigh and his horses. All the young men in the place
paid Guert this homage, for he was unanimously admitted
to be the best whip, and the best judge of horse-flesh, in
Albany; that is, the best judge for his years. Several
young women who were out in sleighs, looked behind them,
as we passed, proving that the admiration extended even to
the other sex. All this Guert felt and saw, and its effect
was very visible in his manner as he stood guiding his
Vol. I.  19
spirited pair, amid the wood-sleds that still crowded the
main street.
Our route lay towards the large flats, that extend for
miles along the west shore of the Hudson, to the north of
Albany. This was the road usually taken by the young
people of the place, in their evening sleigh-rides; not a few
of the better class stopping to pay their respects to Madame
Schuyler, a widow born of the same family as that into
which she had married, and who, from her character,
connections
and fortune, filled a high place in the social circle
of the vicinity. Guert knew this lady, and proposed that I
should call and pay my respects to hera tribute she was
accustomed to receive from most strangers of respectability.
Thither, then, we drove as fast as my companion's blacks
could carry us. The distance was only a few miles, and
we were soon dashing through the open gate, into what
must have been a very pretty, though an inartificial, lawn,
in the summer.
By Jove, we are in luck! cried Guert, the moment his
eyes got a view of the stables: Yonder is Herman
Mordaunt's
sleigh, and we shall find the ladies here!
All this turned out as Guert had announced. Anneke
and Mary Wallace had dined with Madame Schuyler, and
their coats and shawls had just been brought to them,
preparatory
to returning home, as we entered. I had heard so
much of Madame Schuyler as not to approach this
respectable
person without awe, and I had no eyes at first for her
companions. I was well received by the mistress of the
house, a woman of so large a size as to rise from her chair
with great difficulty, but whose countenance expressed
equally intelligence, principles, refinement and benevolence.
She no sooner heard the name of Littlepage, than she threw
a meaning glance towards the young female friends, mine
following and perceiving Anneke colouring highly, and
looking a little distressed. As for Mary Wallace, she
appeared
to me then, as I fancied was usually the case
whenever
Guert Ten Eyck approached her, to be struggling with
a species of melancholy pleasure.
It is unnecessary for me to hear your mother's name,
Mr. Littlepage, said Madam Schuyler, extending a hand,
since I knew her as a young woman. In
her
name you
are welcome; as, indeed, you would be in your own, after
the all-important service I hear you have rendered my
sweet young friend, here.
I could only bow, and express my thanks; but it is
unnecessary
to say how grateful to me was praise of this sort,
coming, as I knew it must, from Anneke in the first instance.
Still, I could hardly refrain from laughing at Guert, who
shrugged his shoulders, and turned towards me with a look
that repeated his ludicrous regrets he could not see Mary
Wallace in a lion's paws! The conversation then took the
usual turn, and I got an opportunity of speaking to the
young ladies.
After the character I had heard of Madam Schuyler, I
was a good deal surprised to find that Guert was somewhat
of a favourite. But even the most intellectual and refined
women, I have since had occasion to learn, feel a disposition
to judge handsome, manly, frank, flighty fellows like my
new acquaintance, somewhat leniently. With all his levity,
and his disposition to run into the excesses of animal spirits,
there was that about Guert which rendered it difficult to
despise him. The courage of a lion was in his eye, and his
front and bearing were precisely those that are particularly
attractive to women. To these advantages were added a
seeming unconsciousness of his superiority to most around
him, in the way of looks, and a humility of spirit that
caused him often to deplore his deficiencies in those
accomplishments
which characterize the man of study and of
intellectual
activity. It was only among the hardy, active,
and reckless, that Guert manifested the least ambition to be
a leader.
Do you still drive those spirited blacks, Guert,
demanded
Madam Schuyler, in a gentle, affable way, that
inclined
her to adapt her discourse to the tastes of those she
might happen to be with; those, I mean, which you
purchased
in the autumn?
You may be certain of that, aunt,  every one who
could claim the most distant relationship to this amiable
woman, and whose years did not render the appellation
disrespectful
,
called her auntyou may be certain of that,
aunt, for their equals are not to be found in
this
colony.
The gentlemen of the army pretend that no horse can be
good that has not what they call
blood;
but Jack and
Moses are both of the Dutch breed, and the Schuylers and
the Ten Eycks will never own there is no blood in such
a stock. I have given each of these animals my own name,
and call them Jack Ten Eyck and Moses Ten Eyck.
I hope you will not exclude the Littlepages and the
Mordaunts from your list of dissenters, Mr. Ten Eyck,
observed Anneke, laughing, since both have Dutch blood
in their veins, too.
Very true, Miss Anneke; Miss Wallace being the only
true, thorough, Englishwoman here. But, as Aunt
Schuyler
has spoken of my team, I wish I could persuade you and
Miss Mary to let me drive you back to Albany with it, this
very evening. Your own sleigh can follow; and your
father's horses being English, we shall have an opportunity
of comparing the two breeds. The Anglo-Saxons will have
no load, while the Flemings will; still I will wager animal
against animal, that the last do the work the most neatly,
and in the shortest time.
To this proposition, however, Anneke would not consent;
her instinctive delicacy, I make no doubt, at once presenting
to her mind the impropriety of quitting her own sleigh, to
take an evening's drive in that of a young man of Guert's
established reputation for recklessness and fun, and who
was not always fortunate enough to persuade young women
of the first class to be his companions. The turn the
conversation
had taken, nevertheless, had the effect to produce
so many urgent appeals, that were seconded by myself, to
give the horses a trial, that Mary Wallace promised to
submit
the matter to Herman Mordaunt, and, should he
approve
,
to accompany Guert, Anneke and myself, in an
excursion
the succeeding week.
This concession was received by poor Guert with
profound
gratitude; and he assured me, as we drove back to
town, that he had not felt so happy for the last two months.
It is in the power of such a young woman  young
angel, I might better say, added Guert, to make
anything
she may please of me! I know I am an idler, and
too fond of our Dutch amusements, and that I have not paid
the attention I ought to have paid to books; but let that
precious
creature only take me by the hand, and I should turn
out an altered man in a month. Young women can do
anything they please with us, Mr. Littlepage, when they
set their minds about it in earnest. I wish I was a horse,
to have the pleasure of dragging Mary Wallace in this
excursion
!
CHAPTER XV.
When lo! the voice of loud alarm
His inmost soul appals:
What ho! Lord William, rise in haste!
The water saps thy walls!
Lord William
.
The
visit to Madam Schuyler occurred of a Saturday
evening; and the matter of our adventure in company with
Jack and Moses, was to be decided on the following Monday.
When I rose and looked out of my window on the Sunday
morning, however, there appeared but very little prospect
of its being effected that spring, inasmuch as it rained
heavily
,
and there was a fresh south wind. We had reached
the 21st of March, a period of the year when a decided
thaw was not only ominous to the sleighing, but when it
actually predicted a permanent breaking up of the winter.
The season had been late, and it was thought the change
could not be distant.
The rain and south wind continued all that day, and
torrents
of water came rushing down the short, steep streets,
effectually washing away everything like snow. Mr.
Worden
preached, notwithstanding, and to a very respectable
congregation. Dirck and myself attended; but Jason
preferred
sitting out a double half-hour glass sermon in the Dutch
church, delivered in a language of which he understood
very little, to lending his countenance to the rites of the
English service. Both Anneke and Mary Wallace found
their way up the hill, going in a carriage; though I observed
that Herman Mordaunt was absent. Guert was in the
gallery
,
19 *
in which we also sat; but I could not avoid remarking
that neither of the young ladies raised her eyes once, during
the whole service, as high as our pews. Guert whispered
something about this, as he hastened down stairs to hand
them to their carriage, when the congregation was dismissed,
begging me, at the same time, to be punctual to the
appointment
for the next day. What he meant by this last
remembrancer
,
I did not understand; for the hills were beginning
to exhibit their bare breasts, and it was somewhat surprising
with what rapidity a rather unusual amount of snow had
disappeared. I had no opportunity to ask an explanation,
as Guert was too busy in placing the ladies in the carriage,
and the weather was not such as to admit of my remaining
a moment longer in the street than was indispensably
necessary
.
A change occurred in the weather during the night, the
rain having ceased, though the atmosphere continued mild,
and the wind was still from the south. It was the
commencement
of the spring; and, as I walked round to Guert
Ten Eyck's house, to meet him at breakfast, I observed that
several vehicles with wheels were already in motion in the
streets, and that divers persons appeared to be putting away
their sleighs and sleds, as things of no further use, until the
next winter. Our springs do not certainly come upon us as
suddenly as some of which I have read, in the old world;
but when the snow and winter endure as far into March as
had been the case with that of the year 1758, the change is
often nearly magical.
Here, then, is the spring opening, I said to Dirck, as
we walked along the well-washed streets; and, in a few
weeks, we must be off to the bush. Our business on the
Patent must be got along with, before the troops are put in
motion, or we may lose the opportunity of seeing a
campaign
.
With such expectations and feelings I entered Guert's
bachelor abode; and the first words I uttered, were to
sympathize
in his supposed disappointment.
It is a great pity you did not propose the drive to the
ladies for Saturday, I began; for that was not only a
mild day, but the sleighing was excellent. As it is, you will
have to postpone your triumph until next winter.
I do not understand you! cried Guert; Jack and Moses
never were in better heart, or in better condition. I think
they are equal to going to Kinderhook in two hours!
But who will furnish the roads with snow? By looking
out of the window, you will see that the streets are nearly
bare.
Streets and roads! Who cares for either, while we
have the river? We often use the river here, weeks at a
time, when the snow has left us. The ice has been
remarkably
even the whole of this winter, and, now the snow is off
it, there will be no danger from the air-holes.
I confess I did not much like the notion of travelling
twenty miles on the ice, but was far too much of a man to
offer any objections.
We breakfasted, and proceeded in a body to the residence
of Herman Mordaunt. When the ladies first heard that we
had come to claim the redemption of the half-promise given
at Madam Schuyler's, their surprise was not less than mine
had been, half an hour before, while their uneasiness was
probably greater.
Surely, Jack and Moses cannot exhibit all their noble
qualities without snow! exclaimed Anneke, laughing, Ten
Eycks though they be!
We Albanians have the advantage of travelling on the
ice, when the the snow fails us, answered Guert. Here
is the river, near by, and never was the sleighing on it, better
than at this moment.
But, it has been many times safer, I should think.
This looks very much like the breaking up of winter!
That is probable enough, and so much greater the
reason
why we should not delay, if you and Miss Mary ever
intend to learn what the blacks can do. It is for the honour
of Holland that I desire it, else would I not presume so far.
I feel every condescension of this sort, that I receive from
you two ladies, in a way I cannot express; for no one
knows, better than myself, how unworthy I am of your
smallest notice.
This brought the signs of yielding, at once, into the mild
countenance of Mary Wallace. Guert's self-humiliation
never failed to do this. There was so much obvious truth
in his admission, so sincere a disposition to place himself,
where nature and education, or a
want
of education had
placed him, and most of all so profound a deference for the
mental superiority of Mary herself, that the female heart
found it impossible to resist. To my surprise, Guert's
mistress
,
contrary to her habit in such things, was the first to
join him, and to second his proposal. Herman Mordaunt
entering the room at this instant, the whole thing was
referred
to him, as in reason it ought to have been.
I remember to have travelled on the Hudson, a few
years since, returned Herman Mordaunt, the entire
distance
between Albany and Sing-Sing, and a very good time
we had of it; much better than had we gone by land, for
there was little or no snow.
Just our case now, Miss Anneke! cried Guert. Good
sleighing on the river, but none on the land.
Was that near the end of March, dear Papa? asked
Anneke, a little inquiringly.
No, certainly not, for it was early in February. But
the ice, at this moment, must be near eighteen inches thick,
and strong enough to bear a load of hay.
Yes, Masser Herman, observed Cato, a grey-headed
black, who had never called his master by any other name,
having known him from an infant; yes, Masser Herman,
a load do come over dis minute.
It appeared unreasonable to distrust the strength of the
ice, after this proof to the contrary, and Anneke submitted.
The party was arranged forthwith, and in the following
manner:The two ladies, Guert and myself, were to be
drawn by the blacks, while Herman Mordaunt, Dirck, and
any one else they could enlist, were to follow in the New
York sleigh. It was hoped that an elderly female
connection
,
Mrs. Bogart, who resided at Albany, would consent to
be of the party, as the plan was to visit and dine with
another
and a mutual connection of the Mordaunts, at
Kinderhook
.
While the sleighs were getting ready, Herman
Mordaunt
walked round to the house of Mrs. Bogart, made his
request, and was successful.
The clock in the tower of the English church struck ten,
as both sleighs drove from Herman Mordaunt's door. There
was literally no snow in the middle of the streets; but enough
of it, mingled with ice, was still to be found nearer the
houses, to enable us to get down to the ferry, the point
where sleighs usually went upon the river. Here Herman
Mordaunt, who was in advance, checked his horses, and
turned to speak to Guert on the propriety of
proceeding
.
The ice near the shore had evidently been moved,
the river having risen a foot or two, in consequence of the
wind and the thaw, and there was a sort of icy wave cast
up near the land, over which it was indispensable to pass,
in order to get fairly on the river. As the top of this ridge,
or wave, was broken, it exposed a fissure that enabled us
to see the thickness of the ice, and this Guert pointed out in
proof of its strength. There was nothing unusual in a small
movement of the covering of the river, which the current
often produces; but, unless the vast fields below got in
motion
,
it was impossible for those above materially to change
their positions. Sleighs were passing, too, still bringing to
town, hay from the flats on the eastern bank, and there was
no longer any hesitation. Herman Mordaunt's sleigh passed
slowly over the ridge, having a care to the legs of the horses,
and ours followed in the same cautious manner, though the
blacks jumped across the fissure in spite of their master's
exertions.
Once on the river, however, Guert gave his blacks the
whip and rein, and away we went like the wind. The
smooth, icy surface of the Hudson was our road, the thaw
having left very few traces of any track. The water had
all passed beneath the ice, through cracks and fissures of
one sort and another, leaving us an even, dry, surface to
trot on. The wind was still southerly, though scarcely
warm, while a bright sun contributed to render our
excursion
as gay to the eye, as it certainly was to our feelings.
In a few minutes every trace of uneasiness had vanished.
Away we went, the blacks doing full credit to their owner's
boasts, seeming scarcely to touch the ice, from which their
feet appeared to rebound with a sort of elastic force.
Herman
Mordaunt's bays followed on our heels, and the sleighs
had passed over the well-known shoal of the Overslaugh,
within the first twenty minutes after they touched the river.
Every northern American is familiar with the effect that
the motion of a sleigh produces on the spirits, under
favourable
circumstances. Had our party been altogether
composed
of Albanians, there would probably have been no
drawback on the enjoyment, for use would have prevented
apprehension; but it required the few minutes I have
mentioned
to give Anneke and Mary Wallace full confidence in
the ice. By the time we reached the Overslaugh, however,
their fears had vanished; and Guert confirmed their sense
of security, by telling them to listen to the sounds produced
by his horses' hoofs, which certainly conveyed the
impresssion
of moving on a solid foundation.
Mary Wallace had never before been so gay in my
presence
,
as she appeared to be that morning. Once, or twice,
I fancied her eyes almost as bright as those of Anneke's,
and certainly her laugh was as sweet and musical. Both
the girls were full of spirits, and some little things occurred
that gave me hopes Bulstrode had no reason to fancy
himself
as secure, as he sometimes seemed to be. A casual
remark of Guert's had the effect to bring out some of
Anneke's
private sentiments on the subject; or, at least, so
they appeared to be to me.
I am surprised that Mr. Mordaunt forgot to invite Mr.
Bulstrode to be one of our party, to-day, cried Guert, when
we were below the Overslaugh. The Major loves
sleighing
,
and he would have filled the fourth seat, in the other
sleigh, very agreeably. As for coming into this, that would
be refused him, were he even a general!
Mr. Bulstrode is English, answered Anneke, with spirit,
and fancies American amusements beneath the tastes of
one who has been presented at the Court of St. James.
Well, Miss Anneke, I cannot say that I agree with you
at all, in this opinion of Mr. Bulstrode, Guert returned,
innocently. It is true, he is English; that he fancies
an advantage, as does Corny Littlepage, here; but we must
make proper allowances for home-love and
foreign-dislike
.
`Corny Littlepage, here,' is only
half
English, and that
half is colony-born and colony-bred, answered the
laughing
girl, and he has loved a sleigh from the time when he
first slid down hill
Ah! Miss Annekelet me entreat
Oh! no allusion is intended to the Dutch church and
its neighbourhood;but, the sports of childhood are always
dear to us, as are sometimes the discomforts. Habit and
prejudice are sister hand-maidens; and I never see one of
these gentlemen from home, taking extraordinary interest
in any of our peculiarly colony usages, but I distrusted an
extra amount of complaisance, or a sort of enjoyment in
which we do not strictly share.
Is this altogether liberal to Bulstrode, Miss Anneke, I
ventured to put in; he seems to like us, and I am sure he
has good reason so to do. That he likes
some
of us, is too
apparent to be concealed or denied.
Mr. Bulstrode is a skilful actor, as all who saw his Cato
must be aware, retorted the charming girl, compressing
her pouting lips in a way that seemed to me to be
inexpressibly
pleasing; and those who saw his Scrub must be
equally convinced of the versatility of his talents. No, no;
Major Bulstrode is better where he is, or will be to-day, at
four o'clockat the head of the mess of the th, instead
of dining in a snug Dutch parlour, with my cousin, worthy
Mrs. van der Heyden, at a dinner got up with colony
hospitality
,
and colony good-will, and colony plainness. The
entertainment we shall receive to-day, sweetened, as it will
be, by the welcome which will come from the heart, can
have no competitor in countries where a messenger must be
sent two days before the visit, to ask permission to come, in
order to escape cold looks and artificial surprise. I would
prefer surprising my friends from the heart, instead of from
the head.
Guert expressed his astonishment that any one should not
always be glad and willing to receive his friends; and
insisted
on it, that no such inhospitable customs
could
exist.
I knew, however, that society could not exist on the same
terms, in old and in new countriesamong a people that
was pressed upon by numbers, and a people that had not
yet felt the evils of a superabundant population. Americans
are like dwellers in the country, who are always glad to see
their friends; and I ventured to say something of the causes
of these differences in habits.
Nothing occurred worthy of being dwelt on, in our ride
to Kinderhook. Mrs. Van der Heyden resided at a short
distance from theriver, and the blacks and the bays had
some little difficulty in dragging us through the mud to her
door. Once there, however, our welcome fully verified the
theory of the colony habits, which had been talked over in
our drive down. Anneke's worthy connection was not only
glad to see her, as anybody might have been, but she would
have been glad to receive as many as her house would hold.
Few excuses were necessary, for we were all welcome.
The visit would retard her dinner an hour, as was frankly
admittedbut that was nothing; and cakes and wine were
set before us in the interval, did we feel hungry in
consequence
of a two hours' ride. Guert was desired to make
free, and go to the stables to give his own orders. In a
word, our reception was just that which every colonist has
experienced, when he has gone unexpectedly to visit a friend,
or a friend's friend. Our dinner was excellent, though not
accompanied by much form. The wine was good; Mrs.
van der Heyden's deceased husband having been a judge
of what was desirable in that respect. Everybody was in
good-humour; and our hostess insisted on giving us coffee
before we took our departure.
There will be a moon, cousin Herman, she said, and
the night will be both light and pleasant. Guert knows the
road, which cannot well be missed, as it is the river; and
if you quit me at eight, you will reach home in good season
to go to rest. It is so seldom I see you, that I have a right
to claim every minute you can spare. There remains much
to be told concerning our old friends and mutual relatives.
When such words are accompanied by looks and acts
that prove their sincerity, it is not easy to tear ourselves
away from a pleasant house. We chatted on, laughed,
listened to stories and colony anecdotes that carried us back
to the last war, and heard a great many eulogiums on beaux
and belles, that we young people had, all our lives,
considered
as respectable, elderly, common-place sort of persons.
At length the hour arrived when even Mrs. Bogart
herself
admitted we ought to part. Anneke and Mary were
kissed, enveloped in their furs, and kissed again, and then
we took our leave. As we left the house, I remarked that a
clock in the passage struck eight. In a few minutes every
one was placed, and the runners were striking fire from the
flints of the bare ground. We had less difficulty in
descending
than in ascending the bank of the river- though
there was no snow. It did not absolutely freeze, nor had it
actually frozen since the commencement of the thaw, but
the earth had stiffened since the disappearance of the sun.
I was much rejoiced when the blacks sprang upon the ice,
and whirled us away, on our return road, at a rate even
exceeding the speed with which they had come down it in
the morning. I thought it high time we should be in motion
on our return; and in motion we were, if flying at the rate
of eleven miles in the hour could thus be termed.
The light of the moon was not clear and bright, for there
was a haze in the atmosphere, as is apt to occur in the mild
weather of March; but there was enough to enable Guert
to dash ahead with as great a velocity as was at all
desirable
.
We were all in high spirits; us two young men so
much the more, because each of us fancied he had seen that
day evidence of a tender interest existing in the heart of his
mistress towards himself. Mary Wallace had managed,
with a woman's tact, to make her suitor appear even
respectable
in female society, and had brought out in him
many sentiments that denoted a generous disposition and a
manly heart, if not a cultivated intellect; and Guert was
getting confidence, and with it the means of giving his
capacity
fairer play. As for Anneke, she now knew my aim,
and I had some right to construe several little symptoms of
feeling, that escaped her in the course of the day,
favourably
.
I fancied that, gentle as it always was, her voice
grew softer, and her smile sweeter and more winning, as
she addressed herself to, or smiled on me; and she did just
enough of both not to appear distant, and just little enough
to appear conscious; at least such were the conjectures of
one who I do not think could be properly accused of too
much confidence, and whose natural diffidence was much
increased by the self-distrust of the purest love.
Away we went, Guert's complicated chimes of bells
jingling their merry notes in a manner to be heard half a
mile, the horses bearing hard on the bits, for they knew that
their own stables lay at the end of their journey, and
Herman
Mordaunt's bays keeping so near us that,
notwithstanding
the noise we made with our own bells, the sounds of
his were constantly in our ears. An hour went swiftly by,
and we had already passed Coejeman's, and had a hamlet
Vol. I.  20
that stretched along the strand, and which lay quite beneath
the high bank of the river, in dim distant view. This place
has since been known by the name of Monkey Town, and
is a little remarkable as being the first cluster of houses on
the shores of the Hudson after quitting Albany. I dare
say it has another name in law, but Guert gave it the
appellation
I have mentioned.
I have said that the night had a sombre, misty, light, the
moon wading across the heavens through a deep but thin
ocean of vapour. We saw the shores plainly enough, and
we saw the houses and trees, but it was difficult to
distinguish
smaller objects at any distance. In the course of the
day twenty sleighs had been met or passed, but at that hour
everybody but ourselves appeared to have deserted the river.
It was getting late for the simple habits of those who dwelt
on its shores. When about half-way between the islands
opposite to Coejeman's and the hamlet just named, Guert,
who stood erect to drive, told us that some one who was
out late, like themselves, was coming down. The horses
of the strangers were in a very fast trot, and the sleigh
was evidently inclining towards the west shore, as if those
it held intended to land at no great distance. As it passed,
quite swiftly, a man's voice called out something on a high
key, but our bells made so much noise that it was not easy
to understand him. He spoke in Dutch, too, and none of
our ears, those of Guert excepted, were sufficiently expert
in that language to be particularly quick in comprehending
what he said. The call passed unheeded, then, such things
being quite frequent among the Dutch, who seldom passed
each other on the highway without a greeting of some sort
or other. I was thinking of this practice, and of the points
that distinguished our own habits from those of the people
of this part of the colony, when sleigh-bells sounded quite
near me, and turning my head, I saw Herman Mordaunt's bays galloping close to us, as if wishing to get alongside.
At the next moment the object was effected, and Guert
pulled up.
Did you understand the man who passed down, Guert?
demanded Herman Mordaunt, as soon as all noises ceased.
He called out to us, at the top of his voice, and would
hardly do that without an object.
These men seldom go home, after a visit to Albany,
without filling their jugs, answered Guert, drily; what
could he have to say, more than to wish us good-night?
I cannot tell, but Mrs. Bogart thought she understood
something about `Albany,' and `the river.'
The ladies always fancy Albany is to sink into the
river after a great thaw, answered Guert,
good-humouredly
;
but I can show either of them that the ice is sixteen
inches thick, here where we stand.
Guert then gave me the reins, stepped out of the sleigh,
went a short distance to a large crack that he had seen
while speaking, and returned with a thumb placed on the
handle of the whip, as a measure to show that his statement
was true. The ice, at that spot, was certainly nearer
eighteen
than sixteen inches thick. Herman Mordaunt showed
the measure to Mrs. Bogart, whose alarm was pacified by
this positive proof. Neither Anneke nor Mary exhibited
any fear; but, on the contrary, as the sleighs separated
again, each had something pleasant, but feminine, to say at
the expense of poor Mrs. Bogart's imagination.
I believe I was the only person in our own sleigh who felt
any alarm, after the occurrence of this little incident. Why
uneasiness beset
me
, I cannot precisely say. It must have
been altogether on Anneke's account, and not in the least
on my own. Such accidents as sleighs breaking through,
on our New York lakes and rivers, happened almost every
winter, and horses were often drowned; though it was
seldom
the consequences proved so serious to their owners.
I recalled to mind the fragile nature of ice, the necessary
effects of the great thaw and the heavy rains, remembering
that frozen water might still retain most of its apparent
thickness, after its consistency was greatly impaired. But,
I could do nothing! If we landed, the roads were
impassable
for runners, almost for wheels, and another hour might
carry the ladies, by means of the river, to their comfortable
homes. That day, however, which, down to the moment
of meeting the unknown sleigh, had been the very happiest
of my life, was entirely changed in its aspect, and I no
longer regarded it with any satisfaction. Had Anneke been
at home, I could gladly have entered into a contract to pass
a week on the river myself, as the condition of her safety.
I thought but little of the others, to my shame be it said,
though I cannot do myself the injustice to imagine, had
Anneke been away, that I would have deserted even a
horse, while there was a hope of saving him.
Away we went! Guert drove rapidly, but he drove with
judgment, and it seemed as if his blacks knew what was
expected of them. It was not long before we were trotting
past the hamlet I have mentioned. It would seem that the
bells of the two sleighs attracted the attention of the people
on the shore, all of whom had not yet gone to bed; for the
door of a house opened, and two men issued out of it, gazing
at us as we trotted past at a pace that defied pursuit. These
men also hallooed to us, in Dutch, and again Herman
Mordaunt
galloped up alongside, to speak to us.
Did you understand these men? he called out, for this
time Guert did not see fit to stop his horses; they, too,
had something to tell us.
These people always have something to tell an Albany
sleigh, Mr. Mordaunt, answered Guert; though it is not
often that which it would do any good to hear.
But Mrs. Bogart thinks they also had something to say
about `Albany,' and the `river.'
I understand Dutch as well as excellent Mrs. Bogart,
said Guert, a little drily; and I heard nothing; while I
fancy I understand the river better. This ice would bear a
dozen loads of hay, in a close line.
This again satisfied Herman Mordaunt and the ladies, but
it did not satisfy me. Our own bells made four times the
noise of those of Herman Mordaunt; and it was very
possible
that one, who understood Dutch perfectly, might
comprehend
a call in that language, while seated in his own
sleigh, when the same call could not be comprehended by
the same person, while seated in Guert's. There was no
pause, however; on we trotted; and another mile was passed,
before any new occurrence attracted attention.
The laugh was again heard among us, for Mary Wallace
consented to sing an air, that was rendered somewhat
ludicrous
by the accompaniment of the bells. This song, or
verse or two, for the singer got no further on account of the
interruption, had drawn Guert's and my attention behind us,
or away from the horses, when a whirling sound was heard,
followed immediately by a loud shout. A sleigh passed
within ten yards of us, going down, and the whirling sound
was caused by its runners, while the shout came from a
solitary man, who stood erect, waving his whip and calling
to us in a loud voice, as long as he could be heard. This
was but for a moment, however, as his horses were on the
run; and the last we could see of the man, through the
misty moon-light, he had turned his whip on his team, to
urge it ahead still faster. In an instant, Herman Mordaunt
was at our side, for the third time that night, and he called
out to us somewhat authoritatively to stop.
What can all this mean, Guert? he asked. Three
times have we had warnings about `Albany' and the `river.'
I heard this man myself utter those two words, and cannot
be mistaken.
I dare say, sir, that you may have heard something of
the sort, answered the still incredulous Guert; for these
chaps have generally some impertinence to utter, when they
pass a team that is better than their own. These blacks of
mine, Herman Mordaunt, awaken a good deal of envy,
whenever I go out with them; and a Dutchman will forgive
you any other superiority, sooner than he will overlook
your having the best team. That last man had a spur in
his head, moreover, and is driving his cattle, at this moment,
more like a spook than like a humane and rational being. I
dare say he asked if we owned Albany and the river.
Guert's allusion to his horses occasioned a general laugh;
and laughter is little favourable to cool reflection. We all
looked out on the solemn and silent night, cast our eyes
along the wide and long reach of the river, in which we
happened to be, and saw nothing but the calm of nature,
rendered imposing by solitude and the stillness of the hour.
Guert smilingly renewed his assurances that all was right,
and moved on. Away we went! Guert evidently pressed
his horses, as if desirous of being placed beyond this anxiety
as soon as possible. The blacks flew, rather than trotted;
and we were all beginning to submit to the exhilaration of
20 *
so rapid and easy a motion, when a sound which resembled
that which one might suppose the simultaneous explosion of
a thousand rifles would produce, was heard, and caused both
drivers to pull up; the sleighs stopping quite near each other,
and at the same instant! A slight exclamation escaped old
Mrs. Bogart; but Anneke and Mary remained still as death.
What means that sound, Guert? inquired Herman
Mordaunt; the concern he felt being betrayed by the very
tone of his voice. Something seems wrong!
Something
is
wrong, answered Guert, coolly, but very
decidedly; and it is something that must be seen to.
As this was said, Guert stepped out on the ice, which he
struck a hard blow with the heel of his boot, as if to make
certain of its solidity. A second report was heard, and it
evidently came from
behind
us. Guert gazed intently down
the river; then he laid his head close to the surface of the
ice, and looked again. At the same time, three or four more
of these startling reports followed each other in quick
succession
.
Guert instantly rose to his feet.
I understand it, now, he said, and find I have been
rather too confident. The ice, however, is safe and strong,
and we have nothing to fear from its weakness. Perhaps
it would be better to quit the river notwithstanding, though
I am far from certain the better course will not be to
push on.
Let us know the danger at once, Mr. Ten Eyck, said
Herman Mordaunt, that we may decide for the best.
Why, sir, I am afraid that the rains and the thaw
together
,
have thrown so much water into the river, all at
once, as it might be, as to have raised the ice and broken it
loose, in spots, from the shores. When this happens
above
,
before the ice has disappeared below, it sometimes causes
dams to form, which heap up such a weight as to break the
whole plain of ice far below it, and thus throw cakes over
cakes until walls twenty or thirty feet high are formed.
This has not happened
yet
, therefore there is no immediate
danger; but by bending your heads low, you can see that
such a
break
has just taken place about half a mile below
us.
We did as Guert directed, and saw that a mound had
arisen across the river nearer than the distance named by
our companion, completely cutting off retreat by the way
we had come. The bank on the west side of the Hudson
was high at the point where we were, and looking intensely
at it, I saw by the manner in which the trees disappeared,
the more distant behind those that were nearer, that we were
actually in motion! An involuntary exclamation caused
the whole party to comprehend this startling fact at the same
instant. We were certainly in motion, though very slowly,
on the ice of that swollen river, in the quiet and solitude of
a night in which the moon rather aided in making danger
apparent than in assisting us to avoid it! What was to be
done? It was necessary to decide, and that promptly and
intelligently.
We waited for Herman Mordaunt to advise us, but he
referred the matter at once to Guert's greater experience.
We cannot land here, answered the young man, so
long as the ice is in motion, and I think it better to push on.
Every foot will bring us so much nearer to Albany, and we
shall get among the islands a mile or two higher, where the
chances of landing will be greatly increased. Besides, I
have often crossed the river on a cake, for they frequently
stop, and I have known even loaded sleighs profit by them
to get over the river. As yet there is nothing very
alarming;let us push on, and get nearer to the islands.
This, then, was done, though there was no longer heard
the laugh or the song among us. I could see that Herman
Mordaunt was uneasy about Anneke, though he could not
bring her into his own sleigh, leaving Mary Wallace alone;
neither could he abandon his respectable connection, Mrs.
Bogart. Before we re-entered the sleighs, I took an
occasion
to assure him that Anneke should be my especial care.
God bless you, Corny, my dear boy, Herman
Mordaunt
answered, squeezing my hand with fervour. God
bless you, and enable you to protect her. I was about to
ask you to change seats with me; but, on the whole, I think
my child will be safer with you than she could be with me.
We will await God's pleasure as accident has placed us.
I will desert her only with life, Mr. Mordaunt. Be at
ease on that subject.
I know you will notI am
sure
you will not,
Littlepage
;
that affair of the lion is a pledge that you will not.
Had Bulstrode come, we should have been strong enough
tobut Guert is impatient to be off. God bless you, boy
God bless you. Do not neglect my child.
Guert
was
impatient, and no sooner was I in the sleigh
than we were once more in rapid motion. I said a few
words to encourage the girls, and then no sound of a human
voice mingled with the gloomy scene.
END OF THE FIRST VOLUME.